[image]

[image]

EARLY BIRD BOOKS

FRESH EBOOK DEALS, DELIVERED DAILY

BE THE FIRST TO KNOW ABOUT
FREE AND DISCOUNTED EBOOKS

NEW DEALS HATCH EVERY DAY!

[image]

Animal Liberation

The Definitive Classic of the Animal Movement

Peter Singer

[image]

To Richard and Mary, and Ros and Stan, and—especially to—Renata

This revised edition is also for all of you who have changed your lives
in order to bring Animal Liberation closer. You have made it possible to
believe that the power of ethical reasoning can prevail over the
self-interest of our species.

Contents

Preface to the Fortieth Anniversary Edition

Preface to the 2009 Edition

Preface to the 1975 Edition

1 All Animals Are Equal …

_or why the ethical principle on which human equality rests requires us
to extend equal consideration to animals too_

2 Tools for Research …

_your taxes at work_

3 Down on the Factory Farm …

_or what happened to your dinner when it was still an animal_

4 Becoming a Vegetarian …

_or how to produce less suffering and more food at a reduced cost to the
environment_

5 Man’s Dominion …

_a short history of speciesism_

6 Speciesism Today …

_defenses, rationalizations, and objections to Animal Liberation and the
progress made in overcoming them_

Further Reading

Notes

Acknowledgments

Index

A Biography of Peter Singer

Preface to the Fortieth Anniversary Edition

People often ask me what I was expecting to happen when _Animal
Liberation_ appeared forty years ago. One thing I wasn’t expecting was
that the book would be continuously in print for the next forty years!
Nor, of course, was I expecting it to appear as an ebook, because it was
typed on a manual typewriter long before there was an Internet or anyone
had a personal computer.

That isn’t, however, what people really want to know. They want to know
what impact I expected the book to have. On that, my expectations
fluctuated between two extremes. In my more optimistic moments, the
arguments against our oppression of animals seemed so clear and
irrefutable that surely, I thought, a popular movement would arise to
inform people how we are treating animals (for then most people knew
nothing about factory farming or the kind of experiments done on
animals). This better-informed public would boycott animal products, so
that factory farming, or perhaps the entire meat industry, would shrink
and eventually disappear, along with the kind of research on animals
that I describe in chapter two.

In my more pessimistic (or realistic) moments, I understood the enormity
of the task facing the movement that I envisaged. How can one change
habits as widespread and as deeply ingrained as eating meat? It would
first be necessary to transform people’s attitudes toward animals, and
these attitudes would be especially difficult to change because as
chapters five and six demonstrate, people are very good at finding
rationalizations for doing what they want to do.

Against the background of those more realistic assumptions, we can be
pleased that despite the obstacles, we have made significant progress.
We can rightly deplore the fact that today, forty years on, animals are
still being mistreated on a vast scale, but we should not despair of
making a positive difference in the lives of animals. In many parts of
the world, including Europe and the United States, there has been a huge
shift in attitudes toward animals. The powerful animal advocacy movement
I hoped would emerge does exist, and thanks to undercover videos and the
Internet, the information it provides cannot be denied or suppressed.
The animal movement has challenged the huge agribusiness industry with
remarkable success, forcing producers of meat and eggs across the entire
European Union—all twenty-eight member nations—to give hens and pigs and
veal calves more space and conditions better suited to their needs.
Similar changes have now become law in California as well, following an
overwhelming victory for animal advocates in a referendum in 2008.
Admittedly, these changes are still far from giving factory-farmed
animals acceptable lives, but they are a significant improvement on what
was standard practice before the reforms came into effect.

Perhaps even more satisfying is the popularity of becoming vegetarian or
vegan, and the still-larger number who have cut down their meat
consumption, for both ethical and health reasons. In the 1970s, to be a
vegetarian was to be a crank—a thought reflected in the self-mocking
name of what was then London’s best vegetarian restaurant, Cranks. If
you used the term _vegan_, you invariably got a blank look and had to
explain what it meant. Since then, the number of vegetarians and vegans
in the United Kingdom and the United States has risen steadily and
continues to do so. Even in countries like Germany and Austria, where
virtually every main course was based on meat or eggs, vegan foods are
appearing on menus and in supermarkets.

In the United States, something remarkable happened in 2008. For the
whole of the twentieth century, the US had the reputation of being “a
nation of meat eaters.” Consumption of meat kept going up and up, with
just one or two small blips for events like the Great Depression of the
1930s. Beef consumption peaked in the mid-1970s, but a sharp increase in
chicken consumption more than made up for that drop. Then in 2008, total
meat consumption, including that of poultry, fell, and it has fallen
again every year since. No one quite knows why, but probably more people
having at least one meat-free day a week has made a bigger difference
than the increasing number of vegetarians and vegans.

Greater awareness of the huge contribution that the livestock industry
makes to greenhouse-gas emissions—more than that of the entire transport
sector—has led many environmentalists to become vegetarian, vegan, or
“flexitarian” (eating meat only on special occasions). The demand for
plant-based products that imitate meat—or that, in the case of attempts
to cultivate bovine cells in vitro, really _are_ meat, although they
have never been part of a living, sentient being—is increasing. Whatever
the reason, it is a hopeful sign that we are not inevitably heading for
a future in which more and more animals suffer, more and more grain and
soybeans are wasted, and more and more greenhouse gases from livestock
production accelerate the rate at which our planet is warming.

Despite all this, it is probably still true that there are more animals
suffering at the hands of humans now than ever before. That is because
there are more affluent people in the world than ever before, and
satisfying their demand for meat has meant a vast expansion of factory
farming, especially in China. But to see this as an indication that
animal advocates have made no progress would be like saying that because
there are more slaves in the world now than there were in 1800, the
antislavery movement has achieved nothing. With the world’s population
now more than seven times what it was in 1800, numbers do not tell the
whole story.

There will always be periods in which the animal movement seems to be
struggling to hold its own, or even going backward. But there can be no
doubt that attitudes about animals are completely different from what
they were forty years ago. Just as I was drafting this introduction, the
front page of the _New York Times_ carried a long article headlined
“U.S. Research Lab Lets Livestock Suffer in Quest for Profit.” The
article reported the results of a long investigation by a _Times_
journalist into the U.S. Meat Animal Research Center in southern
Nebraska.¹ At the time of writing this preface, a bipartisan group of
congressional representatives had said that they would move legislation
to bring government institutions like the Meat Animal Research Center
under the Animal Welfare Act, which already regulates experiments by
nongovernment institutions.²

The experiments described in the _Times_ article obviously caused great
suffering to many animals, but many of the experiments I describe in
chapter two caused even more suffering, were also taxpayer funded, and
could not plausibly be claimed to have had a more important scientific
justification or to be likely to lead to a greater benefit than those
carried out at the Meat Animal Research Center. Yet when those
experiments were going on, major newspapers did not report anything
about them, let alone send reporters to investigate and put the story on
the front page. What we did to animals, it seemed, didn’t really matter.
Now it does. That’s an important step forward, and a sign that over the
next forty years we may see even bigger changes in the ways we treat
animals.

Peter Singer

February 2015

1 Michael Moss, “U.S. Research Lab Lets Livestock Suffer in Quest for
Profit,” _New York Times_, January 19, 2015.

2 Michael Moss, “Lawmakers Aim to Protect Animals in U.S. Research,”
_New York Times_, February 5, 2015.

Preface to the 2009 Edition

In 2008, tens of millions of Americans watched with horror and disbelief
when they saw on their evening news an undercover video of cattle too
sick to walk being kicked, shocked with electric prods, jabbed in the
eye with a baton, and pushed around with a forklift, all so that they
could be driven near enough to the “kill box” to be slaughtered and
processed into meat. The video was taken at the Westland/Hallmark
slaughterhouse, in Chino, California—a large, supposedly
state-of-the-art operation and a major supplier to the National School
Lunch Program, located not in a rural backwater but just thirty miles
from the heart of Los Angeles. Because eating meat from cows that cannot
walk is a health hazard, the video led to the largest meat recall in the
history of the United States.

The revelations provided dramatic confirmation of the thesis of this
book. After pleading guilty to charges of animal cruelty, Daniel Ugarte
Navarro, the pen manager shown giving sick cows electric shocks in the
face, beating them, and using a forklift to move them, said that he had
done nothing wrong and was “just doing his job.” It’s an excuse we have
heard before, but not without a grain of uncomfortable truth. Despicable
as Ugarte’s actions were, there is something more fundamentally wrong
with the ethics, and the law, governing how we treat animals. If people
want to eat sentient creatures and there is competition to provide meat
at the lowest possible price, then the system will reward those who meet
this demand. In that sense, Ugarte _was_ just doing his job. But for the
“bad luck”—for him and for Westland/Hallmark—that an investigator from
the Humane Society of the United States was secretly filming his
actions, Ugarte would have continued effectively maximizing the profits
of his employer.

The widespread revulsion evoked by this and other undercover videos of
animal abuse suggests that it is ignorance, rather than indifference to
animals, that keeps massive, institutional cruelty to animals in place
in the U.S. Now that the media are taking animal issues more seriously,
this ignorance is starting to break down. But it has been a long
struggle to get to this point. Since this book was first published, in
1975, the hard work of countless animal activists has paid off, not only
in greater public awareness of animal abuse, but also in concrete
benefits for animals. In the 1980s, under pressure from the animal
movement, cosmetics corporations began putting money into finding
alternatives to testing on animals. The development of product testing
methods not involving animals now has a momentum of its own in the
scientific community and is partly responsible for holding down the
number of animals used. Despite “fur is back” claims by the industry,
fur sales have still not recovered to the level they were at in the
1980s, when the animal movement began to target it. Companion animal
owners have become better educated and more responsible, and the number
of unwanted and stray animals killed in shelters and pounds, though
still far too high, is down dramatically.

The vast majority of animals abused by humans, however, are farm
animals. Whereas the number of animals used in research in the United
States is, at about twenty-five million, roughly equal to the population
of Texas, the number of birds and mammals killed for food each
year—again, in the U.S. alone—is around ten billion, or one and a half
times the population of the world. (That number does not include fish or
other aquatic animals.) Since most of these animals are raised in
factory farms, their suffering lasts their entire lives.

The first breakthrough for farm animals came in Europe. In Switzerland,
the battery cage system of producing eggs described in Chapter 3 became
illegal at the end of 1991. Instead of cramming their hens into small
wire cages too small for the birds to spread their wings, Swiss egg
producers moved the birds to sheds where they could scratch on a floor
covered with straw or other organic material and lay their eggs in a
sheltered, soft-floored nesting box. Once the Swiss had shown that
change is possible, opposition to battery cages mounted throughout
Europe, and the European Union, covering twenty-seven member states and
almost 500 million people, has now agreed to phase out the standard bare
wire cage by 2012, giving hens more room, access to a perch, and a
nesting box to lay their eggs in.

Further steps followed, all with widespread public support and the
backing of the European Union’s leading scientific and veterinary
experts. As the following pages show, intensively raised veal calves,
deliberately kept anemic, deprived of straw for bedding, and confined in
individual crates so narrow that they cannot even turn around, are among
the most miserable of all farm animals. That system of keeping calves
had already been banned in Britain when I revised the text of this book
for the 1990 edition (which remains the text that follows this preface).
Today, veal crates are banned, not just in Britain, but throughout the
European Union. Matters have also improved for the pig industry’s
breeder sows. Confining pregnant sows in individual crates was banned in
Britain in 1998, and will be prohibited in Europe from 2013, except
during the first four weeks of the sow’s pregnancy.

When Europe was debating and legislating these changes, there seemed no
prospect of any similar laws getting through the U.S. Congress, or
indeed anywhere else in the U.S. The first sign of change was a 2002
initiative by animal welfare groups that put a proposition on the ballot
in Florida to ban crates for pregnant sows. Florida is far from the most
progressive state in the country for animal welfare issues, but the
proposal passed with a clear majority. Four years later, the same issue
came up in Arizona, where a ban on veal crates was added to the proposal
as well. Again, the voters approved the measure by a solid margin.

The Arizona result sent a signal to producers. Just one month later, the
two largest producers of veal in the U.S. promised to get rid of veal
crates within two to three years. Then the largest pig producers in the
U.S. and Canada announced that they would, over the next ten years,
phase out sow crates. Explaining this move, the U.S. producer,
Smithfield, mentioned the views of its customers, of whom McDonald’s is
among the largest. McDonald’s, which welcomed the decision, had for many
years been in discussion with animal activists about reducing the
suffering of the animals from which its products come. Other big pork
producers soon followed. In 2007, Oregon became the first state to
legislate to ban sow crates rather than have the issue put to a popular
vote, and the following year, Colorado legislated to ban both sow and
veal crates. After decades of resisting criticism of individual crates
for veal calves, the American Veal Association resolved to recommend
that its members convert to more welfare-friendly group housing by 2017.

Many notable U.S. chefs, food retailers, and caterers are likewise
moving away from the worst forms of animal confinement. Wolfgang Puck is
ending his use of pork from sows kept in crates, as well as his use of
eggs from caged hens. Major chains including Burger King, Hardee’s, and
Carl’s Jr. have started buying pork and eggs from producers who avoid
sow crates and battery cages. Hundreds of campuses across the United
States are now avoiding eggs from hens kept in cages, and in 2007
Compass Group, the world’s largest food service provider, announced that
in the future all its whole eggs would come from producers who do not
use cages.

The most significant victory of all, however, came on November 4, 2008,
a day that is memorable not only for the election of Senator Barack
Obama as the first African American president of the United States but
also because Californians approved, by a whopping 63-37 margin, a ballot
initiative giving all farm animals in their state the room to stretch
their limbs and turn around without touching other animals or the sides
of their enclosures. In 2015, not only veal and sow crates but also the
standard battery cage will become illegal in California, and nineteen
million hens will have more room to walk around and stretch their wings.
The egg industry poured $9 million into fighting the initiative, but
found itself matched by a coalition of animal organizations, led by the
Humane Society of the United States, the largest animal welfare
organization in the nation, and one which under the presidency of Wayne
Pacelle has turned its attention to farm animals with remarkable
success.

The Californian ballot, following on those in Florida and Arizona, shows
that when Americans are given the chance, they will reject the standard
farming practices that provide them with their pork, veal, and eggs.
With public opinion solidly behind them, the American animal movement is
on the brink of transforming the conditions way in which hundreds of
millions of farm animals are kept.

All these changes are a vindication of what has been said by animal
advocates for a very long time. In 1971, when I organized a tiny
demonstration against factory farming, it seemed as if we were taking on
a giant industry that steamrolled all opposition. Fortunately, ideas and
compassion have proved powerful enough to change systems in which
hundreds of millions of animals live and die.

The position defended in this book goes far beyond these improvements in
the welfare of farm animals, significant as they are. We need a much
more fundamental change in the way we think about animals. The first
sign that even this could happen came in 2008 in the form of a historic
vote by a committee of the Spanish parliament that declared an animal
could be granted the legal status of a person with rights. The motion
took the form of support for the Great Ape Project, an organization that
seeks basic rights—to life, liberty, and protection from torture—for our
closest nonhuman relatives: chimpanzees, bonobos, gorillas, and
orangutans. The resolution directs the Spanish government to promote a
similar declaration at the level of the European Union. It also calls on
the government to adopt, within a year, legislation to prohibit
potentially harmful experiments on great apes. Keeping great apes in
captivity will be allowed only for purposes of conservation, and then
under conditions strictly regulated to provide the best possible
conditions for the apes. Additionally, the resolution recommends that
Spain take steps in international forums and organizations to ensure
that great apes are protected from maltreatment, slavery, torture, and
being killed.

In contrast to changes in the conditions in which farm animals are kept,
the Spanish resolution is significant, not because of the numbers of
animals it directly affects, but because it breaks down the previously
insurmountable barrier we have erected between ourselves, as beings with
rights and dignity, and nonhuman animals, as mere things. When we look
at our closest nonhuman relatives, as researchers like Jane Goodall and
Dian Fossey have helped us do, we see that the differences between us
and nonhuman animals are, in important respects, matters of degree, not
of kind. The Spanish resolution marks the first official acceptance of
the moral and legal implications of recognizing the similarities between
us and at least some nonhuman animals. Most remarkable, perhaps, is the
use of the term “slavery” in respect of something that it is wrong to
inflict upon animals, for until now it has been assumed that animals are
_rightly_ our slaves, to use as we wish, whether to pull our carts,
model human diseases for research, or give up their eggs, milk, or flesh
for us to eat. Recognition by a national parliament that it can be wrong
to enslave animals is a significant step toward animal liberation.

Peter Singer

New York, November 2008

Preface to the 1975 Edition

This book is about the tyranny of human over nonhuman animals. This
tyranny has caused and today is still causing an amount of pain and
suffering that can only be compared with that which resulted from the
centuries of tyranny by white humans over black humans. The struggle
against this tyranny is a struggle as important as any of the moral and
social issues that have been fought over in recent years.

Most readers will take what they have just read to be a wild
exaggeration. Five years ago I myself would have laughed at the
statements I have now written in complete seriousness. Five years ago I
did not know what I know today. If you read this book carefully, paying
special attention to the second and third chapters, you will then know
as much of what I know about the oppression of animals as it is possible
to get into a book of reasonable length. Then you will be able to judge
if my opening paragraph is a wild exaggeration or a sober estimate of a
situation largely unknown to the general public. So I do not ask you to
believe my opening paragraph now. All I ask is that you reserve your
judgment until you have read the book.

Soon after I began work on this book my wife and I were invited to
tea—we were living in England at the time—by a lady who had heard that I
was planning to write about animals. She herself was very interested in
animals, she said, and she had a friend who had already written a book
about animals and would be so keen to meet us.

When we arrived our hostess’s friend was already there, and she
certainly was keen to talk about animals. “I do love animals,” she
began. “I have a dog and two cats, and do you know they get on together
wonderfully well. Do you know Mrs. Scott? She runs a little hospital for
sick pets …” and she was off. She paused while refreshments were served,
took a ham sandwich, and then asked us what pets we had.

We told her we didn’t own any pets. She looked a little surprised, and
took a bite of her sandwich. Our hostess, who had now finished serving
the sandwiches, joined us and took up the conversation: “But you _are_
interested in animals, aren’t you, Mr. Singer?”

We tried to explain that we were interested in the prevention of
suffering and misery; that we were opposed to arbitrary discrimination;
that we thought it wrong to inflict needless suffering on another being,
even if that being were not a member of our own species; and that we
believed animals were ruthlessly and cruelly exploited by humans, and we
wanted this changed. Otherwise, we said, we were not especially
“interested in” animals. Neither of us had ever been inordinately fond
of dogs, cats, or horses in the way that many people are. We didn’t
“love” animals. We simply wanted them treated as the independent
sentient beings that they are, and not as a means to human ends—as the
pig whose flesh was now in our hostess’s sandwiches had been treated.

This book is not about pets. It is not likely to be comfortable reading
for those who think that love for animals involves no more than stroking
a cat or feeding birds in the garden. It is intended rather for people
who are concerned about ending oppression and exploitation wherever they
occur, and in seeing that the basic moral principle of equal
consideration of interests is not arbitrarily restricted to members of
our own species. The assumption that in order to be interested in such
matters one must be an “animal-lover” is itself an indication of the
absence of the slightest inkling that the moral standards that we apply
among human beings might extend to other animals. No one, except a
racist concerned to smear his opponents as “nigger-lovers,” would
suggest that in order to be concerned about equality for mistreated
racial minorities you have to love those minorities, or regard them as
cute and cuddly. So why make this assumption about people who work for
improvements in the conditions of animals?

The portrayal of those who protest against cruelty to animals as
sentimental, emotional “animal-lovers” has had the effect of excluding
the entire issue of our treatment of nonhumans from serious political
and moral discussion. It is easy to see why we do this. If we did give
the issue serious consideration, if, for instance, we looked closely at
the conditions in which animals live in the modern “factory farms” that
produce our meat, we might be made uncomfortable about ham sandwiches,
roast beef, fried chicken, and all those other items in our diet that we
prefer not to think of as dead animals.

This book makes no sentimental appeals for sympathy toward “cute”
animals. I am no more outraged by the slaughter of horses or dogs for
meat than I am by the slaughter of pigs for this purpose. When the
United States Defense Department finds that its use of beagles to test
lethal gases has evoked a howl of protest and offers to use rats
instead, I am not appeased.

This book is an attempt to think through, carefully and consistently,
the question of how we ought to treat nonhuman animals. In the process
it exposes the prejudices that lie behind our present attitudes and
behavior. In the chapters that describe what these attitudes mean in
practical terms—how animals suffer from the tyranny of human
beings—there are passages that will arouse some emotions. These will, I
hope, be emotions of anger and outrage, coupled with a determination to
do something about the practices described. Nowhere in this book,
however, do I appeal to the reader’s emotions where they cannot be
supported by reason. When there are unpleasant things to be described it
would be dishonest to try to describe them in some neutral way that hid
their real unpleasantness. You cannot write objectively about the
experiments of the Nazi concentration camp “doctors” on those they
considered “subhuman” without stirring emotions; and the same is true of
a description of some of the experiments performed today on nonhumans in
laboratories in America, Britain, and elsewhere. The ultimate
justification for opposition to both these kinds of experiments, though,
is not emotional. It is an appeal to basic moral principles which we all
accept, and the application of these principles to the victims of both
kinds of experiment is demanded by reason, not emotion.

The title of this book has a serious point behind it. A liberation
movement is a demand for an end to prejudice and discrimination based on
an arbitrary characteristic like race or sex. The classic instance is
the Black Liberation movement. The immediate appeal of this movement,
and its initial, if limited, success, made it a model for other
oppressed groups. We soon became familiar with Gay Liberation and
movements on behalf of American Indians and Spanish-speaking Americans.
When a majority group—women—began their campaign some thought we had
come to the end of the road. Discrimination on the basis of sex, it was
said, was the last form of discrimination to be universally accepted and
practiced without secrecy or pretense, even in those liberal circles
that have long prided themselves on their freedom from prejudice against
racial minorities.

We should always be wary of talking of “the last remaining form of
discrimination.” If we have learned anything from the liberation
movements we should have learned how difficult it is to be aware of
latent prejudices in our attitudes to particular groups until these
prejudices are forcefully pointed out to us.

A liberation movement demands an expansion of our moral horizons.
Practices that were previously regarded as natural and inevitable come
to be seen as the result of an unjustifiable prejudice. Who can say with
any confidence that none of his or her attitudes and practices can
legitimately be questioned? If we wish to avoid being numbered among the
oppressors, we must be prepared to rethink all our attitudes to other
groups, including the most fundamental of them. We need to consider our
attitudes from the point of view of those who suffer by them, and by the
practices that follow from them. If we can make this unaccustomed mental
switch we may discover a pattern in our attitudes and practices that
operates so as consistently to benefit the same group—usually the group
to which we ourselves belong—at the expense of another group. So we come
to see that there is a case for a new liberation movement.

The aim of this book is to lead you to make this mental switch in your
attitudes and practices toward a very large group of beings: members of
species other than our own. I believe that our present attitudes to
these beings are based on a long history of prejudice and arbitrary
discrimination. I argue that there can be no reason—except the selfish
desire to preserve the privileges of the exploiting group—for refusing
to extend the basic principle of equality of consideration to members of
other species. I ask you to recognize that your attitudes to members of
other species are a form of prejudice no less objectionable than
prejudice about a person’s race or sex.

In comparison with other liberation movements, Animal Liberation has a
lot of handicaps. First and most obvious is the fact that members of the
exploited group cannot themselves make an organized protest against the
treatment they receive (though they can and do protest to the best of
their abilities individually). We have to speak up on behalf of those
who cannot speak for themselves. You can appreciate how serious this
handicap is by asking yourself how long blacks would have had to wait
for equal rights if they had not been able to stand up for themselves
and demand it. The less able a group is to stand up and organize against
oppression, the more easily it is oppressed.

More significant still for the prospects of the Animal Liberation
movement is the fact that almost all of the oppressing group are
directly involved in, and see themselves as benefiting from, the
oppression. There are few humans indeed who can view the oppression of
animals with the detachment possessed, say, by Northern whites debating
the institution of slavery in the Southern states of the Union. People
who eat pieces of slaughtered nonhumans every day find it hard to
believe that they are doing wrong; and they also find it hard to imagine
what else they could eat. On this issue, anyone who eats meat is an
interested party. They benefit—or at least they think they benefit—from
the present disregard of the interests of nonhuman animals. This makes
persuasion more difficult. How many Southern slaveholders were persuaded
by the arguments used by the Northern abolitionists, and accepted by
nearly all of us today? Some, but not many. I can and do ask you to put
aside your interest in eating meat when considering the arguments of
this book; but I know from my own experience that with the best will in
the world this is not an easy thing to do. For behind the mere momentary
desire to eat meat on a particular occasion lie many years of habitual
meat-eating which have conditioned our attitudes to animals.

Habit. That is the final barrier that the Animal Liberation movement
faces. Habits not only of diet but also of thought and language must be
challenged and altered. Habits of thought lead us to brush aside
descriptions of cruelty to animals as emotional, for “animal-lovers
only”; or if not that, then anyway the problem is so trivial in
comparison to the problems of human beings that no sensible person could
give it time and attention. This too is a prejudice—for how can one know
that a problem is trivial until one has taken the time to examine its
extent? Although in order to allow a more thorough treatment this book
deals with only two of the many areas in which humans cause other
animals to suffer, I do not think anyone who reads it to the end will
ever again think that the only problems that merit time and energy are
problems concerning humans.

The habits of thought that lead us to disregard the interests of animals
can be challenged, as they are challenged in the following pages. This
challenge has to be expressed in a language, which in this case happens
to be English. The English language, like other languages, reflects the
prejudices of its users. So authors who wish to challenge these
prejudices are in a well-known type of bind: either they use language
that reinforces the very prejudices they wish to challenge, or else they
fail to communicate with their audience. This book has already been
forced along the former of these paths. We commonly use the word
“animal” to mean “animals other than human beings.” This usage sets
humans apart from other animals, implying that we are not ourselves
animals—an implication that everyone who has had elementary lessons in
biology knows to be false.

In the popular mind the term “animal” lumps together beings as different
as oysters and chimpanzees, while placing a gulf between chimpanzees and
humans, although our relationship to those apes is much closer than the
oyster’s. Since there exists no other short term for the nonhuman
animals, I have, in the title of this book and elsewhere in these pages,
had to use “animal” as if it did not include the human animal. This is a
regrettable lapse from the standards of revolutionary purity but it
seems necessary for effective communication. Occasionally, however, to
remind you that this is a matter of convenience only, I shall use
longer, more accurate modes of referring to what was once called “the
brute creation.” In other cases, too, I have tried to avoid language
which tends to degrade animals or disguise the nature of the food we
eat.

The basic principles of Animal Liberation are very simple. I have tried
to write a book that is clear and easy to understand, requiring no
expertise of any kind. It is necessary, however, to begin with a
discussion of the principles that underlie what I have to say. While
there should be nothing here that is difficult, readers unused to this
kind of discussion might find the first chapter rather abstract. Don’t
be put off. In the next chapters we get down to the little-known details
of how our species oppresses others under our control. There is nothing
abstract about this oppression, or about the chapters that describe it.

If the recommendations made in the following chapters are accepted,
millions of animals will be spared considerable pain. Moreover, millions
of humans will benefit too. As I write, people are starving to death in
many parts of the world; and many more are in imminent danger of
starvation. The United States government has said that because of poor
harvests and diminished stocks of grain it can provide only limited—and
inadequate—assistance; but as Chapter 4 of this book makes clear, the
heavy emphasis in affluent nations on rearing animals for food wastes
several times as much food as it produces. By ceasing to rear and kill
animals for food, we can make so much extra food available for humans
that, properly distributed, it would eliminate starvation and
malnutrition from this planet. Animal Liberation is Human Liberation
too.

_Chapter 1_

All Animals Are Equal …

_or why the ethical principle on which human equality rests requires us
to extend equal consideration to animals too_

“Animal Liberation” may sound more like a parody of other liberation
movements than a serious objective. The idea of “The Rights of Animals”
actually was once used to parody the case for women’s rights. When Mary
Wollstonecraft, a forerunner of today’s feminists, published her
_Vindication of the Rights of Woman_ in 1792, her views were widely
regarded as absurd, and before long an anonymous publication appeared
entitled _A Vindication of the Rights of Brutes_. The author of this
satirical work (now known to have been Thomas Taylor, a distinguished
Cambridge philosopher) tried to refute Mary Wollstonecraft’s arguments
by showing that they could be carried one stage further. If the argument
for equality was sound when applied to women, why should it not be
applied to dogs, cats, and horses? The reasoning seemed to hold for
these “brutes” too; yet to hold that brutes had rights was manifestly
absurd. Therefore the reasoning by which this conclusion had been
reached must be unsound, and if unsound when applied to brutes, it must
also be unsound when applied to women, since the very same arguments had
been used in each case.

In order to explain the basis of the case for the equality of animals,
it will be helpful to start with an examination of the case for the
equality of women. Let us assume that we wish to defend the case for
women’s rights against the attack by Thomas Taylor. How should we reply?

One way in which we might reply is by saying that the case for equality
between men and women cannot validly be extended to nonhuman animals.
Women have a right to vote, for instance, because they are just as
capable of making rational decisions about the future as men are; dogs,
on the other hand, are incapable of understanding the significance of
voting, so they cannot have the right to vote. There are many other
obvious ways in which men and women resemble each other closely, while
humans and animals differ greatly. So, it might be said, men and women
are similar beings and should have similar rights, while humans and
nonhumans are different and should not have equal rights.

The reasoning behind this reply to Taylor’s analogy is correct up to a
point but it does not go far enough. There are obviously important
differences between humans and other animals, and these differences must
give rise to some differences in the rights that each have. Recognizing
this evident fact, however, is no barrier to the case for extending the
basic principle of equality to nonhuman animals. The differences that
exist between men and women are equally undeniable, and the supporters
of Women’s Liberation are aware that these differences may give rise to
different rights. Many feminists hold that women have the right to an
abortion on request. It does not follow that since these same feminists
are campaigning for equality between men and women they must support the
right of men to have abortions too. Since a man cannot have an abortion,
it is meaningless to talk of his right to have one. Since dogs can’t
vote, it is meaningless to talk of their right to vote. There is no
reason why either Women’s Liberation or Animal Liberation should get
involved in such nonsense. The extension of the basic principle of
equality from one group to another does not imply that we must treat
both groups in exactly the same way, or grant exactly the same rights to
both groups. Whether we should do so will depend on the nature of the
members of the two groups. The basic principle of equality does not
require equal or identical _treatment_; it requires equal consideration.
Equal consideration for different beings may lead to different treatment
and different rights.

So there is a different way of replying to Taylor’s attempt to parody
the case for women’s rights, a way that does not deny the obvious
differences between human beings and nonhumans but goes more deeply into
the question of equality and concludes by finding nothing absurd in the
idea that the basic principle of equality applies to so-called brutes.
At this point such a conclusion may appear odd; but if we examine more
deeply the basis on which our opposition to discrimination on grounds of
race or sex ultimately rests, we will see that we would be on shaky
ground if we were to demand equality for blacks, women, and other groups
of oppressed humans while denying equal consideration to nonhumans. To
make this clear we need to see, first, exactly why racism and sexism are
wrong. When we say that all human beings, whatever their race, creed, or
sex, are equal, what is it that we are asserting? Those who wish to
defend hierarchical, inegalitarian societies have often pointed out that
by whatever test we choose it simply is not true that all humans are
equal. Like it or not we must face the fact that humans come in
different shapes and sizes; they come with different moral capacities,
different intellectual abilities, different amounts of benevolent
feeling and sensitivity to the needs of others, different abilities to
communicate effectively, and different capacities to experience pleasure
and pain. In short, if the demand for equality were based on the actual
equality of all human beings, we would have to stop demanding equality.

Still, one might cling to the view that the demand for equality among
human beings is based on the actual equality of the different races and
sexes. Although, it may be said, humans differ as individuals, there are
no differences between the races and sexes as such. From the mere fact
that a person is black or a woman we cannot infer anything about that
person’s intellectual or moral capacities. This, it may be said, is why
racism and sexism are wrong. The white racist claims that whites are
superior to blacks, but this is false; although there are differences
among individuals, some blacks are superior to some whites in all of the
capacities and abilities that could conceivably be relevant. The
opponent of sexism would say the same: a person’s sex is no guide to his
or her abilities, and this is why it is unjustifiable to discriminate on
the basis of sex.

The existence of individual variations that cut across the lines of race
or sex, however, provides us with no defense at all against a more
sophisticated opponent of equality, one who proposes that, say, the
interests of all those with IQ scores below 100 be given less
consideration than the interests of those with ratings over 100. Perhaps
those scoring below the mark would, in this society, be made the slaves
of those scoring higher. Would a hierarchical society of this sort
really be so much better than one based on race or sex? I think not. But
if we tie the moral principle of equality to the factual equality of the
different races or sexes, taken as a whole, our opposition to racism and
sexism does not provide us with any basis for objecting to this kind of
inegalitarianism.

There is a second important reason why we ought not to base our
opposition to racism and sexism on any kind of factual equality, even
the limited kind that asserts that variations in capacities and
abilities are spread evenly among the different races and between the
sexes: we can have no absolute guarantee that these capacities and
abilities really are distributed evenly, without regard to race or sex,
among human beings. So far as actual abilities are concerned there do
seem to be certain measurable differences both among races and between
sexes. These differences do not, of course, appear in every case, but
only when averages are taken. More important still, we do not yet know
how many of these differences are really due to the different genetic
endowments of the different races and sexes, and how many are due to
poor schools, poor housing, and other factors that are the result of
past and continuing discrimination. Perhaps all of the important
differences will eventually prove to be environmental rather than
genetic. Anyone opposed to racism and sexism will certainly hope that
this will be so, for it will make the task of ending discrimination a
lot easier; nevertheless, it would be dangerous to rest the case against
racism and sexism on the belief that all significant differences are
environmental in origin. The opponent of, say, racism who takes this
line will be unable to avoid conceding that if differences in ability
did after all prove to have some genetic connection with race, racism
would in some way be defensible.

Fortunately there is no need to pin the case for equality to one
particular outcome of a scientific investigation. The appropriate
response to those who claim to have found evidence of genetically based
differences in ability among the races or between the sexes is not to
stick to the belief that the genetic explanation must be wrong, whatever
evidence to the contrary may turn up; instead we should make it quite
clear that the claim to equality does not depend on intelligence, moral
capacity, physical strength, or similar matters of fact. Equality is a
moral idea, not an assertion of fact. There is no logically compelling
reason for assuming that a factual difference in ability between two
people justifies any difference in the amount of consideration we give
to their needs and interests. _The principle of the equality of human
beings is not a description of an alleged actual equality among humans:
it is a prescription of how we should treat human beings_.

Jeremy Bentham, the founder of the reforming utilitarian school of moral
philosophy, incorporated the essential basis of moral equality into his
system of ethics by means of the formula: “Each to count for one and
none for more than one.” In other words, the interests of every being
affected by an action are to be taken into account and given the same
weight as the like interests of any other being. A later utilitarian,
Henry Sidgwick, put the point in this way: “The good of any one
individual is of no more importance, from the point of view (if I may
say so) of the Universe, than the good of any other.” More recently the
leading figures in contemporary moral philosophy have shown a great deal
of agreement in specifying as a fundamental presupposition of their
moral theories some similar requirement that works to give everyone’s
interests equal consideration—although these writers generally cannot
agree on how this requirement is best formulated.¹

It is an implication of this principle of equality that our concern for
others and our readiness to consider their interests ought not to depend
on what they are like or on what abilities they may possess. Precisely
what our concern or consideration requires us to do may vary according
to the characteristics of those affected by what we do: concern for the
well-being of children growing up in America would require that we teach
them to read; concern for the well-being of pigs may require no more
than that we leave them with other pigs in a place where there is
adequate food and room to run freely. But the basic element—the taking
into account of the interests of the being, whatever those interests may
be—must, according to the principle of equality, be extended to all
beings, black or white, masculine or feminine, human or nonhuman.

Thomas Jefferson, who was responsible for writing the principle of the
equality of men into the American Declaration of Independence, saw this
point. It led him to oppose slavery even though he was unable to free
himself fully from his slaveholding background. He wrote in a letter to
the author of a book that emphasized the notable intellectual
achievements of Negroes in order to refute the then common view that
they had limited intellectual capacities:

Be assured that no person living wishes more sincerely than I do, to see
a complete refutation of the doubts I myself have entertained and
expressed on the grade of understanding allotted to them by nature, and
to find that they are on a par with ourselves … but whatever be their
degree of talent it is no measure of their rights. Because Sir Isaac
Newton was superior to others in understanding, he was not therefore
lord of the property or persons of others.²

Similarly, when in the 1850s the call for women’s rights was raised in
the United States, a remarkable black feminist named Sojourner Truth
made the same point in more robust terms at a feminist convention:

They talk about this thing in the head; what do they call it?
[“Intellect,” whispered someone nearby.] That’s it. What’s that got to
do with women’s rights or Negroes’ rights? If my cup won’t hold but a
pint and yours holds a quart, wouldn’t you be mean not to let me have my
little half-measure full?³

It is on this basis that the case against racism and the case against
sexism must both ultimately rest; and it is in accordance with this
principle that the attitude that we may call “speciesism,” by analogy
with racism, must also be condemned. Speciesism—the word is not an
attractive one, but I can think of no better term—is a prejudice or
attitude of bias in favor of the interests of members of one’s own
species and against those of members of other species. It should be
obvious that the fundamental objections to racism and sexism made by
Thomas Jefferson and Sojourner Truth apply equally to speciesism. If
possessing a higher degree of intelligence does not entitle one human to
use another for his or her own ends, how can it entitle humans to
exploit nonhumans for the same purpose?⁴

Many philosophers and other writers have proposed the principle of equal
consideration of interests, in some form or other, as a basic moral
principle; but not many of them have recognized that this principle
applies to members of other species as well as to our own. Jeremy
Bentham was one of the few who did realize this. In a forward-looking
passage written at a time when black slaves had been freed by the French
but in the British dominions were still being treated in the way we now
treat animals, Bentham wrote:

The day _may_ come when the rest of the animal creation may acquire
those rights which never could have been withholden from them but by the
hand of tyranny. The French have already discovered that the blackness
of the skin is no reason why a human being should be abandoned without
redress to the caprice of a tormentor. It may one day come to be
recognized that the number of the legs, the villosity of the skin, or
the termination of the _os sacrum_ are reasons equally insufficient for
abandoning a sensitive being to the same fate. What else is it that
should trace the insuperable line? Is it the faculty of reason, or
perhaps the faculty of discourse? But a full-grown horse or dog is
beyond comparison a more rational, as well as a more conversable animal,
than an infant of a day or a week or even a month, old. But suppose they
were otherwise, what would it avail? The question is not, Can they
_reason_? nor Can they _talk_? but, Can they _suffer_?⁵

In this passage Bentham points to the capacity for suffering as the
vital characteristic that gives a being the right to equal
consideration. The capacity for suffering—or more strictly, for
suffering and/or enjoyment or happiness—is not just another
characteristic like the capacity for language or higher mathematics.
Bentham is not saying that those who try to mark “the insuperable line”
that determines whether the interests of a being should be considered
happen to have chosen the wrong characteristic. By saying that we must
consider the interests of all beings with the capacity for suffering or
enjoyment Bentham does not arbitrarily exclude from consideration any
interests at all—as those who draw the line with reference to the
possession of reason or language do. The capacity for suffering and
enjoyment is _a prerequisite for having interests at all_, a condition
that must be satisfied before we can speak of interests in a meaningful
way. It would be nonsense to say that it was not in the interests of a
stone to be kicked along the road by a schoolboy. A stone does not have
interests because it cannot suffer. Nothing that we can do to it could
possibly make any difference to its welfare. The capacity for suffering
and enjoyment is, however, not only necessary, but also sufficient for
us to say that a being has interests—at an absolute minimum, an interest
in not suffering. A mouse, for example, does have an interest in not
being kicked along the road, because it will suffer if it is.

Although Bentham speaks of “rights” in the passage I have quoted, the
argument is really about equality rather than about rights. Indeed, in a
different passage, Bentham famously described “natural rights” as
“nonsense” and “natural and imprescriptable rights” as “nonsense upon
stilts.” He talked of moral rights as a shorthand way of referring to
protections that people and animals morally ought to have; but the real
weight of the moral argument does not rest on the assertion of the
existence of the right, for this in turn has to be justified on the
basis of the possibilities for suffering and happiness. In this way we
can argue for equality for animals without getting embroiled in
philosophical controversies about the ultimate nature of rights.

In misguided attempts to refute the arguments of this book, some
philosophers have gone to much trouble developing arguments to show that
animals do not have rights.⁶ They have claimed that to have rights a
being must be autonomous, or must be a member of a community, or must
have the ability to respect the rights of others, or must possess a
sense of justice. These claims are irrelevant to the case for Animal
Liberation. The language of rights is a convenient political shorthand.
It is even more valuable in the era of thirty-second TV news clips than
it was in Bentham’s day; but in the argument for a radical change in our
attitude to animals, it is in no way necessary.

If a being suffers there can be no moral justification for refusing to
take that suffering into consideration. No matter what the nature of the
being, the principle of equality requires that its suffering be counted
equally with the like suffering—insofar as rough comparisons can be
made—of any other being. If a being is not capable of suffering, or of
experiencing enjoyment or happiness, there is nothing to be taken into
account. So the limit of sentience (using the term as a convenient if
not strictly accurate shorthand for the capacity to suffer and/or
experience enjoyment) is the only defensible boundary of concern for the
interests of others. To mark this boundary by some other characteristic
like intelligence or rationality would be to mark it in an arbitrary
manner. Why not choose some other characteristic, like skin color?

Racists violate the principle of equality by giving greater weight to
the interests of members of their own race when there is a clash between
their interests and the interests of those of another race. Sexists
violate the principle of equality by favoring the interests of their own
sex. Similarly, speciesists allow the interests of their own species to
override the greater interests of members of other species. The pattern
is identical in each case.

Most human beings are speciesists. The following chapters show that
ordinary human beings—not a few exceptionally cruel or heartless humans,
but the overwhelming majority of humans—take an active part in,
acquiesce in, and allow their taxes to pay for practices that require
the sacrifice of the most important interests of members of other
species in order to promote the most trivial interests of our own
species.

There is, however, one general defense of the practices to be described
in the next two chapters that needs to be disposed of before we discuss
the practices themselves. It is a defense which, if true, would allow us
to do anything at all to nonhumans for the slightest reason, or for no
reason at all, without incurring any justifiable reproach. This defense
claims that we are never guilty of neglecting the interests of other
animals for one breathtakingly simple reason: they have no interests.
Nonhuman animals have no interests, according to this view, because they
are not capable of suffering. By this is not meant merely that they are
not capable of suffering in all the ways that human beings are—for
instance, that a calf is not capable of suffering from the knowledge
that it will be killed in six months time. That modest claim is, no
doubt, true; but it does not clear humans of the charge of speciesism,
since it allows that animals may suffer in other ways—for instance, by
being given electric shocks, or being kept in small, cramped cages. The
defense I am about to discuss is the much more sweeping, although
correspondingly less plausible, claim that animals are incapable of
suffering in any way at all; that they are, in fact, unconscious
automata, possessing neither thoughts nor feelings nor a mental life of
any kind.

Although, as we shall see in a later chapter, the view that animals are
automata was proposed by the seventeenth-century French philosopher René
Descartes, to most people, then and now, it is obvious that if, for
example, we stick a sharp knife into the stomach of an unanesthetized
dog, the dog will feel pain. That this is so is assumed by the laws in
most civilized countries that prohibit wanton cruelty to animals.
Readers whose common sense tells them that animals do suffer may prefer
to skip the remainder of this section, moving straight on to page 15,
since the pages in between do nothing but refute a position that they do
not hold. Implausible as it is, though, for the sake of completeness
this skeptical position must be discussed.

Do animals other than humans feel pain? How do we know? Well, how do we
know if anyone, human or nonhuman, feels pain? We know that we ourselves
can feel pain. We know this from the direct experience of pain that we
have when, for instance, somebody presses a lighted cigarette against
the back of our hand. But how do we know that anyone else feels pain? We
cannot directly experience anyone else’s pain, whether that “anyone” is
our best friend or a stray dog. Pain is a state of consciousness, a
“mental event,” and as such it can never be observed. Behavior like
writhing, screaming, or drawing one’s hand away from the lighted
cigarette is not pain itself; nor are the recordings a neurologist might
make of activity within the brain observations of pain itself. Pain is
something that we feel, and we can only infer that others are feeling it
from various external indications.

In theory, we _could_ always be mistaken when we assume that other human
beings feel pain. It is conceivable that one of our close friends is
really a cleverly constructed robot, controlled by a brilliant scientist
so as to give all the signs of feeling pain, but really no more
sensitive than any other machine. We can never know, with absolute
certainty, that this is not the case. But while this might present a
puzzle for philosophers, none of us has the slightest real doubt that
our close friends feel pain just as we do. This is an inference, but a
perfectly reasonable one, based on observations of their behavior in
situations in which we would feel pain, and on the fact that we have
every reason to assume that our friends are beings like us, with nervous
systems like ours that can be assumed to function as ours do and to
produce similar feelings in similar circumstances.

If it is justifiable to assume that other human beings feel pain as we
do, is there any reason why a similar inference should be unjustifiable
in the case of other animals?

Nearly all the external signs that lead us to infer pain in other humans
can be seen in other species, especially the species most closely
related to us—the species of mammals and birds. The behavioral signs
include writhing, facial contortions, moaning, yelping or other forms of
calling, attempts to avoid the source of pain, appearance of fear at the
prospect of its repetition, and so on. In addition, we know that these
animals have nervous systems very like ours, which respond
physiologically as ours do when the animal is in circumstances in which
we would feel pain: an initial rise of blood pressure, dilated pupils,
perspiration, an increased pulse rate, and, if the stimulus continues, a
fall in blood pressure. Although human beings have a more developed
cerebral cortex than other animals, this part of the brain is concerned
with thinking functions rather than with basic impulses, emotions, and
feelings. These impulses, emotions, and feelings are located in the
diencephalon, which is well developed in many other species of animals,
especially mammals and birds.⁷

We also know that the nervous systems of other animals were not
artificially constructed—as a robot might be artificially constructed—to
mimic the pain behavior of humans. The nervous systems of animals
evolved as our own did, and in fact the evolutionary history of human
beings and other animals, especially mammals, did not diverge until the
central features of our nervous systems were already in existence. A
capacity to feel pain obviously enhances a species’ prospects of
survival, since it causes members of the species to avoid sources of
injury. It is surely unreasonable to suppose that nervous systems that
are virtually identical physiologically, have a common origin and a
common evolutionary function, and result in similar forms of behavior in
similar circumstances should actually operate in an entirely different
manner on the level of subjective feelings.

It has long been accepted as sound policy in science to search for the
simplest possible explanation of whatever it is we are trying to
explain. Occasionally it has been claimed that it is for this reason
“unscientific” to explain the behavior of animals by theories that refer
to the animal’s conscious feelings, desires, and so on—the idea being
that if the behavior in question can be explained without invoking
consciousness or feelings, that will be the simpler theory. Yet we can
now see that such explanations, when assessed with respect to the actual
behavior of both human and nonhuman animals, are actually far more
complex than rival explanations. For we know from our own experience
that explanations of our own behavior that did not refer to
consciousness and the feeling of pain would be incomplete; and it is
simpler to assume that the similar behavior of animals with similar
nervous systems is to be explained in the same way than to try to invent
some other explanation for the behavior of nonhuman animals as well as
an explanation for the divergence between humans and nonhumans in this
respect.

The overwhelming majority of scientists who have addressed themselves to
this question agree. Lord Brain, one of the most eminent neurologists of
our time, has said:

I personally can see no reason for conceding mind to my fellow men and
denying it to animals.… I at least cannot doubt that the interests and
activities of animals are correlated with awareness and feeling in the
same way as my own, and which may be, for aught I know, just as vivid.⁸

The author of a book on pain writes:

Every particle of factual evidence supports the contention that the
higher mammalian vertebrates experience pain sensations at least as
acute as our own. To say that they feel less because they are lower
animals is an absurdity; it can easily be shown that many of their
senses are far more acute than ours—visual acuity in certain birds,
hearing in most wild animals, and touch in others; these animals depend
more than we do today on the sharpest possible awareness of a hostile
environment. Apart from the complexity of the cerebral cortex (which
does not directly perceive pain) their nervous systems are almost
identical to ours and their reactions to pain remarkably similar, though
lacking (so far as we know) the philosophical and moral overtones. The
emotional element is all too evident, mainly in the form of fear and
anger.⁹

In Britain, three separate expert government committees on matters
relating to animals have accepted the conclusion that animals feel pain.
After noting the obvious behavioral evidence for this view, the members
of the Committee on Cruelty to Wild Animals, set up in 1951, said:

… we believe that the physiological, and more particularly the
anatomical, evidence fully justifies and reinforces the commonsense
belief that animals feel pain.

And after discussing the evolutionary value of pain the committee’s
report concluded that pain is “of clear-cut biological usefulness” and
this is “a third type of evidence that animals feel pain.” The committee
members then went on to consider forms of suffering other than mere
physical pain and added that they were “satisfied that animals do suffer
from acute fear and terror.” Subsequent reports by British government
committees on experiments on animals and on the welfare of animals under
intensive farming methods agreed with this view, concluding that animals
are capable of suffering both from straightforward physical injuries and
from fear, anxiety, stress, and so on.¹⁰ Finally, within the last
decade, the publication of scientific studies with titles such as
_Animal Thought, Animal Thinking_, and _Animal Suffering: The Science of
Animal Welfare_ have made it plain that conscious awareness in nonhuman
animals is now generally accepted as a serious subject for
investigation.¹¹

That might well be thought enough to settle the matter; but one more
objection needs to be considered. Human beings in pain, after all, have
one behavioral sign that nonhuman animals do not have: a developed
language. Other animals may communicate with each other, but not, it
seems, in the complicated way we do. Some philosophers, including
Descartes, have thought it important that while humans can tell each
other about their experience of pain in great detail, other animals
cannot. (Interestingly, this once neat dividing line between humans and
other species has now been threatened by the discovery that chimpanzees
can be taught a language.¹²) But as Bentham pointed out long ago, the
ability to use language is not relevant to the question of how a being
ought to be treated—unless that ability can be linked to the capacity to
suffer, so that the absence of a language casts doubt on the existence
of this capacity.

This link may be attempted in two ways. First, there is a hazy line of
philosophical thought, deriving perhaps from some doctrines associated
with the influential philosopher Ludwig Wittgenstein, which maintains
that we cannot meaningfully attribute states of consciousness to beings
without language. This position seems to me very implausible. Language
may be necessary for abstract thought, at some level anyway; but states
like pain are more primitive, and have nothing to do with language.

The second and more easily understood way of linking language and the
existence of pain is to say that the best evidence we can have that
other creatures are in pain is that they tell us that they are. This is
a distinct line of argument, for it is denying not that
non-language-users conceivably _could_ suffer, but only that we could
ever have sufficient reason to _believe_ that they are suffering. Still,
this line of argument fails too. As Jane Goodall has pointed out in her
study of chimpanzees, _In the Shadow of Man_, when it comes to the
expression of feelings and emotions language is less important than
nonlinguistic modes of communication such as a cheering pat on the back,
an exuberant embrace, a clasp of the hands, and so on. The basic signals
we use to convey pain, fear, anger, love, joy, surprise, sexual arousal,
and many other emotional states are not specific to our own species.¹³
The statement “I am in pain” may be one piece of evidence for the
conclusion that the speaker is in pain, but it is not the only possible
evidence, and since people sometimes tell lies, not even the best
possible evidence.

Even if there were stronger grounds for refusing to attribute pain to
those who do not have a language, the consequences of this refusal might
lead us to reject the conclusion. Human infants and young children are
unable to use language. Are we to deny that a year-old child can suffer?
If not, language cannot be crucial. Of course, most parents understand
the responses of their children better than they understand the
responses of other animals; but this is just a fact about the relatively
greater knowledge that we have of our own species and the greater
contact we have with infants as compared to animals. Those who have
studied the behavior of other animals and those who have animals as
companions soon learn to understand their responses as well as we
understand those of an infant, and sometimes better.

So to conclude: there are no good reasons, scientific or philosophical,
for denying that animals feel pain. If we do not doubt that other humans
feel pain we should not doubt that other animals do so too.

Animals can feel pain. As we saw earlier, there can be no moral
justification for regarding the pain (or pleasure) that animals feel as
less important than the same amount of pain (or pleasure) felt by
humans. But what practical consequences follow from this conclusion? To
prevent misunderstanding I shall spell out what I mean a little more
fully.

If I give a horse a hard slap across its rump with my open hand, the
horse may start, but it presumably feels little pain. Its skin is thick
enough to protect it against a mere slap. If I slap a baby in the same
way, however, the baby will cry and presumably feel pain, for its skin
is more sensitive. So it is worse to slap a baby than a horse, if both
slaps are administered with equal force. But there must be some kind of
blow—I don’t know exactly what it would be, but perhaps a blow with a
heavy stick—that would cause the horse as much pain as we cause a baby
by slapping it with our hand. That is what I mean by “the same amount of
pain,” and if we consider it wrong to inflict that much pain on a baby
for no good reason then we must, unless we are speciesists, consider it
equally wrong to inflict the same amount of pain on a horse for no good
reason.

Other differences between humans and animals cause other complications.
Normal adult human beings have mental capacities that will, in certain
circumstances, lead them to suffer more than animals would in the same
circumstances. If, for instance, we decided to perform extremely painful
or lethal scientific experiments on normal adult humans, kidnapped at
random from public parks for this purpose, adults who enjoy strolling in
parks would become fearful that they would be kidnapped. The resultant
terror would be a form of suffering additional to the pain of the
experiment. The same experiments performed on nonhuman animals would
cause less suffering since the animals would not have the anticipatory
dread of being kidnapped and experimented upon. This does not mean, of
course, that it would be _right_ to perform the experiment on animals,
but only that there is a reason, which is _not_ speciesist, for
preferring to use animals rather than normal adult human beings, if the
experiment is to be done at all. It should be noted, however, that this
same argument gives us a reason for preferring to use human
infants—orphans perhaps—or severely retarded human beings for
experiments, rather than adults, since infants and retarded humans would
also have no idea of what was going to happen to them. So far as this
argument is concerned nonhuman animals and infants and retarded humans
are in the same category; and if we use this argument to justify
experiments on nonhuman animals we have to ask ourselves whether we are
also prepared to allow experiments on human infants and retarded adults;
and if we make a distinction between animals and these humans, on what
basis can we do it, other than a bare-faced—and morally
indefensible—preference for members of our own species?

There are many matters in which the superior mental powers of normal
adult humans make a difference: anticipation, more detailed memory,
greater knowledge of what is happening, and so on. Yet these differences
do not all point to greater suffering on the part of the normal human
being. Sometimes animals may suffer more because of their more limited
understanding. If, for instance, we are taking prisoners in wartime we
can explain to them that although they must submit to capture, search,
and confinement, they will not otherwise be harmed and will be set free
at the conclusion of hostilities. If we capture wild animals, however,
we cannot explain that we are not threatening their lives. A wild animal
cannot distinguish an attempt to overpower and confine from an attempt
to kill; the one causes as much terror as the other.

It may be objected that comparisons of the sufferings of different
species are impossible to make and that for this reason when the
interests of animals and humans clash the principle of equality gives no
guidance. It is probably true that comparisons of suffering between
members of different species cannot be made precisely, but precision is
not essential. Even if we were to prevent the infliction of suffering on
animals only when it is quite certain that the interests of humans will
not be affected to anything like the extent that animals are affected,
we would be forced to make radical changes in our treatment of animals
that would involve our diet, the farming methods we use, experimental
procedures in many fields of science, our approach to wildlife and to
hunting, trapping and the wearing of furs, and areas of entertainment
like circuses, rodeos, and zoos. As a result, a vast amount of suffering
would be avoided.

So far I have said a lot about inflicting suffering on animals, but
nothing about killing them. This omission has been deliberate. The
application of the principle of equality to the infliction of suffering
is, in theory at least, fairly straightforward. Pain and suffering are
in themselves bad and should be prevented or minimized, irrespective of
the race, sex, or species of the being that suffers. How bad a pain is
depends on how intense it is and how long it lasts, but pains of the
same intensity and duration are equally bad, whether felt by humans or
animals.

The wrongness of killing a being is more complicated. I have kept, and
shall continue to keep, the question of killing in the background
because in the present state of human tyranny over other species the
more simple, straightforward principle of equal consideration of pain or
pleasure is a sufficient basis for identifying and protesting against
all the major abuses of animals that human beings practice.
Nevertheless, it is necessary to say something about killing.

Just as most human beings are speciesists in their readiness to cause
pain to animals when they would not cause a similar pain to humans for
the same reason, so most human beings are speciesists in their readiness
to kill other animals when they would not kill human beings. We need to
proceed more cautiously here, however, because people hold widely
differing views about when it is legitimate to kill humans, as the
continuing debates over abortion and euthanasia attest. Nor have moral
philosophers been able to agree on exactly what it is that makes it
wrong to kill human beings, and under what circumstances killing a human
being may be justifiable.

Let us consider first the view that it is always wrong to take an
innocent human life. We may call this the “sanctity of life” view.
People who take this view oppose abortion and euthanasia. They do not
usually, however, oppose the killing of nonhuman animals—so perhaps it
would be more accurate to describe this view as the “sanctity of _human_
life” view. The belief that human life, and only human life, is
sacrosanct is a form of speciesism. To see this, consider the following
example.

Assume that, as sometimes happens, an infant has been born with massive
and irreparable brain damage. The damage is so severe that the infant
can never be any more than a “human vegetable,” unable to talk,
recognize other people, act independently of others, or develop a sense
of self-awareness. The parents of the infant, realizing that they cannot
hope for any improvement in their child’s condition and being in any
case unwilling to spend, or ask the state to spend, the thousands of
dollars that would be needed annually for proper care of the infant, ask
the doctor to kill the infant painlessly.

Should the doctor do what the parents ask? Legally, the doctor should
not, and in this respect the law reflects the sanctity of life view. The
life of every human being is sacred. Yet people who would say this about
the infant do not object to the killing of nonhuman animals. How can
they justify their different judgments? Adult chimpanzees, dogs, pigs,
and members of many other species far surpass the brain-damaged infant
in their ability to relate to others, act independently, be self-aware,
and any other capacity that could reasonably be said to give value to
life. With the most intensive care possible, some severely retarded
infants can never achieve the intelligence level of a dog. Nor can we
appeal to the concern of the infant’s parents, since they themselves, in
this imaginary example (and in some actual cases) do not want the infant
kept alive. The only thing that distinguishes the infant from the
animal, in the eyes of those who claim it has a “right to life,” is that
it is, biologically, a member of the species Homo sapiens, whereas
chimpanzees, dogs, and pigs are not. But to use _this_ difference as the
basis for granting a right to life to the infant and not to the other
animals is, of course, pure speciesism.¹⁴ It is exactly the kind of
arbitrary difference that the most crude and overt kind of racist uses
in attempting to justify racial discrimination.

This does not mean that to avoid speciesism we must hold that it is as
wrong to kill a dog as it is to kill a human being in full possession of
his or her faculties. The only position that is irredeemably speciesist
is the one that tries to make the boundary of the right to life run
exactly parallel to the boundary of our own species. Those who hold the
sanctity of life view do this, because while distinguishing sharply
between human beings and other animals they allow no distinctions to be
made within our own species, objecting to the killing of the severely
retarded and the hopelessly senile as strongly as they object to the
killing of normal adults.

To avoid speciesism we must allow that beings who are similar in all
relevant respects have a similar right to life—and mere membership in
our own biological species cannot be a morally relevant criterion for
this right. Within these limits we could still hold, for instance, that
it is worse to kill a normal adult human, with a capacity for
self-awareness and the ability to plan for the future and have
meaningful relations with others, than it is to kill a mouse, which
presumably does not share all of these characteristics; or we might
appeal to the close family and other personal ties that humans have but
mice do not have to the same degree; or we might think that it is the
consequences for other humans, who will be put in fear for their own
lives, that makes the crucial difference; or we might think it is some
combination of these factors, or other factors altogether.

Whatever criteria we choose, however, we will have to admit that they do
not follow precisely the boundary of our own species. We may
legitimately hold that there are some features of certain beings that
make their lives more valuable than those of other beings; but there
will surely be some nonhuman animals whose lives, by any standards, are
more valuable than the lives of some humans. A chimpanzee, dog, or pig,
for instance, will have a higher degree of self-awareness and a greater
capacity for meaningful relations with others than a severely retarded
infant or someone in a state of advanced senility. So if we base the
right to life on these characteristics we must grant these animals a
right to life as good as, or better than, such retarded or senile
humans.

This argument cuts both ways. It could be taken as showing that
chimpanzees, dogs, and pigs, along with some other species, have a right
to life and we commit a grave moral offense whenever we kill them, even
when they are old and suffering and our intention is to put them out of
their misery. Alternatively one could take the argument as showing that
the severely retarded and hopelessly senile have no right to life and
may be killed for quite trivial reasons, as we now kill animals.

Since the main concern of this book is with ethical questions having to
do with animals and not with the morality of euthanasia I shall not
attempt to settle this issue finally.¹⁵ I think it is reasonably clear,
though, that while both of the positions just described avoid
speciesism, neither is satisfactory. What we need is some middle
position that would avoid speciesism but would not make the lives of the
retarded and senile as cheap as the lives of pigs and dogs now are, or
make the lives of pigs and dogs so sacrosanct that we think it wrong to
put them out of hopeless misery. What we must do is bring nonhuman
animals within our sphere of moral concern and cease to treat their
lives as expendable for whatever trivial purposes we may have. At the
same time, once we realize that the fact that a being is a member of our
own species is not in itself enough to make it always wrong to kill that
being, we may come to reconsider our policy of preserving human lives at
all costs, even when there is no prospect of a meaningful life or of
existence without terrible pain.

I conclude, then, that a rejection of speciesism does not imply that all
lives are of equal worth. While self-awareness, the capacity to think
ahead and have hopes and aspirations for the future, the capacity for
meaningful relations with others and so on are not relevant to the
question of inflicting pain—since pain is pain, whatever other
capacities, beyond the capacity to feel pain, the being may have—these
capacities are relevant to the question of taking life. It is not
arbitrary to hold that the life of a self-aware being, capable of
abstract thought, of planning for the future, of complex acts of
communication, and so on, is more valuable than the life of a being
without these capacities. To see the difference between the issues of
inflicting pain and taking life, consider how we would choose within our
own species. If we had to choose to save the life of a normal human
being or an intellectually disabled human being, we would probably
choose to save the life of a normal human being; but if we had to choose
between preventing pain in the normal human being or the intellectually
disabled one—imagine that both have received painful but superficial
injuries, and we only have enough painkiller for one of them—it is not
nearly so clear how we ought to choose. The same is true when we
consider other species. The evil of pain is, in itself, unaffected by
the other characteristics of the being who feels the pain; the value of
life is affected by these other characteristics. To give just one reason
for this difference, to take the life of a being who has been hoping,
planning, and working for some future goal is to deprive that being of
the fulfillment of all those efforts; to take the life of a being with a
mental capacity below the level needed to grasp that one is a being with
a future—much less make plans for the future—cannot involve this
particular kind of loss.¹⁶

Normally this will mean that if we have to choose between the life of a
human being and the life of another animal we should choose to save the
life of the human; but there may be special cases in which the reverse
holds true, because the human being in question does not have the
capacities of a normal human being. So this view is not speciesist,
although it may appear to be at first glance. The preference, in normal
cases, for saving a human life over the life of an animal when a choice
_has_ to be made is a preference based on the characteristics that
normal humans have, and not on the mere fact that they are members of
our own species. This is why when we consider members of our own species
who lack the characteristics of normal humans we can no longer say that
their lives are always to be preferred to those of other animals. This
issue comes up in a practical way in the following chapter. In general,
though, the question of when it is wrong to kill (painlessly) an animal
is one to which we need give no precise answer. As long as we remember
that we should give the same respect to the lives of animals as we give
to the lives of those humans at a similar mental level, we shall not go
far wrong.¹⁷

In any case, the conclusions that are argued for in this book flow from
the principle of minimizing suffering alone. The idea that it is also
wrong to kill animals painlessly gives some of these conclusions
additional support that is welcome but strictly unnecessary.
Interestingly enough, this is true even of the conclusion that we ought
to become vegetarians, a conclusion that in the popular mind is
generally based on some kind of absolute prohibition on killing.

The reader may already have thought of some objections to the position I
have taken in this chapter. What, for instance, do I propose to do about
animals who may cause harm to human beings? Should we try to stop
animals from killing each other? How do we know that plants cannot feel
pain, and if they can, must we starve? To avoid interrupting the flow of
the main argument I have chosen to discuss these and other objections in
a separate chapter, and readers who are impatient to have their
objections answered may look ahead to Chapter 6.

The next two chapters explore two examples of speciesism in practice. I
have limited myself to two examples so that I would have space for a
reasonably thorough discussion, although this limit means that the book
contains no discussion at all of other practices that exist only because
we do not take seriously the interests of other animals—practices like
hunting, whether for sport or for furs; farming minks, foxes, and other
animals for their fur; capturing wild animals (often after shooting
their mothers) and imprisoning them in small cages for humans to stare
at; tormenting animals to make them learn tricks for circuses and
tormenting them to make them entertain the audiences at rodeos;
slaughtering whales with explosive harpoons, under the guise of
scientific research; drowning over 100,000 dolphins annually in nets set
by tuna fishing boats; shooting three million kangaroos every year in
the Australian outback to turn them into skins and pet food; and
generally ignoring the interests of wild animals as we extend our empire
of concrete and pollution over the surface of the globe.

I shall have nothing, or virtually nothing, to say about these things,
because as I indicated in the preface to this edition, this book is not
a compendium of all the nasty things we do to animals. Instead I have
chosen two central illustrations of speciesism in practice. They are not
isolated examples of sadism, but practices that involve, in one case,
tens of millions of animals, and in the other, billions of animals every
year. Nor can we pretend that we have nothing to do with these
practices. One of them—experimentation on animals—is promoted by the
government we elect and is largely paid for out of the taxes we pay. The
other—rearing animals for food—is possible only because most people buy
and eat the products of this practice. That is why I have chosen to
discuss these particular forms of speciesism. They are at its heart.
They cause more suffering to a greater number of animals than anything
else that human beings do. To stop them we must change the policies of
our government, and we must change our own lives, to the extent of
changing our diet. If these officially promoted and almost universally
accepted forms of speciesism can be abolished, abolition of the other
speciesist practices cannot be far behind.

_Chapter 2_

Tools for Research …

_your taxes at work_

_Project X_, a popular film released in 1987, gave many Americans their
first glimpse into animal experiments carried out by their own armed
forces. The film’s plot centers on an air force experiment designed to
see whether chimpanzees could continue to “fly” a simulated plane after
being exposed to radiation. A young air force cadet assigned to duty in
the laboratory becomes attached to one particular chimpanzee, with whom
he can communicate in sign language. When this chimpanzee’s turn for
exposure to radiation comes, the young man (with the assistance of his
attractive girlfriend, naturally) determines to liberate the
chimpanzees.

The plot was fiction, but the experiments were not. They were based on
experiments that have been conducted over many years at Brooks Air Force
Base, in Texas, and variations of which are continuing. But filmgoers
did not get the whole story. What happened to the chimpanzees in the
film was very much a softened version of what really happens. So we
should consider the experiments themselves, as described in documents
issued by Brooks Air Force Base.

As indicated in the film, the experiments involve a kind of flight
simulator. The device is known as a Primate Equilibrium Platform, or
PEP. It consists of a platform that can be made to pitch and roll like
an airplane. The monkeys sit in a chair that is part of the platform. In
front of them is a control stick, by means of which the platform can be
returned to a horizontal position. Once monkeys have been trained to do
this, they are subjected to radiation and to chemical warfare agents, to
see how these affect their ability to fly. (A photograph of the Primate
Equilibrium Platform appears following page 157.)

The standard training procedure for the PEP is described in a Brooks Air
Force Base publication entitled “Training Procedure for Primate
Equilibrium Platform.”¹ The following is a summary:

Phase I (chair adaptation): The monkeys are “restrained” (in other
words, tied down) in the PEP chair for one hour per day for five days,
until they sit quietly.

Phase II (stick adaptation): The monkeys are restrained in the PEP
chair. The chair is then tipped forward and the monkeys are given
electric shocks. This causes the monkey to “turn in the chair or bite
the platform.… This behavior is redirected toward the [experimenter’s]
gloved hand which is placed directly over the control stick.” Touching
the hand results in the shock being stopped, and the monkey (who has not
been fed that day) is given a raisin. This happens to each monkey one
hundred times a day for between five and eight days.

Phase III (stick manipulation): This time when the PEP is tipped
forward, merely touching the stick is not enough to stop the electric
shock. The monkeys continue to receive electric shocks until they pull
the stick back. This is repeated one hundred times per day.

Phases IV–VI (push stick forward and pull stick back): In these phases
the PEP is tipped back and the monkeys are shocked until they push the
stick forward. Then the PEP is again tilted forward, and they must again
learn to pull the stick back. This is repeated one hundred times per
day. Then the platform switches randomly between backward and forward
and the monkeys are again shocked until they make the appropriate
response.

Phase VII (control stick operational): Up to this point, although the
monkeys have been pulling the control stick backward and forward, it has
not affected the position of the platform. Now the monkey controls the
position of the platform by pulling the stick. In this phase the
automatic shocker does not function. Shocks are manually given at
approximately every three or four seconds for a 0.5 second duration.
This is a slower rate than previously, to ensure that correct behavior
is not punished and therefore, to use the jargon of the manual,
“extinguished.” If the monkey does stop performing as desired, the
training returns to phase VI. Otherwise, training continues in this
phase until the monkey can maintain the platform at a nearly horizontal
level and avoid 80 percent of the shocks given. The time taken for
training the monkeys in phases III through VII is ten to twelve days.

After this period, training continues for another twenty days. During
this further period a randomizing device is used to make the chair pitch
and roll more violently, but the monkey must maintain the same level of
performance in returning the chair to the horizontal or else receive
frequent electric shocks.

All this training, involving thousands of electric shocks, is only
preliminary to the real experiment. Once the monkeys are regularly
keeping the platform horizontal most of the time, they are exposed to
lethal or sublethal doses of radiation or to chemical warfare agents, to
see how long they can continue to “fly” the platform. Thus, nauseous and
probably vomiting from a fatal dose of radiation, they are forced to try
to keep the platform horizontal, and if they fail they receive frequent
electric shocks. Here is one example, taken from a United States Air
Force School of Aerospace Medicine report published in October
1987—after _Project X_ had been released.²

The report is entitled “Primate Equilibrium Performance Following Soman
Exposure: Effects of Repeated Daily Exposures to Low Soman Doses.” Soman
is another name for nerve gas, a chemical warfare agent that caused
terrible agony to troops in the First World War, but fortunately has
been very little used in warfare since then. The report begins by
referring to several previous reports in which the same team of
investigators studied the effects of “acute exposure to soman” on
performance in the Primate Equilibrium Platform. This particular study,
however, is on the effect of low doses received over several days. The
monkeys in this experiment had been operating the platform “at least
weekly” for a minimum of two years and had received various drugs and
low doses of soman before, but not within the previous six weeks.

The experimenters calculated the doses of soman that would be sufficient
to reduce the monkeys’ ability to operate the platform. For the
calculation to be made, of course, the monkeys would have been receiving
electric shocks because of their inability to keep the platform level.
Although the report is mostly concerned with the effect of the nerve
poison on the performance level of the monkeys, it does give some
insight into other effects of chemical weapons:

The subject was completely incapacitated on the day following the last
exposure, displaying neurological symptoms including gross
incoordination, weakness, and intention tremor … These symptoms
persisted for several days, during which the animal remained unable to
perform the PEP task.³

Dr. Donald Barnes was for several years principal investigator at the
U.S. Air Force School of Aerospace Medicine, and in charge of the
experiments with the Primate Equilibrium Platform at Brooks Air Force
Base. Barnes estimates that he irradiated about one thousand trained
monkeys during his years in this position. Subsequently he has written:

For some years, I had entertained suspicions about the utility of the
data we were gathering. I made a few token attempts to ascertain both
the destination and the purpose of the technical reports we published
but now acknowledge my eagerness to accept assurances from those in
command that we were, in fact, providing a real service to the U.S. Air
Force and, hence, to the defense of the free world. I used those as
surances as blinkers to avoid the reality of what I saw in the field,
and even though I did not always wear them comfortably, they did serve
to protect me from the insecurities asso ciated with the potential loss
of status and income.…

And then, one day, the blinkers slipped off, and I found myself in a
very serious confrontation with Dr. Roy DeHart, Commander, U.S. Air
Force School of Aerospace Medicine. I tried to point out that, given a
nuclear confrontation, it is highly unlikely that operational commanders
will go to charts and figures based upon data from the rhesus monkey to
gain estimates of probable force strength or second strike capability.
Dr. DeHart insisted that the data will be invaluable, asserting, “They
don’t know the data are based on animal studies.”⁴

Barnes resigned and has become a strong opponent of animal
experimentation; but experiments using the Primate Equilibrium Platform
have continued.

_Project X_ lifted the veil on one kind of experiment conducted by the
military. We have now examined that in a little detail, although it
would take a long time to describe all the forms of radiation and
chemical warfare agents tested, in varying doses, on monkeys in the
Primate Equilibrium Platform. What we now need to grasp is that this is
just one very small part of the total amount of military experimentation
on animals. Concern about this experimentation goes back several years.

In July 1973 Representative Les Aspin of Wisconsin learned through an
advertisement in an obscure newspaper that the United States Air Force
was planning to purchase two hundred beagle puppies, with vocal cords
tied to prevent normal barking, for tests of poisonous gases. Shortly
afterward it became known that the army was also proposing to use
beagles—four hundred this time—in similar tests.

Aspin began a vigorous protest, supported by antivivisection societies.
Advertisements were placed in major newspapers across the country.
Letters from an outraged public began pouring in. An aide from the House
of Representatives Armed Services Committee said that the committee had
received more mail on the beagles than it had received on any other
subject since Truman sacked General MacArthur, while an internal
Department of Defense memo released by Aspin said that the volume of
mail the department had received was the greatest ever for any single
event, surpassing even the mail on the bombings of North Vietnam and
Cambodia.⁵ After defending the experiments initially, the Defense
Department then announced that it was postponing them and looking into
the possibility of replacing the beagles with other experimental
animals.

All this amounted to a curious incident—curious because the public furor
over this particular experiment implied a remarkable ignorance of the
nature of standard experiments performed by the armed services, research
establishments, universities, and commercial firms of many different
kinds. True, the proposed air force and army experiments were designed
so that many animals would suffer and die without any certainty that
this suffering and death would save a single human life or benefit
humans in any way at all; but the same can be said of millions of other
experiments performed each year in the United States alone. Perhaps the
concern arose because the experiments were to be done on beagles. But if
so, why has there been no protest at the following experiment, conducted
more recently:

Under the direction of the U.S. Army Medical Bioengineering Research and
Development Laboratory at Fort Detrick, in Frederick, Maryland,
researchers fed 60 beagle dogs varied doses of the explosive TNT. The
dogs were given the TNT in capsules every day for six months. Symptoms
observed included dehydration, emaciation, anemia, jaundice, low body
temperature, discolored urine and feces, diarrhea, loss of appetite and
weight loss, enlarged livers, kidneys and spleen, and the beagles became
uncoordinated. One female was “found to be moribund [dying]” during week
14 and was killed; another was found dead during week 16. The report
states that the experiment represents “a portion” of the data which the
Fort Detrick laboratory is developing on the effects of TNT on mammals.
Because injuries were observed even at the lowest doses, the study
failed to establish the level at which TNT had no observable effects;
thus, the report concludes “additional studies … of TNT in beagle dogs
may be warranted.”⁶

In any case, it is wrong to limit our concern to dogs. People tend to
care about dogs because they generally have more experience with dogs as
companions; but other animals are as capable of suffering as dogs are.
Few people feel sympathy for rats. Yet rats are intelligent animals, and
there can be no doubt that rats are capable of suffering and do suffer
from the countless painful experiments performed on them. If the army
were to stop experimenting on dogs and switch to rats instead, we should
not be any less concerned.

Some of the worst military experiments are carried out at a place known
as AFRRI—the Armed Forces Radiobiology Research Institute, in Bethesda,
Maryland. Here, instead of using a Primate Equilibrium Platform,
experimenters have tied animals down in chairs and irradiated them or
have trained them to press levers and observed the effects of
irradiation on their performance. They have also trained monkeys to run
in an “activity wheel,” which is a kind of cylindrical treadmill. (See
photograph following page 157.) The monkeys receive electric shocks
unless they keep the wheel moving at speeds above one mile per hour.

In one experiment using the primate activity wheel, Carol Franz of the
behavioral sciences department at AFRRI trained thirty-nine monkeys for
nine weeks, two hours per day, until they could alternate “work” and
“rest” periods for six continuous hours. They were then subjected to
varying doses of radiation. Monkeys receiving the higher doses vomited
up to seven times. They were then put back into the activity wheel to
measure the effect of the radiation on their ability to “work.” During
this period, if a monkey did not move the wheel for one minute, “shock
intensity was increased to 10 mA.” (This is an extremely intense
electric shock, even by the quite excessive standards of American animal
experimentation; it must cause very severe pain.) Some monkeys continued
to vomit while in the activity wheel. Franz reports the effect that the
various doses of radiation had on performance. The report also indicates
that the irradiated monkeys took between a day and a half and five days
to die.⁷

Since I do not wish to spend this entire chapter describing experiments
conducted by the United States armed forces, I shall turn now to
nonmilitary experimentation (although we shall, in passing, examine one
or two other military experiments where they are relevant to other
topics). Meanwhile, I hope that United States taxpayers, whatever they
think the size of the military budget should be, will ask themselves: Is
this what I want the armed forces to be doing with my taxes?

We should not, of course, judge all animal experimentation by the
experiments I have just described. The armed services, one might think,
are hardened to suffering by their concentration on war, death, and
injury. Genuine scientific research, surely, will be very different,
won’t it? We shall see. To begin our examination of nonmilitary
scientific research, I shall allow Professor Harry F. Harlow to speak
for himself. Professor Harlow, who worked at the Primate Research Center
in Madison, Wisconsin, was for many years editor of a leading psychology
journal, and until his death a few years ago was held in high esteem by
his colleagues in psychological research. His work has been cited
approvingly in many basic textbooks of psychology, read by millions of
students taking introductory psychology courses over the last twenty
years. The line of research he began has been continued after his death
by his associates and former students.

In a 1965 paper, Harlow describes his work as follows:

For the past ten years we have studied the effects of partial social
isolation by raising monkeys from birth onwards in bare wire cages.…
These monkeys suffer total maternal deprivation More recently we have
initiated a series of stud ies on the effects of total social isolation
by rearing monkeys from a few hours after birth until 3, 6, or 12 months
of age in [a] stainless steel chamber. During the prescribed sentence in
this apparatus the monkey has no contact with any animal, human or
sub-human.

These studies, Harlow continues, found that

sufficiently severe and enduring early isolation reduces these animals
to a social-emotional level in which the primary social responsiveness
is fear.⁸

In another article Harlow and his former student and associate Stephen
Suomi described how they were trying to induce psychopathology in infant
monkeys by a technique that appeared not to be working. They were then
visited by John Bowlby, a British psychiatrist. According to Harlow’s
account, Bowlby listened to the story of their troubles and then toured
the Wisconsin laboratory. After he had seen the monkeys individually
housed in bare wire cages he asked, “Why are you trying to produce
psychopathology in monkeys? You already have more psychopathological
monkeys in the laboratory than have ever been seen on the face of the
earth.”⁹

Bowlby, incidentally, was a leading researcher on the consequences of
maternal deprivation, but his research was conducted with children,
primarily war orphans, refugees, and institutionalized children. As far
back as 1951, before Harlow even began his research on nonhuman
primates, Bowlby concluded:

The evidence has been reviewed. It is submitted that evidence is now
such that it leaves no room for doubt regarding the general proposition
that the prolonged deprivation of the young child of maternal care may
have grave and far-reaching effects on his character and so on the whole
of his future life.¹⁰

This did not deter Harlow and his colleagues from devising and carrying
out their monkey experiments.

In the same article in which they tell of Bowlby’s visit, Harlow and
Suomi describe how they had the “fascinating idea” of inducing
depression by “allowing baby monkeys to attach to cloth surrogate
mothers who could become monsters”:

The first of these monsters was a cloth monkey mother who, upon schedule
or demand, would eject high-pressure compressed air. It would blow the
animal’s skin practically off its body. What did the baby monkey do? It
simply clung tighter and tighter to the mother, because a frightened
infant clings to its mother at all costs. We did not achieve any
psychopathology.

However, we did not give up. We built another surrogate monster mother
that would rock so violently that the baby’s head and teeth would
rattle. All the baby did was cling tighter and tighter to the surrogate.
The third monster we built had an embedded wire frame within its body
which would spring forward and eject the infant from its ventral
surface. The infant would subsequently pick itself off the floor, wait
for the frame to return into the cloth body, and then cling again to the
surrogate. Finally, we built our porcupine mother. On command, this
mother would eject sharp brass spikes over all of the ventral surface of
its body. Although the infants were distressed by these pointed rebuffs,
they simply waited until the spikes receded and then returned and clung
to the mother.

These results, the experimenters remark, were not so surprising, since
the only recourse of an injured child is to cling to its mother.

Eventually, Harlow and Suomi gave up on the artificial monster mothers
because they found something better: a real monkey mother who was a
monster. To produce such mothers, they reared female monkeys in
isolation, and then tried to make them pregnant. Unfortunately the
females did not have normal sexual relations with male monkeys, so they
had to be made pregnant by a technique that Harlow and Suomi refer to as
a “rape rack.” When the babies were born the experimenters observed the
monkeys. They found that some simply ignored the infants, failing to
cuddle the crying baby to the breast as normal monkeys do when they hear
their baby cry. The other pattern of behavior observed was different:

The other monkeys were brutal or lethal. One of their favorite tricks
was to crush the infant’s skull with their teeth. But the really
sickening behavior pattern was that of smashing the infant’s face to the
floor, and then rubbing it back and forth.¹¹

In a 1972 paper, Harlow and Suomi say that because depression in humans
has been characterized as embodying a state of “helplessness and
hopelessness, sunken in a well of despair,” they designed a device “on
an intuitive basis” to reproduce such a “well of despair” both
physically and psychologically. They built a vertical chamber with
stainless steel sides sloping inward to form a rounded bottom and placed
a young monkey in it for periods of up to forty-five days. They found
that after a few days of this confinement the monkeys “spend most of
their time huddled in a corner of the chamber.” The confinement produced
“severe and persistent psychopathological behavior of a depressive
nature.” Even nine months after release the monkeys would sit clasping
their arms around their bodies instead of moving around and exploring
their surroundings as normal monkeys do. But the report ends
inconclusively and ominously:

Whether [the results] can be traced specifically to variables such as
chamber shape, chamber size, duration of confinement, age at time of
confinement or, more likely, to a combination of these and other
variables remains the subject of further research.¹²

Another paper explains how, in addition to the “well of despair,” Harlow
and his colleagues created a “tunnel of terror” to produce terrified
monkeys,¹³ and in yet another report Harlow describes how he was able
“to induce psychological death in rhesus monkeys” by providing them with
terry cloth-covered “mother surrogates” that were normally kept at a
temperature of 99 degrees Fahrenheit, but could be rapidly chilled to 35
degrees Fahrenheit to simulate a kind of maternal rejection.¹⁴

Harlow is now dead, but his students and admirers have spread across the
United States and continue to perform experiments in a similar vein.
John P. Capitanio, under the direction of one of Harlow’s students, W.
A. Mason, has conducted deprivation experiments at the California
Primate Research Center at the University of California, Davis. In these
experiments, Capitanio compared the social behavior of rhesus monkeys
“reared” by a dog with that of monkeys “reared” by a plastic hobbyhorse.
He concluded that “although members of both groups were clearly abnormal
in the extent of their social interactions,” the monkeys who had been
kept with the dog coped better than those kept with the plastic toy.¹⁵

After leaving Wisconsin, Gene Sackett continued deprivation studies at
the University of Washington Primate Center. Sackett has raised rhesus
monkeys, pigtail macaques, and crab-eating macaques in total isolation
to study the differences in personal behavior, social behavior, and
exploration behavior. He found differences among the different monkey
species which “question the generality of the ‘isolation syndrome’
across primate species.” If there are differences even among closely
related species of monkeys, generalization from monkeys to humans must
be far more questionable.¹⁶

Martin Reite of the University of Colorado conducted deprivation
experiments on bonnet monkeys and pigtailed macaques. He was aware that
Jane Goodall’s observations of orphaned wild chimpanzees described
“profound behavioral disturbances, with sadness or depressive affective
changes as major components.” But because “in comparison with monkey
studies, relatively little has been published on experimental
separations in great apes,” he and other experimenters decided to study
seven infant chimpanzees who had been separated from their mothers at
birth and reared in a nursery environment. After periods ranging between
seven and ten months, some of the infants were placed in isolation
chambers for five days. The isolated infants screamed, rocked, and threw
themselves at the walls of the chamber. Reite concluded that “isolation
in infant chimpanzees may be accompanied by marked behavioral changes”
but noted that (you guessed it) more research was needed.¹⁷

Since Harlow began his maternal deprivation experiments some thirty
years ago, over 250 such experiments have been conducted in the United
States. These experiments subjected over seven thousand animals to
procedures that induced distress, despair, anxiety, general
psychological devastation, and death. As some of the preceding
quotations show, research now feeds off itself. Reite and his colleagues
experimented on chimpanzees because relatively little experimental work
had been done on the great apes, as compared with monkeys. They
apparently felt no need to address the basic question of why we should
be doing any experiments on maternal deprivation in animals at all. They
did not even try to justify their experiments by claiming they were of
benefit to human beings. That we already have extensive observations of
orphaned chimpanzees in the wild seems not to have been of interest to
them. Their attitude was plain: this has been done with animals of one
species, but not with animals of another, so let’s do it to them. The
same attitude recurs constantly throughout the psychological and
behavioral sciences. The most amazing part of the story is that
taxpayers have paid for all this research—to the tune of over $58
million for maternal deprivation research alone.¹⁸ In this respect, but
not only in this respect, animal experimentation in civilian life is not
so different from military experimentation.

The practice of experimenting on nonhuman animals as it exists today
throughout the world reveals the consequences of speciesism. Many
experiments inflict severe pain without the remotest prospect of
significant benefits for human beings or any other animals. Such
experiments are not isolated instances, but part of a major industry. In
Britain, where experimenters are required to report the number of
“scientific procedures” performed on animals, official government
figures show that 3.5 million scientific procedures were performed on
animals in 1988.¹⁹ In the United States there are no figures of
comparable accuracy. Under the Animal Welfare Act, the U.S. secretary of
agriculture publishes a report listing the number of animals used by
facilities registered with it, but this is incomplete in many ways. It
does not include rats, mice, birds, reptiles, frogs, or domestic farm
animals used for experimental purposes; it does not include animals used
in secondary schools; and it does not include experiments performed by
facilities that do not transport animals interstate or receive grants or
contracts from the federal government.

In 1986 the U.S. Congress Office of Technology Assessment (OTA)
published a report entitled “Alternatives to Animal Use in Research,
Testing and Education.” The OTA researchers attempted to determine the
number of animals used in experimentation in the U.S. and reported that
“estimates of the animals used in the United States each year range from
10 million to upwards of 100 million.” They concluded that the estimates
were unreliable but their best guess was “at least 17 million to 22
million.”²⁰

This is an extremely conservative estimate. In testimony before Congress
in 1966, the Laboratory Animal Breeders Association estimated that the
number of mice, rats, guinea pigs, hamsters, and rabbits used for
experimental purposes in 1965 was around 60 million.²¹ In 1984 Dr.
Andrew Rowan of Tufts University School of Veterinary Medicine estimated
that approximately 71 million animals are used each year. In 1985 Rowan
revised his estimates to distinguish between the number of animals
produced, acquired, and actually used. This yielded an estimate of
between 25 and 35 million animals used in experiments each year.²² (This
figure omits animals who die in shipping or are killed before the
experiment begins.) A stock market analysis of just one major supplier
of animals to laboratories, the Charles River Breeding Laboratory,
stated that this company alone produced 22 million laboratory animals
annually.²³

The 1988 report issued by the Department of Agriculture listed 140,471
dogs, 42,271 cats, 51,641 primates, 431,457 guinea pigs, 331,945
hamsters, 459,254 rabbits, and 178,249 “wild animals”: a total of
1,635,288 used in experimentation. Remember that this report does not
bother to count rats and mice, and covers at most an estimated 10
percent of the total number of animals used. Of the nearly 1.6 million
animals reported by the Department of Agriculture to have been used for
experimental purposes, over 90,000 are reported to have experienced
“unrelieved pain or distress.” Again, this is probably at most 10
percent of the total number of animals suffering unrelieved pain and
distress—and if experimenters are less concerned about causing
unrelieved pain to rats and mice than they are to dogs, cats, and
primates, it could be an even smaller proportion.

Other developed nations all use large numbers of animals. In Japan, for
example, a very incomplete survey published in 1988 produced a total in
excess of eight million.²⁴

One way of grasping the nature of animal experimentation as a
large-scale industry is to look at the commercial products to which it
gives rise and the way in which they are sold. Among these “products”
are, of course, the animals themselves. We have seen how many animals
Charles River Breeding Laboratories produces. In journals like _Lab
Animal_, animals are advertised as if they were cars. Beneath a
photograph of two guinea pigs, one normal and one completely hairless,
the advertising copy says:

When it comes to guinea pigs, now you have a choice. You can opt for our
standard model that comes complete with hair. Or try our new 1988
stripped down, hairless model for speed and efficiency.

Our euthymic, hairless guinea pigs are the product of years of breeding.
They can be used for dermatologic studies for hair producing agents.
Skin sensitization. Transdermal therapy. Ultraviolet studies. And more.

An advertisement for Charles River in _Endocrinology_ (June 1985) asked:

“You want to see our operation?”

When it comes to operations, we give you just what the doctor ordered.
Hypophysectomies, adrenalectomies, castrations, thymectomies,
ovariectomies and thyroidectomies. We perform thousands of
“endocrinectomies” every month on rats, mice or hamsters. Plus
additional special surgery (spleenectomy, nephrectomy, cecetomy) on
request.… For surgically altered research animals to fit your very
specific research animals needs, call [phone number]. Our operators are
available almost any time.

In addition to the animals themselves, animal experiments have created a
market for specialized equipment. _Nature_, a leading British scientific
journal, carries a section called “New on the Market,” which recently
informed its readers about a new piece of research equipment:

The latest animal research tool from Columbus Instruments is an
air-tight animal treadmill for the collection of oxygen consumption data
during exercise. The treadmill has isolated running lanes with separate
electrical shock stimuli which can be configured for up to four rats or
mice.… The basic £9,737 system includes a belt speed controller and an
adjustable voltage shocker. The £13,487 fully automatic system can be
programmed to run consecutive experiments with rest periods in between,
and automatically monitors the number of trips to the shocker grid, time
spent running, and time spent on the shocker grid.²⁵

Columbus Instruments make several other ingenious devices. In _Lab
Animal_ it advertises:

The Columbus Instruments Convulsion Meter makes possible objective and
quantitative measurements of animal convulsions. A sensor precision
platform load cell converts the vertical components of convulsion force
into proportional electrical signals.… The user must observe the
animal’s behavior and activate the meter by a push-button switch when a
convulsion is noticed. At the end of the experiment the totalized force
and the totalized, time of the convulsions will be obtained.

Then there is _The Whole Rat Catalog_. Published by Harvard Bioscience,
it consists of 140 pages of equipment for use in experimenting on small
animals, all written in cute advertising jargon. Of the transparent
plastic rabbit restrainers, for instance, the catalog tells us: “The
only thing that wiggles is the nose!” Sometimes, however, a little
sensitivity to the controversial nature of the subject is shown: the
description of the Rodent Carrying Case suggests, “Use this unobtrusive
case to carry your favorite animal from one place to another without
attracting attention.” In addition to the usual cages, electrodes,
surgical implements, and syringes, the catalog advertises Rodent
Restraint Cones, Harvard Swivel-Tether Systems, Radiation Resistant
Gloves, Implantable FM Telemetry Equipment, Liquid Diets for Rats and
Mice in Alcohol Studies, Decapitators for both small and large animals,
and even a Rodent Emulsifier which “will quickly reduce the remains of a
small animal to a homogenous suspension.”²⁶

Presumably corporations would not bother to manufacture and advertise
such equipment unless they expected considerable sales. And the items
are not going to be bought unless they are going to be used.

Among the tens of millions of experiments performed, only a few can
possibly be regarded as contributing to important medical research. Huge
numbers of animals are used in university departments such as forestry
and psychology; many more are used for commercial purposes, to test new
cosmetics, shampoos, food coloring agents, and other inessential items.
All this can happen only because of our prejudice against taking
seriously the suffering of a being who is not a member of our own
species. Typically, defenders of experiments on animals do not deny that
animals suffer. They cannot deny the animals’ suffering, because they
need to stress the similarities between humans and other animals in
order to claim that their experiments may have some relevance for human
purposes. The experimenter who forces rats to choose between starvation
and electric shock to see if they develop ulcers (which they do) does so
because the rat has a nervous system very similar to a human being’s,
and presumably feels an electric shock in a similar way.

There has been opposition to experimenting on animals for a long time.
This opposition has made little headway because experimenters, backed by
commercial firms that profit by supplying laboratory animals and
equipment, have been able to convince legislators and the public that
opposition comes from uninformed fanatics who consider the interests of
animals more important than the interests of human beings. But to be
opposed to what is going on now it is not necessary to insist that all
animal experiments stop immediately. All we need to say is that
experiments serving no direct and urgent purpose should stop
immediately, and in the remaining fields of research, we should,
whenever possible, seek to replace experiments that involve animals with
alternative methods that do not.

To understand why this seemingly modest change would be so important we
need to know more about the experiments that are now being performed and
have been performed for a century. Then we will be able to assess the
claim by defenders of the present situation that experiments on animals
are done only for important purposes. The following pages, therefore,
describe some experiments on animals. Reading the reports of these
experiments is not a pleasant experience; but we have an obligation to
inform ourselves about what is done in our own community, especially
since we are paying, through our taxes, for most of this research. If
the animals have to undergo these experiments, the least we can do is
read the reports and inform ourselves about them. That is why I have not
attempted to tone down or gloss over some of the things that are done to
animals. At the same time I have not tried to make these things worse
than they really are. The reports that follow are all drawn from
accounts written by the experimenters themselves and published by them
in the scientific journals in which experimenters communicate with one
another.

Such accounts are inevitably more favorable to the experimenters than
reports by an outside observer would be. There are two reasons for this.
One is that the experimenters will not emphasize the suffering they have
inflicted unless it is necessary to do so in order to communicate the
results of the experiment, and this is rarely the case. Most suffering
therefore goes unreported. Experimenters may consider it unnecessary to
include in their reports any mention of what happens when electric shock
devices are left on when they should have been turned off, when animals
recover consciousness in the midst of an operation because of an
improperly administered anesthetic, or when unattended animals sicken
and die over the weekend. The second reason scientific journals are a
source favorable to experimenters is that they include only those
experiments that the experimenters and editors of the journals consider
significant. A British government committee found that only about one
quarter of experiments on animals ever found their way into print.²⁷
There is no reason to believe that accounts of a higher proportion of
experiments are published in the United States; indeed since the
proportion of minor colleges with researchers of lesser talents is much
higher in the United States than in Britain, it seems probable that an
even smaller proportion of experiments yield results of any significance
at all.

So in reading the following pages bear in mind that they are drawn from
sources favorable to the experimenters; and if the results of the
experiments do not appear to be of sufficient importance to justify the
suffering they caused, remember that these examples are all taken from
the small fraction of experiments that editors considered significant
enough to publish. One last warning. The reports published in the
journals always appear under the names of the experimenters. I have
generally retained these names, since I see no reason to protect
experimenters behind a cloak of anonymity. Nevertheless, it should not
be assumed that the people named are especially evil or cruel people.
They are doing what they were trained to do and what thousands of their
colleagues do. The experiments are intended to illustrate not sadism on
the part of individual experimenters but the institutionalized mentality
of speciesism that makes it possible for these experimenters to do these
things without serious consideration of the interests of the animals
they are using.

Many of the most painful experiments are performed in the field of
psychology. To give some idea of the numbers of animals experimented on
in psychology laboratories, consider that during 1986 the National
Institute of Mental Health funded 350 experiments on animals. The NIMH
is just one source of federal funding for psychological experimentation.
The agency spent over $11 million on experiments that involved direct
manipulation of the brain, over $5 million on experiments that studied
the effects drugs have on behavior, almost $3 million on learning and
memory experiments, and over $2 million on experiments involving sleep
deprivation, stress, fear, and anxiety. This government agency spent
more than $30 million dollars on animal experiments in one year.²⁸

One of the most common ways of experimenting in the field of psychology
is to apply electric shocks to animals. This may be done with the aim of
finding out how animals react to various kinds of punishment or to train
animals to perform different tasks. In the first edition of this book I
described experiments conducted in the late Sixties and early Seventies
in which experimenters gave electric shocks to animals. Here is just one
example from that period:

O. S. Ray and R. J. Barrett, working in the psychology research unit of
the Veterans Administration Hospital, Pittsburgh, gave electric shocks
to the feet of 1,042 mice. They then caused convulsions by giving more
intense shocks through cup-shaped electrodes applied to the animals’
eyes or through clips attached to their ears. They reported that
unfortunately some of the mice who “successfully completed Day One
training were found sick or dead prior to testing on Day Two.”²⁹

Now, nearly twenty years later, as I write the second edition of this
book, experimenters are still dreaming up trifling new variations to try
out on animals: W. A. Hillex and M. R. Denny of the University of
California at San Diego placed rats in a maze and gave them electric
shocks if, after one incorrect choice, on their next trial they failed
to choose which way to go within three seconds. They concluded that the
“results are clearly reminiscent of the early work on fixation and
regression in the rat, in which the animals were typically shocked in
the stem of the T-maze just preceding the choice point.…” (In other
words, giving the rats electric shocks at the point in the maze at which
they had to choose, rather than before that point—the novel feature of
this particular experiment—made no significant difference.) The
experimenters then go on to cite work done in 1933, 1935, and other
years up to 1985.³⁰

The following experiment is simply an attempt to show that results
already known to occur in humans also apply to mice: Curt Spanis and
Larry Squire of the University of California, San Diego, used two
different types of shock in one experiment designed to examine how
“electroconvulsive shock” affects memory in mice. The mice were placed
in the light compartment of a chamber with two compartments, the other
one being dark. When the mice crossed over from the light compartment to
the dark compartment their feet were given an electric shock. After
“training,” the mice received “electroconvulsive shock treatment …
administered four times at 1-hour intervals … [and] seizures occurred in
each case.” The electroconvulsive shock treatment caused retrograde
amnesia, which lasted at least twenty-eight days. Spanis and Squire
concluded that this was the case because the mice did not remember to
avoid crossing over into the dark compartment, which caused them to
receive electric shocks. Spanis and Squire noted that their findings
were “consistent” with findings that Squire had already made in studies
based on psychiatric patients. They acknowledged that the results of the
experiment “cannot strongly support or reject” ideas about memory loss
because of the “high variability of the scores in the various groups.”
Nevertheless, they claim: “These findings extend the parallel between
experimental amnesia in laboratory animals and human amnesia.”³¹

In a similar experiment J. Patel and B. Migler, working at ICI Americas,
Inc., in Wilmington, Delaware, trained squirrel monkeys to press a lever
to obtain food pellets. The monkeys were then fitted with metal collars
around their necks, through which they were given electric shocks each
time they received a food pellet. They could avoid the shocks only if
they waited three hours before trying to obtain food. It took eight
weeks of training sessions, for six hours a day, for the monkeys to
learn to avoid shocks in this way. This was supposed to produce a
“conflict” situation, and the monkeys were then given various drugs to
test whether monkeys on the drugs would elicit more shocks. The
experimenters reported that they had also adapted the test for rats, and
that it would be “useful in identifying potential anti-anxiety
agents.”³²

Experiments in conditioning have been going on for over eighty-five
years. A report compiled in 1982 by the New York group United Action for
Animals found 1,425 papers on “classical conditioning experiments” on
animals. Ironically, the futility of much of this research is grimly
revealed by a paper published by a group of experimenters at the
University of Wisconsin. Susan Mineka and her colleagues subjected 140
rats to shocks that could be escaped and also subjected them to shocks
that could not be escaped in order to compare the levels of fear
generated by such different kinds of shocks. Here is the stated
rationale for their work:

Over the past 15 years an enormous amount of research has been directed
toward understanding the differential behavior and physiological effects
that stem from exposure to controllable as opposed to uncontrollable
aversive elements. The general conclusion has been that exposure to
uncontrollable aversive events is considerably more stressful for the
organism than is exposure to controllable aversive events.

After subjecting their rats to various intensities of electric shock,
sometimes allowing them the possibility of escape and sometimes not, the
experimenters were unable to determine what mechanisms could be
considered correct in accounting for their results. Nonetheless, they
said that they believed their results to be important because “they
raise some question about the validity of the conclusions of the
hundreds of experiments conducted over the past 15 years or so.”³³

In other words, fifteen years of giving electric shocks to animals may
not have produced valid results. But in the bizarre world of
psychological animal experiments, this finding serves as justification
for yet more experiments giving inescapable electric shock to yet more
animals so that “valid” results can finally be produced—and remember,
these “valid results” will still only apply to the behavior of trapped
animals subjected to inescapable electric shock.

An equally sad tale of futility is that of experiments designed to
produce what is known as “learned helplessness”—supposedly a model of
depression in human beings. In 1953 R. Solomon, L. Kamin, and L. Wynne,
experimenters at Harvard University, placed forty dogs in a device
called a “shuttlebox,” which consists of a box divided into two
compartments, separated by a barrier. Initially the barrier was set at
the height of the dog’s back. Hundreds of intense electric shocks were
delivered to the dogs’ feet through a grid floor. At first the dogs
could escape the shock if they learned to jump the barrier into the
other compartment. In an attempt to “discourage” one dog from jumping,
the experimenters forced the dog to jump one hundred times onto a grid
floor in the other compartment that also delivered a shock to the dog’s
feet. They said that as the dog jumped he gave a “sharp anticipatory yip
which turned into a yelp when he landed on the electrified grid.” They
then blocked the passage between the compartments with a piece of plate
glass and tested the dog again. The dog “jumped forward and smashed his
head against the glass.” The dogs began by showing symptoms such as
“defecation, urination, yelping and shrieking, trembling, attacking the
apparatus, and so on; but after ten or twelve days of trials dogs who
were prevented from escaping shock ceased to resist. The experimenters
reported themselves “impressed” by this, and concluded that a
combination of the plate glass barrier and foot shock was “very
effective” in eliminating jumping by dogs.³⁴

This study showed that it was possible to induce a state of hopelessness
and despair by repeated administration of severe inescapable shock. Such
“learned helplessness” studies were further refined in the 1960s. One
prominent experimenter was Martin Seligman of the University of
Pennsylvania. He electrically shocked dogs through a steel grid floor
with such intensity and persistence that the dogs stopped trying to
escape and “learned” to be helpless. In one study, written with
colleagues Steven Maier and James Geer, Seligman describes his work as
follows:

When a normal, naive dog receives escape/avoidance training in a
shuttlebox, the following behavior typically occurs: at the onset of
electric shock the dog runs frantically about, defecating, urinating,
and howling until it scrambles over the barrier and so escapes from
shock. On the next trial the dog, running and howling, crosses the
barrier more quickly, and so on, until efficient avoidance emerges.

Seligman altered this pattern by strapping dogs in harnesses and giving
them shocks from which they had no means of escape. When the dogs were
then placed in the original shuttlebox situation from which escape was
possible, he found that

such a dog reacts initially to shock in the shuttlebox in the same
manner as the naive dog. However in dramatic contrast to the naive dog
it soon stops running and remains silent until shock terminates. The dog
does not cross the barrier and escape from shock. Rather it seems to
“give up” and passively “accept” the shock. On succeeding trials the dog
continues to fail to make escape movements and thus takes 50 seconds of
severe, pulsating shock on each trial.… A dog previously exposed to
inescapable shock … may take unlimited shock without escaping or
avoiding at all.³⁵

In the 1980s, psychologists have continued to carry out these “learned
helplessness” experiments. At Temple University in Philadelphia, Philip
Bersh and three other experimenters trained rats to recognize a warning
light that alerted them to a shock that would be delivered within five
seconds. Once they understood the warning, the rats could avoid the
shock by moving into the safe compartment. After the rats had learned
this avoidance behavior, the experimenters walled off the safe chamber
and subjected them to prolonged periods of inescapable shock.
Predictably, they found that even after escape was possible, the rats
were unable to relearn the escape behavior quickly.³⁶

Bersh and colleagues also subjected 372 rats to aversive shock testing
to try to determine the relationship between Pavlovian conditioning and
learned helplessness. They reported that the “implications of these
findings for learned helplessness theory are not entirely clear” and
that “a substantial number of questions remain.”³⁷

At the University of Tennessee at Martin, G. Brown, P. Smith, and R.
Peters went to a lot of trouble to create a specially designed
shuttlebox for goldfish, perhaps to see if Seligman’s theory holds
water. The experimenters subjected forty-five fish to sixty-five shock
sessions each and concluded that “the data in the present study do not
provide much support for Seligman’s hypothesis that helplessness is
learned.”³⁸

These experiments have inflicted acute, prolonged pain on many animals,
first to prove a theory, then to disprove the theory, and finally to
support modified versions of the original theory. Steven Maier, who with
Seligman and Geer was a coauthor of the previously quoted report on
inducing learned helplessness in dogs, has made a career out of
perpetuating the learned helplessness model. Yet in a recent review
article, Maier had this to say about the validity of this “animal model”
of depression:

It can be argued that there is not enough agreement about the
characteristics, neurobiology, induction, and prevention/cure of
depression to make such comparison meaningful.… It would thus appear
unlikely that learned helplessness is a model of depression in any
general sense.³⁹

Although Maier tries to salvage something from this dismaying conclusion
by saying that learned helplessness may constitute a model not of
depression but of “stress and coping,” he has effectively admitted that
more than thirty years of animal experimentation have been a waste of
time and of substantial amounts of taxpayers’ money, quite apart from
the immense amount of acute physical pain that they have caused.

In the first edition of this book, I reported on an experiment performed
at Bowling Green University in Ohio by P. Badia and two colleagues, and
published in 1973. In that experiment ten rats were tested in sessions
that were six hours long, during which frequent shock was “at all times
unavoidable and inescapable.” The rats could press either of two levers
within the test chamber in order to receive warning of a coming shock.
The experimenters concluded that the rats did prefer to be warned of a
shock.⁴⁰ In 1984 the same experiment was still being carried out.
Because someone had suggested that the previous experiment could have
been “methodologically unsound,” P. Badia, this time with B. Abbott of
Indiana University, placed ten rats in electrified chambers, subjecting
them again to six-hour shock sessions. Six rats received inescapable
shock at intervals of one minute, sometimes preceded by a warning. Then
they were allowed to press one of two levers to receive either shocks
that were preceded by a warning signal or unsignaled shocks. The
remaining four rats were used in a variation of this experiment,
receiving shocks at two-minute and four-minute intervals. The
experimenters found, once again, that the rats preferred shock that was
signaled, even if it resulted in their receiving more shocks.⁴¹

Electric shock has also been used to produce aggressive behavior in
animals. In one study at the University of Iowa, Richard Viken and John
Knutson divided 160 rats into groups and “trained” them in a stainless
steel cage with an electrified floor. Pairs of rats were given electric
shocks until they learned to fight by striking out at the other rat
while facing each other in an upright position or by biting. It took an
average of thirty training trials before the rats learned to do this
immediately on the first shock. The researchers then placed the
shock-trained rats in the cage of untrained rats and recorded their
behavior. After one day, all the rats were killed, shaved, and examined
for wounds. The experimenters concluded that their “results were not
useful in understanding the offensive or defensive nature of the
shock-induced response.”⁴²

At Kenyon College in Ohio, J. Williams and D. Lierle performed a series
of three experiments to study the effects that stress control had on
defensive behavior. The first experiment was based on the assumption
that uncontrollable shock enhances fear. Sixteen rats were placed in
plexiglass tubes and were given inescapable electric shocks to their
tails. They were then placed as intruders into an already established
colony of rats and their interactions with the others were recorded. In
the second experiment, twenty-four rats were able to control the shock
through training. In the third experiment, thirty-two rats were exposed
to inescapable shock and controllable shock. The experimenters
concluded:

Although these findings and our theoretical formulations emphasize the
interrelationships among shock controllability, the predictability of
shock termination, conditioned stress cues, fear, and defensive
behavior, further experimentation is necessary to examine the precise
nature of these complex interactions.⁴³

This report, published in 1986, cited earlier experimental work in this
field going back to 1948.

At the University of Kansas, a unit calling itself the Bureau of Child
Research has been inflicting electric shock on a variety of animals. In
one experiment, Shetland ponies were deprived of water until they were
thirsty and then given a water bowl that could be electrified. Two
loudspeakers were placed on either side of the ponies’ heads. When noise
came from the left speaker, the bowl was electrified and the ponies
received an electric shock if they were drinking. They learned to stop
drinking when they heard the noise from the left speaker, but not from
the right. Then the speakers were moved closer together, until the
ponies could no longer distinguish between them and so could not avoid
shock. The researchers pointed to similar experiments on white rats,
kangaroo rats, wood rats, hedgehogs, dogs, cats, monkeys, opossums,
seals, dolphins, and elephants, and concluded that ponies have great
difficulty in distinguishing the direction of noises as compared with
other animals.⁴⁴

It is not easy to see how this research is going to benefit children.
Indeed, in general, what is so disturbing about the examples of research
given above is that despite the suffering the animals have gone through,
the results obtained, even as reported by the experimenters themselves,
are trivial, obvious, or meaningless. The conclusions of the experiments
cited above show, clearly enough, that experimental psychologists have
put a lot of effort into telling us in scientific jargon what we knew
all along, and what we could have found out in less harmful ways with a
little thought—and these experiments were supposedly more significant
than others that did not get published.

We have looked at only a very small number of psychology experiments
that involve electric shock. According to the Office of Technology
Assessment report,

A survey of the 608 articles appearing from 1979 through 1983 in the
American Psychological Association journals that typically publish
animal research identified 10 percent of the studies as using electric
shock.⁴⁵

Many other journals not associated with the American Psychological
Association also publish reports of animal studies that have used
electric shock; and we must not forget the experiments that never get
published at all. And this is only one kind of painful or distressing
research carried out on animals within the field of psychology. We have
already looked at maternal deprivation studies; but one could fill
several books with brief descriptions of yet more kinds of psychological
experimentation, such as abnormal behavior, animal models of
schizophrenia, animal movements, body maintenance, cognition,
communication, predator-prey relations, motivation and emotion,
sensation and perception, and sleep, food, and water deprivation. We
have considered but a few of the tens of thousands of experiments
performed annually in the field of psychology, but they should be enough
to show that many, many experiments still being conducted cause great
pain to animals and offer no prospect of yielding really momentous or
vital new knowledge. Unfortunately, animals have become, for the
psychologist and for other experimenters, mere tools. A laboratory may
consider the cost of these “tools,” but a certain callousness toward
them becomes apparent, not only in the experiments performed but also in
the wording of the reports. Consider, for instance, Harlow and Suomi’s
mention of their “rape rack” and the jocular tone in which they report
on the “favorite tricks” of the female monkeys born as a result of its
use.

Detachment is made easier by the use of technical jargon that disguises
the real nature of what is going on. Psychologists, under the influence
of the behaviorist doctrine that only what can be observed should be
mentioned, have developed a considerable collection of terms that refer
to pain without appearing to do so. Alice Heim, one of the few
psychologists who has spoken out against the pointless animal
experimentation of her colleagues, describes it this way:

The work on “animal behavior” is always expressed in scientific,
hygienic-sounding terminology, which enables the indoctrination of the
normal, non-sadistic young psychology student to proceed without his
anxiety being aroused. Thus techniques of “extinction” are used for what
is in fact torturing by thirst or near starvation or electric-shocking;
“partial reinforcement” is the term for frustrating an animal by only
occasionally fulfilling the expectations which the experimenter has
aroused in the animal by previous training; “negative stimulus” is the
term used for subjecting an animal to a stimulus which he avoids, if
possible. The term “avoidance” is O.K. because it is an observable
activity. The term “painful” or “frightening” stimulus are less O.K.
since they are anthropomorphic, they imply that the animal has
feelings—and that these may be similar to human feelings. This is not
allowable because it is non-behavioristic and unscientific (and also
because this might deter the younger and less hard-boiled researcher
from pursuing certain ingenious experiments. He might allow a little
play to his imagination). The cardinal sin for the experimental
psychologist working in the field of “animal behavior” is
anthropomorphism. Yet if he did not believe in the analogue of the human
being and the lower animal even he, presumably, would find his work
largely unjustified.⁴⁶

We can see the kind of jargon to which Heim refers in the reports of
experiments I have already cited. Note that even when Seligman feels
compelled to say that the subjects of his experiments “gave up” trying
to escape shock, he finds it necessary to place the term in quotation
marks, as if to say that he is not really imputing any kind of mental
processes to the dog. Yet the logical consequence of this view of
“scientific method” is that experiments on animals cannot teach us
anything about human beings. Amazing as it may seem, some psychologists
have been so concerned to avoid anthropomorphism that they have accepted
this conclusion. This attitude is illustrated by the following
autobiographical statement, which appeared in _New Scientist_:

When fifteen years ago I applied to do a degree course in psychology, a
steely-eyed interviewer, himself a psychologist, questioned me closely
on my motives and asked me what I believed psychology to be and what was
its principal subject matter? Poor naive simpleton that I was, I replied
that it was the study of the mind and that human beings were its raw
material. With a glad cry at being able to deflate me so effectively,
the interviewer declared that psychologists were not interested in the
mind, that rats were the golden focus of study, not people, and then he
advised me strongly to trot around to the philosophy department next
door.…⁴⁷

Perhaps not many psychologists would now proudly state that their work
has nothing to do with the human mind. Nevertheless many of the
experiments that are performed on rats can only be explained by assuming
that the experimenters really are interested in the behavior of the rat
for its own sake, without any thought of learning anything about humans.
In that case, though, what possible justification can there be for the
infliction of so much suffering? It is certainly not for the benefit of
the rat.

So the researcher’s central dilemma exists in an especially acute form
in psychology: either the animal is not like us, in which case there is
no reason for performing the experiment; or else the animal is like us,
in which case we ought not to perform on the animal an experiment that
would be considered outrageous if performed on one of us.

Another major field of experimentation involves the poisoning of
millions of animals annually. Often this too is done for trivial
reasons. In Britain in 1988, 588,997 scientific procedures were
performed on animals to test drugs and other materials; of these,
281,358 were not related to the testing of medical or veterinary
products.⁴⁸ In the United States no accurate figures are available, but
if the proportion is similar to Britain the number of animals used in
testing must be at least three million. In fact it is probably double or
triple that figure, because there is so much research and development in
this field in the United States and the Food and Drug Administration
requires extensive testing of new substances before they are released.
It may be thought justifiable to require tests on animals of potentially
life-saving drugs, but the same kinds of tests are used for products
like cosmetics, food coloring, and floor polishes. Should thousands of
animals suffer so that a new kind of lipstick or floor wax can be put on
the market? Don’t we already have an excess of most of these products?
Who benefits from their introduction, except the companies that hope to
profit from them?

In fact, even when the test is carried out on a medical product, it is
most probably not going to do anything to improve our health. Scientists
working for the British Department of Health and Social Security
examined drugs marketed in Britain between 1971 and 1981. New drugs,
they found,

have largely been introduced into therapeutic areas already heavily
oversubscribed … for conditions which are common, largely chronic and
occur principally in the affluent Western Society. Innovation is
therefore largely directed towards commercial returns rather than
therapeutic need.⁴⁹

To appreciate what is involved in introducing all these new products it
is necessary to know something about the standard methods of testing. In
order to determine how poisonous a substance is, “acute oral toxicity
tests” are performed. These tests, developed in the 1920s, force animals
to ingest substances, including nonedible products such as lipstick and
paper. Often the animals will not eat the substance if it is simply
placed in their food, so experimenters either force-feed the animals by
mouth or insert a tube down their throats. Standard tests are carried
out for fourteen days but some may last for up to six months—if the
animals survive that long. During this time, the animals often display
classic symptoms of poisoning, including vomiting, diarrhea, paralysis,
convulsions, and internal bleeding.

The most widely known acute toxicity test is the LD50. LD50 stands for
“lethal dose 50 percent”: the amount of the substance that will kill
half of the animals in the study. To find that dose level, sample groups
of animals are poisoned. Normally, before the point at which half of
them die is reached, the animals are all very ill and in obvious
distress. In the case of fairly harmless substances it is still
considered good procedure to find the concentration that will make half
the animals die; consequently enormous quantities have to be force-fed
to the animals, and death may be caused merely by the large volume or
high concentration given to the animals. This has no relevance to the
circumstances in which humans will use the product. Since the very point
of these experiments is to measure how much of the substance will poison
half the animals to death, dying animals are not put out of their misery
for fear of producing inaccurate results. The U.S. Congress Office of
Technology Assessment has estimated that “several million” animals are
used each year for toxicological testing in the United States. No more
specific estimates for the LD50 test are available.⁵⁰

Cosmetics and other substances are tested in animals’ eyes. The Draize
eye irritancy tests were first used in the 1940s, when J. H. Draize,
working for the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, developed a scale for
assessing how irritating a substance is when placed in rabbits’ eyes.
The animals are usually placed in holding devices from which only their
heads protrude. This prevents them scratching or rubbing their eyes. A
test substance (such as bleach, shampoo, or ink) is then placed in one
eye of each rabbit. The method used is to pull out the lower eyelid and
place the substance into the small “cup” thus formed. The eye is then
held closed. Sometimes the application is repeated. The rabbits are
observed daily for eye swelling, ulceration, infection, and bleeding.
The studies can last up to three weeks. One researcher employed by a
large chemical company has described the highest level of reaction as
follows:

Total loss of vision due to serious internal injury to cornea or
internal structure. Animal holds eye shut urgently. May squeal, claw at
eye, jump and try to escape.⁵¹

But, of course, when in the holding device the rabbits can neither claw
at their eyes nor escape (see photograph following page 157). Some
substances cause such serious damage that the rabbits’ eyes lose all
distinguishing characteristics—the iris, pupil, and cornea begin to
resemble one massive infection. Experimenters are not obliged to use
anesthetics, but sometimes they will use a small amount of topical
anesthetic when introducing the substance, provided it does not
interfere with the test. This does nothing to alleviate the pain that
can result after two weeks of having oven cleaner in the eye. U.S.
Department of Agriculture figures show that, in 1983, toxicology testing
laboratories used 55,785 rabbits, and chemical companies an additional
22,034. It can be assumed that many of these were used for Draize tests,
although no estimate of the number is available.⁵²

Animals are also subjected to other tests to determine the toxicity of
many substances. During inhalation studies, animals are placed in sealed
chambers and forced to inhale sprays, gases, and vapors. In dermal
toxicity studies, rabbits have their fur removed so that a test
substance can be placed on their skin. The animals are restrained so
that they do not scratch at their irritated bodies. The skin may bleed,
blister, and peel. Immersion studies, in which animals are placed in
vats of diluted substances, sometimes cause the animals to drown before
any test results can be obtained. In injection studies, the test
substance is injected directly into the animal, either under the skin,
into the muscles, or directly into an organ.

These are the standard procedures. Here are two examples of how they are
carried out:

In England, the Huntingdon Research Institute, together with the giant
corporation ICI, carried out experiments in which forty monkeys were
poisoned with the weed-killer paraquat. They became very ill, vomited,
had difficulty in breathing, and suffered from hypothermia. They died
slowly, over several days. It was already known that paraquat poisoning
in humans results in a slow and agonizing death.⁵³

We began this chapter with some military experiments. Here is a military
experiment involving an LD50 test:

Experimenters at the U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious
Diseases poisoned rats with T-2. This is a poison which, according to
the Department of State, has “the added advantage of being an effective
terror weapon that causes bizarre and horrifying symptoms” such as
“severe bleeding,” blisters, and vomiting, so that humans and animals
may be “killed in a gruesome manner.” The T-2 was administered
intramuscularly, intravenously, subcutaneously, interperitoneally—i.e.,
injected into the muscle tissue, into the veins, under the skin, and
into the lining of the abdomen—and through the nose and mouth, and on
the skin. All eight tests were to determine LD50 values. Death usually
occurred between nine and eighteen hours after exposure, but the rats
exposed through the skin took an average of six days to die. Before
death the animals were unable to walk or eat, had rotting of the skin
and intestines, restlessness, and diarrhea. The experimenters reported
that their findings were “quite compatible with earlier published
studies of subacute and chronic exposure to T-2.”⁵⁴

As this example illustrates, it is not only products intended for human
consumption that are tested. Chemical warfare agents, pesticides, and
all kinds of industrial and household goods are fed to animals or put in
their eyes. A reference book, _Clinical Toxicology of Commercial
Products_, provides data, mostly from animal experiments, on how
poisonous hundreds of commercial products are. The products include
insecticides, antifreeze, brake fluid, bleaches, Christmas tree sprays,
church candles, oven cleaners, deodorants, skin fresheners, bubble
baths, depilatories, eye makeup, fire extinguishers, inks, sun-tan oils,
nail polish, mascara, hair sprays, paints, and zipper lubricants.⁵⁵

Many scientists and physicians have criticized this type of testing,
pointing out that the results are inapplicable to human beings. Dr.
Christopher Smith, a physician from Long Beach, California, has said:

The results of these tests cannot be used to predict toxicity or to
guide therapy in human exposure. As a board-certified emergency medicine
physician with over 17 years of experience in the treatment of
accidental poisoning and toxic exposures, I know of no instance in which
an emergency physician has used Draize test data to aid in the
management of an eye injury. I have never used results from animal tests
to manage accidental poisoning. Emergency physicians rely on case
reports, clinical experience and experimental data from clinical trials
in humans when determining the optimal course of treatment for their
patients.⁵⁶

Toxicologists have known for a long time that extrapolation from one
species to another is a highly risky venture. The most notorious drug to
have caused unexpected harm to humans is thalidomide—which was
extensively tested on animals before it was released. Even after
thalidomide was suspected of causing deformities in humans, laboratory
tests on pregnant dogs, cats, rats, monkeys, hamsters, and chickens all
failed to produce deformities. Only when a particular strain of rabbit
was tried were deformities produced.⁵⁷ More recently, Opren passed all
the usual animal tests before it was released and extensively touted as
a new “wonder drug” for the treatment of arthritis by its manufacturer,
the pharmaceutical giant Eli Lilly. Opren was suspended from use in
Britain after sixty-one deaths and over 3,500 reports of adverse
reactions. A report in _New Scientist_ estimated that the real toll
could have been much higher.⁵⁸ Other drugs that were considered safe
after animal tests but later proved harmful are the heart disease drug
Practolol, which caused blindness, and the cough suppressant Zipeprol,
which produced seizures and comas in some of those who took it.⁵⁹

As well as exposing people to harm, testing on animals may lead us to
miss out on valuable products that are dangerous to animals but not to
human beings. Insulin can produce deformities in infant rabbits and
mice, but not in humans.⁶⁰ Morphine, which is calming to human beings,
causes mice to go into drug frenzies. And as another toxicologist has
said: “If penicillin had been judged by its toxicity on guinea pigs, it
might never have been used on man.”⁶¹

After decades of mindless animal testing, there are now some signs of
second thoughts. As Dr. Elizabeth Whelan, a scientist and executive
director of the American Council on Science and Health, has pointed out:
“It doesn’t take a Ph.D. in the sciences to grasp the fact that rodent
exposure to the saccharin equivalent of 1,800 bottles of soda pop a day
doesn’t relate well to our daily ingestion of a few glasses of the
stuff.” Whelan has welcomed the fact that officials at the Environmental
Protection Agency recently downgraded earlier estimates of risks of
pesticides and other environmental chemicals, noting that the evaluation
of cancer risk, derived from animal extrapolation, was based on
“simplistic” assumptions that “strain credibility.” This means, she
says, that “our regulators are beginning to take note of the scientific
literature rejecting the infallibility of the laboratory animal test.”⁶²

The American Medical Association has also admitted that animal models
have questionable accuracy. An AMA representative testified at a
congressional hearing on drug testing that “frequently animal studies
prove little or nothing and are very difficult to correlate to
humans.”⁶³

Fortunately much progress has been made in eliminating such animal
testing since the first edition of this book appeared. Most scientists
then did not take seriously the possibility that effective substitutes
could be found for tests that use animals to measure toxicity. They were
persuaded to do so by the hard work of a large number of opponents of
animal experiments. Prominent among them was Henry Spira, a former civil
rights activist who put together coalitions against the Draize and LD50
tests. The Coalition to Abolish the Draize Test began by inviting
Revlon, as the largest cosmetics company in the United States, to put
one tenth of one percent of its profits toward developing an alternative
to the Draize test. When Revlon declined, full-page advertisements
appeared in _The New York Times_ asking “HOW MANY RABBITS DOES REVLON
BLIND FOR BEAUTY’S SAKE?”⁶⁴ People in rabbit costumes appeared at
Revlon’s annual general meeting. Revlon got the message and allocated
the requested funds to pay for research on alternatives to animal
experiments. Other companies, such as Avon and Bristol-Myers, followed
suit.⁶⁵ As a result, early British work in this field by the Fund for
the Replacement of Animals in Medical Experiments was taken up on a
larger scale in the United States, especially at the Johns Hopkins
Center for Alternatives to Animal Testing, in Baltimore. Increasing
interest led to the launching of several major new journals, such as
_In-Vitro Toxicology, Cell Biology and Toxicology_, and _Toxicology in
Vitro_.

It took some time for this work to show results, but gradually the
interest in alternatives grew. Corporations such as Avon, Bristol-Myers,
Mobil, and Procter & Gamble began using alternatives in their own
laboratories, thus reducing the number of animals used. Toward the end
of 1988, the rate of change began to quicken. In November, an
international campaign against Benetton led by the Washington, D.C.,
organization People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals persuaded the
fashion chain to stop using animal tests in its cosmetics division.⁶⁶ In
December 1988 Noxell Corporation, manufacturer of Noxzema skin creams
and Cover Girl cosmetics, announced that it would use a screening test
that would reduce by 80 to 90 percent the number of animals otherwise
used for eye safety testing; subsequently Noxell stated that it used no
animals at all in safety tests during the first half of 1989.⁶⁷

Now the momentum was building fast. In April 1989, Avon announced that
it had validated tests using a specially developed synthetic material
called Eytex as a replacement for the Draize test. As a result, nine
years after Spira began his campaign Avon ceased to use the Draize
test.⁶⁸ Still more good news was to come. In May 1989 both Mary Kay
Cosmetics and Amway announced that they had ceased to use laboratory
animals for consumer product safety testing while they reviewed plans
for using alternatives.⁶⁹ In June, Avon, under pressure from another
campaign led by People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals, announced a
permanent end to all animal testing.⁷⁰ Eight days after the Avon
announcement, Revlon said that it had completed its long-term plan to
eliminate animal testing in all phases of research, development, and
manufacturing of all its products, and therefore it was ending animal
testing. Then Fabergé abandoned the use of animals for testing in its
cosmetics and toiletries business. Thus within a few months (though on
the basis of many years of work) the first, second, and fourth largest
United States cosmetics companies had given up all animal testing.⁷¹

Although the most dramatic developments have taken place in the highly
public and therefore relatively vulnerable cosmetics industry, the
movement against animal testing is also taking effect in wider areas of
industry. As a report in _Science_ put it:

Prodded by the animal welfare movement, major manufacturers of
pharmaceuticals, pesticides and household products have made significant
advances in recent years toward the goal of reducing the number of
animals used in toxicity testing. Alternative methods, such as cell and
tissue culture and computer modeling, are increasingly being seen not
just as good public relations but as desirable both economically and
scientifically.⁷²

The report went on to quote Gary Flamm, director of the Food and Drug
Administration Office of Toxicology Sciences, as saying that the LD50
“should be replaceable in the vast majority of cases.” A _New York
Times_ article quoted a senior toxicologist at G. D. Searle and Company
as admitting that “an awful lot of the points made by the animal welfare
movement are extreme but right.”⁷³

There seems to be little doubt that as a result of all these
developments, an immense amount of needless pain and suffering has been
avoided.⁷⁴ Precisely how much is hard to say, but millions of animals
would have suffered each year in tests that will now not be performed.
The tragedy is that if only the toxicologists, the corporations, and the
regulatory agencies had cared more about the animals they were using,
millions of animals could have been spared acute pain. It was not until
the Animal Liberation movement began to make people aware of the issue
that those in charge of the testing business really thought about animal
suffering. The most callous, stupid things were done just because
regulations required them; and no one bothered to try to change the
regulations. It was not until 1983, for example, that U.S. federal
agencies stated that substances known to be caustic irritants, such as
lye, ammonia, and oven cleaners, did not need to be tested on the eyes
of conscious rabbits.⁷⁵ But the battle is by no means over. To quote
once more from the report in _Science_ of April 17, 1987:

Unnecessary testing is still wasting a lot of animals, not only because
of outmoded requirements but because much existing information is not
easily accessible. Theodore M. Farber, director of the [U.S.
Environmental Protection Agency’s] Toxicology Branch said that his
agency has files of 42,000 completed tests, and 16,000 LD50 tests. He
said these could be of far more use in eliminating redundant tests if
they were computerized for easy accessibility. “Many of us in regulatory
toxicology see the same studies over and over again,” said Farber.

Stopping this waste of animal lives and animal pain should not be
difficult, if people really want to do it. Developing completely
adequate alternatives to all tests for toxicity will take longer, but it
should be possible. Meanwhile there is a simple way to cut down the
amount of suffering involved in such tests. Until we have developed
satisfactory alternatives, as a first step we should just do without any
new but potentially hazardous substances that are not essential to our
lives.

When experiments can be brought under the heading “medical” we are
inclined to think that any suffering they involve must be justifiable
because the research is contributing to the alleviation of suffering.
But we have already seen that the testing of therapeutic drugs is less
likely to be motivated by the desire for maximum good to all than by the
desire for maximum profit. The broad label “medical research” can also
be used to cover research that is motivated by a general intellectual
curiosity. Such curiosity may be acceptable as part of a basic search
for knowledge when it involves no suffering, but should not be tolerated
if it causes pain. Very often, too, basic medical research has been
going on for decades and much of it, in the long run, turns out to have
been quite pointless. As an illustration, consider the following series
of experiments stretching back nearly a century, on the effects of heat
on animals:

In 1880 H. C. Wood placed a number of animals in boxes with glass lids
and placed the boxes on a brick pavement on a hot day. He used rabbits,
pigeons, and cats. His observations on a rabbit are typical. At a
temperature of 109.5 degrees Fahrenheit the rabbit jumps and “kicks hind
legs with great fury.” The rabbit then has a convulsive attack. At 112
degrees Fahrenheit the animal lies on its side slobbering. At 120
degrees Fahrenheit it is gasping and squealing weakly. Soon after it
dies.⁷⁶

In 1881 a report appeared in _The Lancet_ on dogs and rabbits whose
temperatures had been raised to 113 degrees Fahrenheit. It was found
that death could be prevented by cool air currents, and the results were
said to indicate “the importance of keeping down the temperature in
those cases in which it exhibits a tendency to rise to [an] extreme
height.”⁷⁷

In 1927 W. W. Hall and E. G. Wakefield of the U.S. Naval Medical School
placed ten dogs in a hot humid chamber to produce experimental
heatstroke. The animals first showed restlessness, breathing
difficulties, swelling and congestion of the eyes, and thirst. Some had
convulsions. Some died early in the experiment. Those who did not had
severe diarrhea and died after removal from the chamber.⁷⁸

In 1954 at Yale University School of Medicine, M. Lennox, W. Sibley, and
H. Zimmerman placed thirty-two kittens in a “radiant-heating” chamber.
The kittens were “subjected to a total of 49 heating periods.…
Struggling was common, particularly as the temperature rose.”
Convulsions occurred on nine occasions: “Repeated convulsions were the
rule.” As many as thirty convulsions occurred in rapid sequence. Five
kittens died during convulsions, and six without convulsions. The other
kittens were killed by the experimenters for autopsies. The
experimenters reported: “The findings in artificially induced fever in
kittens conform to the clinical and EEG findings in human beings and
previous clinical findings in kittens.”⁷⁹

The following experiment was performed at the K. G. Medical College,
Lucknow, India. I include it as an example of the triumph of Western
methods of research and attitudes to animals over the ancient tradition
of Hinduism, which has more respect for nonhuman animals than the
Judeo-Christian tradition. In 1968 K. Wahal, A. Kumar, and P. Nath
exposed forty-six rats to high temperature for four hours. The rats
became restless, breathed with difficulty, and salivated profusely. One
animal died during the experiment and the others were killed by the
experimenters because “they could not survive anyway.”⁸⁰

In 1969 S. Michaelson, a veterinarian at the University of Rochester,
exposed dogs and rabbits to heat-producing microwaves until their
temperatures reached the critical level of 107 degrees Fahrenheit or
greater. He observed that dogs start panting shortly after microwave
exposure begins. Most “display increased activity varying from
restlessness to extreme agitation.” Near the point of death, weakness
and prostration occur. In the case of rabbits “within 5 minutes,
desperate attempts are made to escape the cage,” and the rabbits die
within forty minutes. Michaelson concluded that an increase in heat from
microwaves produces damage “indistinguishable from fever in general.”⁸¹

At the Heller Institute of Medical Research, Tel Aviv, Israel, in
experiments published in 1971 and paid for by the United States Public
Health Service, T. Rosenthal, Y. Shapiro, and others placed thirty-three
dogs “randomly procured from the local dog pound” in a
temperature-controlled chamber and forced them to exercise on a
treadmill in temperatures as high as 113 degrees Fahrenheit until “they
collapsed in heatstroke or reached a predetermined rectal temperature.”
Twenty-five of the dogs died. Nine more dogs were then subjected to a
temperature of 122 degrees Fahrenheit without treadmill exercise. Only
two of these dogs survived longer than twenty-four hours, and autopsies
showed that all had hemorrhaged. The experimenters concluded: “The
findings are in accordance with what is reported in the literature on
humans.”⁸² In a further report published in 1973, the same researchers
describe experiments on fifty-three dogs, involving various combinations
of heat and treadmill exercise. Six of the dogs vomited, eight had
diarrhea, four went into convulsions, twelve lost muscle coordination,
and all salivated excessively. Of ten dogs whose rectal temperature
reached 113 degrees Fahrenheit, five died “at the moment of maximum
rectal temperature” and the other five died between thirty minutes and
eleven hours after the end of the experiment. The experimenters
concluded that “the sooner the heatstroke victim’s temperature is
brought down, the greater the chances of recovery.”⁸³

In 1984 experimenters working for the Federal Aviation Administration,
stating that “animals occasionally die from heat stress encountered
during shipping in the nation’s transportation systems,” subjected ten
beagles to experimental heat. The dogs were isolated in chambers, fitted
with muzzles, and exposed to 95 degrees Fahrenheit combined with high
humidity. They were given no food or water, and were kept in these
conditions for twenty-four hours. The behavior of the dogs was observed;
it included “deliberate agitated activity such as pawing at the crate
walls, continuous circling, tossing of the head to shed the muzzle,
rubbing the muzzle back and forth on the floor of the crate, and
aggressive acts on the sensor guards.” Some of the dogs died in the
chambers. When the survivors were removed, some vomited blood, and all
were weak and exhausted. The experimenters refer to “subsequent
experiments on more than 100 beagles.”⁸⁴

In a further example of military experimentation, R. W. Hubbard, of the
U.S. Army Research Institute of Environmental Medicine in Natick,
Massachusetts, has been publishing papers with titles such as “Rat Model
of Acute Heatstroke Mortality” for more than a decade. It is well known
that when rats are hot they spread saliva over their bodies; the saliva
plays the same cooling role as sweating in humans. In 1982 Hubbard and
two colleagues noted that rats unable to produce saliva will spread
urine if no other fluid is available.⁸⁵ So in 1985 the same three
researchers, joined by a fourth, injected rats with the drug atropine,
which inhibits both sweating and the secretion of saliva. Other rats had
their salivary glands removed by surgery. The experimenters then placed
the rats in chambers at 107 degrees Fahrenheit until their body
temperature rose to 108.7 degrees Fahrenheit. The researchers drew
diagrams comparing the “urine spreading pattern” of a rat who had either
been given atropine or had been surgically “desalivated” with that of an
untreated rat. They found the “atropinized heat-stressed rat model” to
be “a promising tool with which to examine the role of dehydration in
heat illness.”⁸⁶

Here we have cited a series of experiments going back into the
nineteenth century—and I have had space sufficient to include only a
fraction of the published literature. The experiments obviously caused
great suffering; and the major finding seems to be the advice that
heatstroke victims should be cooled—something that seems to be fairly
elementary common sense and in any case had already been borne out by
observations on human beings who have suffered natural heatstroke. As
for the application of this research to human beings, B. W. Zweifach
showed in 1961 that dogs are physiologically different from human beings
in ways that affect their response to heatstroke, and hence they are a
poor model for heatstroke in human beings.⁸⁷ It is hard to take
seriously the suggestion that small furry animals drugged with atropine
who spread urine over themselves when hot will be a better model.

Similar series of experiments are to be found in many other fields of
medicine. In the New York City offices of United Action for Animals
there are filing cabinets full of photocopies of experiments reported in
the journals. Each thick file contains reports on numerous experiments,
often fifty or more, and the labels on the files tell their own story:
“Acceleration,” “Aggression,” “Asphyxiation,” “Blinding,” “Burning,”
“Centrifuge,” “Compression,” “Concussion,” “Crowding,” “Crushing,”
“Decompression,” “Drug Tests,” “Experimental Neurosis,” “Freezing,”
“Heating,” “Hemorrhage,” “Hindleg Beating,” “Immobilization,”
“Isolation,” “Multiple Injuries,” “Prey Killing,” “Protein Deprivation,”
“Punishment,” “Radiation,” “Starvation,” “Shock,” “Spinal Cord
Injuries,” “Stress,” “Thirst,” and many more. While some of the
experiments may have led to advances in medical knowledge, the value of
this knowledge is often questionable, and in some cases the knowledge
might have been gained in other ways. Many of the experiments appear to
be trivial or misconceived, and some of them were not even designed to
yield important benefits.

Consider, as another example of the way in which endless variations of
the same or similar experiments are carried out, these experiments
relating to the experimental production of shock in animals (by which is
meant not electric shock but the mental and physical state of shock that
often occurs after a severe injury). As long ago as 1946 a researcher in
the field, Magnus Gregersen of Columbia University, surveyed the
literature and found over eight hundred published papers dealing with
experimental studies of shock. He describes the methods used to induce
shock:

The use of a tourniquet on one or more extremities, crush, compression,
muscle trauma by contusion with light hammer blows, Noble-Collip drum [a
device in which animals are placed and the drum rotated; the animals
tumble repeatedly to the bottom of the drum and injure themselves],
gunshot wounds, strangulation or intestinal loops, freezing, and burns.

Gregersen also notes that hemorrhage has been “widely employed” and “an
increasing number of these studies has been done without the
complicating factor of anesthesia.” He is not, however, pleased by all
this diversity, and complains that the variety of methods makes it
“exceedingly difficult” to evaluate the results of different
researchers; there is, he says, a “crying need” for standardized
procedures that will invariably produce a state of shock.⁸⁸

Eight years later the situation had not changed much. S. M. Rosenthal
and R. C. Millican wrote that “animal investigations in the field of
traumatic shock have yielded diversified and often contradictory
results.” Nevertheless they looked forward to “future experimentation in
this field” and like Gregersen they discouraged the use of anesthesia:
“The influence of anesthesia is controversial … [and] in the reviewers’
opinion prolonged anesthesia is best avoided.…” They also recommended
that “adequate numbers of animals must be employed to overcome
biological variations.”⁸⁹

In 1974 experimenters were still working on “animal models” of
experimental shock, still carrying out preliminary experiments to
determine what injuries might be inflicted to produce a satisfactory
“standard” state of shock. After decades of experiments designed to
produce shock in dogs by causing them to hemorrhage, more recent studies
indicated that (surprise!) hemorrhage-induced shock in dogs is not like
shock in humans. Noting these studies, researchers at the University of
Rochester caused hemorrhage in pigs, which they think may be more like
humans in this respect, to determine what volume of blood loss might be
suitable for the production of experimental shock.⁹⁰

Hundreds of experiments are also performed annually in which animals are
forced to become addicted to drugs. On cocaine alone, for example, over
500 studies have been conducted. An analysis of just 380 of these
estimated that they cost about $100 million, most of it tax money.⁹¹
Here is one example:

In a laboratory at Downstate Medical Center run by Gerald Deneau, rhesus
monkeys were locked into restraining chairs. The animals were then
taught to self-administer cocaine directly into the bloodstream in
whatever quantities they wanted by pushing a button. According to one
report,

the test monkeys pushed the button over and over, even after
convulsions. They went without sleep. They ate five to six times their
normal amount, yet became emaciated.… In the end, they began to mutilate
themselves and, eventually, died of cocaine abuse.

Dr. Deneau has acknowledged that “few people could afford the massive
doses of cocaine these monkeys were able to obtain.”⁹²

Even though five hundred animal experiments have been conducted
involving cocaine, this is only a small part of the total amount of
experimentation that involves turning animals into addicts. In the first
edition of this book I reported on a similar set of addiction
experiments, using morphine and amphetamines. Here are some more recent
examples:

At the University of Kentucky, beagles were used to observe withdrawal
symptoms from Valium and a similar tranquillizer called Lorazepam. The
dogs were forced to become addicted to the drug and then, every two
weeks, the tranquillizers were withdrawn. Withdrawal symptoms included
twitches, jerks, gross body tremors, running fits, rapid weight loss,
fear, and cowering. After forty hours of Valium withdrawal, “numerous
tonic-clonic convulsions were seen in seven of nine dogs.… Two dogs had
repeated episodes of clonic seizures involving the whole body.” Four of
the dogs died—two while convulsing and two after rapid weight loss.
Lorazepam produced similar symptoms but not convulsive deaths. The
experimenters reviewed experiments going back to 1931 in which
barbiturate and tranquillizer withdrawal symptoms had been observed in
rats, cats, dogs, and primates.⁹³

After reviewing the history of experiments showing that “withdrawal-like
effects can occur following single administrations of opiates in several
species,” including dogs, mice, monkeys, and rats, D. M. Grilly and G.
C. Gowans of Cleveland State University proceeded to test a hypothesis
that morphine withdrawal produces hypersensitivity to pain. Rats were
trained by a procedure that involved an average of 6,387 training trials
in “shock discrimination.” In these trials, the rats had to respond to
receiving an electric shock. The rats were then injected with morphine
and exposed to electric shocks one, two, three, and seven days after.
The experimenters noted that sensitivity to shock was elevated during
the days immediately following morphine administration.⁹⁴

Here is an even more bizarre example of drug research:

At the University of California at Los Angeles, Ronald Siegel chained
two elephants to a barn. The female elephant was used in range-finding
tests “to determine procedures and dosages for LSD administration.” She
was given the drug orally and by dart-gun. After this the experimenters
dosed both elephants every day for two months and observed their
behavior. High doses of the hallucinogen caused the female to fall down
on her side, trembling and barely breathing, for one hour. The high
doses caused the bull elephant to become aggressive and charge Siegel,
who described such repeated aggressive behavior as “inappropriate.”⁹⁵

My final episode in this grim tale of drug experimentation does, at
least, have a happy ending. Researchers at Cornell University Medical
College fed large doses of barbiturates to cats by means of tubes
surgically implanted in their stomachs. They then abruptly stopped the
barbiturates. Here is their description of the withdrawal symptoms:

Some were unable to stand.… The “spread eagle posture” was seen in
animals displaying the most severe abstinence signs and the most
frequent grand mal type convulsions. Almost all of these animals died
during or soon after periods of continuous convulsive activity.… Rapid
or labored respiration was often noted when other abstinence signs were
most intense.… Hypothermia was noted when animals were weakest,
especially after persistent seizures and when near death.⁹⁶

These experiments began in 1975. Although barbiturate abuse had been a
serious problem a few years earlier, by that time the use of
barbiturates was severely restricted, and abuse had declined. It has
continued to do so since. Nevertheless, the cat experiments at Cornell
continued for fourteen years. Then, in 1987, Trans-Species Unlimited, a
Pennsylvania-based animal rights group, compiled all the available
information they could find about the experiments and began to campaign
to stop them. For four months, concerned people picketed the laboratory
at which the cat studies were being conducted and wrote letters to the
funding agencies, the press, the university, and legislators. After
defending the experiments for a long time, late in 1988 Cornell and
Michiko Okamoto, the researcher carrying out the experiments, wrote to
the funding body, the National Institute on Drug Abuse, to say they
would forfeit a new $530,000 research grant that would have paid for
three more years of experiments.⁹⁷

How can these things happen? How can people who are not sadists spend
their working days driving monkeys into lifelong depression, heating
dogs to death, or turning cats into drug addicts? How can they then
remove their white coats, wash their hands, and go home to dinner with
their families? How can taxpayers allow their money to be used to
support these experiments? How did students carry on protests against
injustice, discrimination, and oppression of all kinds, no matter how
far from home, while ignoring the cruelties that were—and still
are—being carried out on their own campuses?

The answer to these questions lies in the unquestioned acceptance of
speciesism. We tolerate cruelties inflicted on members of other species
that would outrage us if performed on members of our own species.
Speciesism allows researchers to regard the animals they experiment on
as items of equipment, laboratory tools rather than living, suffering
creatures. In fact, on grant applications to government funding
agencies, animals are listed as “supplies” alongside test tubes and
recording instruments.

In addition to the general attitude of speciesism that experimenters
share with other citizens, some special factors also help to make
possible the experiments I have described. Foremost among these is the
immense respect that people still have for scientists. Although the
advent of nuclear weapons and environmental pollution has made us
realize that science and technology are not as beneficial as they might
appear at first glance, most people still tend to be in awe of anyone
who wears a white coat and has a Ph.D. In a well-known series of
experiments Stanley Milgram, a Harvard psychologist, demonstrated that
ordinary people will obey the directions of a white-coated researcher to
administer what appears to be (but in fact is not) electric shock to a
human subject as “punishment” for failing to answer questions correctly,
and they will continue to do this even when the human subject cries out
and pretends to be in great pain.⁹⁸ If this can happen when the
participants believe they are inflicting pain on a human being, how much
easier is it for students to push aside their initial qualms when their
professors instruct them to perform experiments on animals? What Alice
Heim has rightly called the “indoctrination” of the student is a gradual
process, beginning with the dissection of frogs in school biology
classes. When the future medical students, psychology students, or
veterinarians reach the university and find that to complete the course
of studies on which they have set their hearts they must experiment on
living animals, it is difficult for them to refuse to do so, especially
since they know that what they are being asked to do is standard
practice. Those students who have refused to engage in such studies have
found themselves failing their courses and are often forced to leave
their chosen field of study.

The pressure to conform does not let up when students receive their
degrees. If they go on to graduate degrees in fields in which
experiments on animals are usual, they will be encouraged to devise
their own experiments and write them up for their Ph.D. dissertations.
Naturally, if this is how students are educated they will tend to
continue in the same manner when they become professors, and they will,
in turn, train their own students in the same manner.

Here the testimony of Roger Ulrich, a former experimenter who escaped
from his conditioning and now acknowledges that he inflicted “years of
torture” on animals from rats to monkeys, is particularly revealing. In
1977 the magazine _Monitor_, published by the American Psychological
Association, reported that experiments on aggression carried out by
Ulrich had been singled out before a congressional subcommittee as an
example of inhumane research. To the surprise of the antivivisectionists
who had criticized him, and no doubt to the editor of the _Monitor_ as
well, Ulrich wrote back to say that he was “heartened” by the criticism,
and added:

Initially my research was prompted by the desire to understand and help
solve the problem of human aggression, but I later discovered that the
results of my work did not seem to justify its continuance. Instead I
began to wonder if perhaps financial rewards, professional prestige, the
opportunity to travel, etc. were the maintaining factors, and if we of
the scientific community (supported by our bureaucratic and legislative
system) were actually a part of the problem.⁹⁹

Don Barnes, who as we saw had a similar change of mind about his work
irradiating trained monkeys for the U.S. Air Force, calls the process
Ulrich describes “conditioned ethical blindness.” In other words, just
as a rat can be conditioned to press a lever in return for a reward of
food, so a human being can be conditioned by professional rewards to
ignore the ethical issues raised by animal experiments. As Barnes says:

I represented a classic example of what I choose to call “conditioned
ethical blindness.” My entire life had consisted of being rewarded for
using animals, treating them as sources of human improvement or
amusement.… During my sixteen years in the laboratory the morality and
ethics of using laboratory animals were never broached in either formal
or informal meetings prior to my raising the issues during the waning
days of my tenure as a vivisector.¹⁰⁰

It is not only the experimenters themselves who suffer from conditioned
ethical blindness. Research institutions sometimes answer critics by
telling them that they employ a veterinarian to look after the animals.
Such statements are supposed to provide reassurance, because of the
widespread belief that all veterinarians are people who care about
animals and would never let them suffer unnecessarily. Regrettably, this
is not the case. No doubt many veterinarians did go into the field
because they cared about animals, but it is difficult for people who
really care about animals to go through a course of study in veterinary
medicine without having their sensitivity to animal suffering blunted.
Those who care most may not be able to complete their studies. One
former veterinary student wrote to an animal welfare organization:

My life-long dream and ambition to become a veterinarian dissipated
following several traumatic experiences involving standard experimental
procedures utilized by the dispassionate instructors of the Pre-Vet
school at my state university. They felt it was perfectly acceptable to
experiment with and then terminate the lives of all the animals they
utilized, which I found revoltingly unacceptable to my own moral code.
After numerous confrontations with these heartless vivisectionists, I
painfully decided to pursue a different career.¹⁰¹

In 1966, when moves were being made to pass legislation to protect
laboratory animals, the American Veterinary Medical Association
testified to congressional committees that while it favored legislation
to stop the stealing of pets for subsequent sale to laboratories, it was
opposed to the licensing and regulation of research facilities, since
this could interfere with research. The basic attitude of the profession
was, as an article in the _Journal of the American Veterinary Medical
Association_ put it, that “the raison d’être of the veterinary
profession is the over-all well-being of man—not lower animals.”¹⁰² Once
the implications of this fine example of speciesism have been grasped,
it should surprise no one to learn that veterinarians were part of the
experimental teams that performed many of the experiments listed in this
chapter. For just one example, look back to the description on p. 27 of
the Primate Equilibrium Platform experiment involving exposure to the
nerve gas agent, soman. The report from which this description is drawn
states: “Routine care of the animals was provided by the Veterinary
Sciences Division, USAF School of Aerospace Medicine.”

Throughout America, veterinarians are standing by providing “routine
care” for animals who are being needlessly abused. Is this what the
veterinary profession stands for? (There is some hope for the vets,
however, because a new organization of veterinarians has been
established to provide support for practitioners and students with
ethical concerns about the treatment of nonhuman animals.¹⁰³)

Once a pattern of animal experimentation becomes the accepted mode of
research in a particular field, the process is self-reinforcing and
difficult to break out of. Not only publications and promotions but also
the awards and grants that finance research become geared to animal
experiments. A proposal for a new experiment with animals is something
that the administrators of research funds will be ready to support, if
they have in the past supported other experiments on animals. New
methods that do not make use of animals will seem less familiar and will
be less likely to receive support.

All this helps to explain why it is not always easy for people outside
the universities to understand the rationale for the research carried
out under university auspices. Originally, perhaps, scholars and
researchers just set out to solve the most important problems and did
not allow themselves to be influenced by other considerations. No doubt
some are still motivated by these concerns. Too often, though, academic
research gets bogged down in petty and insignificant details because the
big questions have been studied already and they have either been solved
or proven too difficult. So the researchers turn away from the
well-plowed fields in search of new territory where whatever they find
will be new, although the connection with a major problem may be remote.
It is not uncommon, as we have seen, for experimenters to admit that
similar experiments have been done many times before, but without this
or that minor variation; and the most common ending to a scientific
publication is “further research is necessary.”

When we read reports of experiments that cause pain and are apparently
not even intended to produce results of real significance, we are at
first inclined to think that there must be more to what is being done
than we can understand—that the scientists must have some better reason
for what they are doing than their reports indicate. When I describe
such experiments to people or quote directly from the researchers’ own
published reports, the most common reaction I get is puzzlement and
skepticism. When we go more deeply into the subject, however, we find
that what appears trivial on the surface very often really is trivial.
Experimenters themselves often unofficially admit this. H. F. Harlow,
whose experiments we encountered at the beginning of this chapter, was
for twelve years the editor of the _Journal of Comparative and
Physiological Psychology_, a journal that has published more reports of
painful experiments on animals than almost any other. At the end of this
period, in which Harlow estimated he reviewed about 2,500 manuscripts
submitted for publication, he wrote, in a semihumorous farewell note,
that “most experiments are not worth doing and the data attained are not
worth publishing.”¹⁰⁴

We shouldn’t be surprised by this. Researchers, even those in
psychology, medicine, and the biological sciences, are human beings and
are susceptible to the same influences as any other human beings. They
like to get on in their careers, to be promoted, and to have their work
read and discussed by their colleagues. Publishing papers in the
appropriate journals is an important element in the rise up the ladder
of promotion and increased prestige. This happens in every field, in
philosophy or history as much as in psychology or medicine, and it is
entirely understandable and in itself hardly worth criticizing. The
philosophers and historians who publish to improve their career
prospects do little harm beyond wasting paper and boring their
colleagues; those whose work involves experimenting on animals, however,
can cause severe pain or prolonged suffering. Their work should
therefore be subject to much stricter standards of necessity.

The government agencies in the United States, Britain, and elsewhere
that promote research in the biological sciences have become the major
backers of experiments on animals. Indeed, public funds, derived from
taxation, have paid for the vast majority of the experiments described
in this chapter. Many of these agencies are paying for experiments that
have only the remotest connections with the purposes for which the
agencies were set up. In the preceding pages I have described
experiments that were funded by the United States National Institutes of
Health, the Alcohol, Drug Abuse and Mental Health Administration, the
Federal Aviation Administration, the Defense Department, the National
Science Foundation, the National Aeronautics and Space Administration,
and others. It is not easy to understand why the U.S. Army should be
paying for a study of the urine spreading patterns of heated, drugged
rats or why the U.S. Public Health Service should wish to give out money
so that elephants can be given LSD.

Since these experiments are paid for by government agencies, it is
hardly necessary to add that there is no law that prevents the scientist
from carrying them out. There are laws that prevent ordinary people from
beating their dogs to death, but in the United States scientists can do
the same thing with impunity, and with no one to check whether their
doing so is likely to lead to benefits that would not occur from an
ordinary beating. The reason for this is that the strength and prestige
of the scientific establishment, supported by the various interest
groups—including those who breed animals for sale to laboratories—have
been sufficient to stop attempts at effective legal control.

Robert J. White of the Cleveland Metropolitan General Hospital is an
experimenter who has specialized in transplanting the heads of monkeys
and keeping these monkey heads alive in fluid after they have been
totally detached from their bodies. He is a perfect example of the
scientist who thinks of a laboratory animal as a “tool for research”—in
fact he has himself said that the main purpose of his work on
decapitated monkey heads is “to offer a living laboratory tool” for
research on the brain. The reporter to whom he made this statement found
the visit to White’s laboratory “a rare and chilling glimpse into the
cold, clinical world of the scientist, where the life of an animal has
no meaning beyond the immediate purpose of experimentation.”¹⁰⁵

In White’s view, “the inclusion of animals in our ethical system is
philosophically meaningless and operationally impossible.”¹⁰⁶ In other
words, White sees himself as under no ethical constraints in regard to
what he does to animals. Hence it is not surprising that another
reporter interviewing him should have found that White “chafes at
regulations, whether from hospital administrators or insurers. ‘I’m an
elitist,’ he says. He believes doctors should be governed by their
peers.”¹⁰⁷

Another active opponent of government regulations is David Baltimore, a
professor at Massachusetts Institute of Technology and a Nobel laureate.
In a recent address to the national meeting of the American Association
for the Advancement of Science he referred to the “long hours” that he
and his colleagues had spent fighting regulation of their research.¹⁰⁸
The basis for Baltimore’s opposition to such regulation was made clear
some years earlier, when he appeared on a television program with
Harvard philosopher Robert Nozick and other scientists. Nozick asked the
scientists whether the fact that an experiment will kill hundreds of
animals is ever regarded, by scientists, as a reason for not performing
it. One of the scientists answered: “Not that I know of.” Nozick pressed
his question: “Don’t the animals count at all?” A scientist countered:
“Why should they?” At this point Baltimore interjected that he did not
think that experimenting on animals raised a moral issue at all.¹⁰⁹

Men like White and Baltimore may be brilliant scientists, but their
utterances on animals show that they are philosophical ignoramuses. I
know of not a single professional philosopher writing today who would
agree that it is “meaningless” or “impossible” to include animals in our
ethical system or that experimenting on animals raises no moral issue.
Such statements are, in philosophy, comparable to maintaining that the
earth is flat.

American scientists have, so far, been extraordinarily intransigent
about public oversight of what they do to animals. They have been
successful in squelching even minimal regulations to protect animals
from suffering in experiments. In the United States, the only federal
law on the matter is the Animal Welfare Act. The law sets the standards
for the transportation, housing, and handling of animals sold as pets,
exhibited, or intended for use in research. So far as actual
experimentation is concerned, however, it allows the researchers to do
exactly as they please. This is quite deliberate: the reason given by
the U.S. Congress Conference Committee when the act was passed was

to provide protection for the researcher in this matter by exempting
from regulations all animals during actual research or experimentation.…
It is not the intention of the committee to interfere in any way with
research or experimentation.¹¹⁰

One section of the law requires that those private businesses and other
organizations that register under the act (neither government agencies
doing research nor many smaller facilities have to register) must file a
report stating that when painful experiments were performed without the
use of pain-relieving drugs, this was necessary to achieve the
objectives of the research project. No attempt is made to assess whether
these “objectives” are sufficiently important to justify inflicting
pain. Under these circumstances the requirement does no more than make
additional paperwork, and this is a major complaint among experimenters.
They can’t, of course, give dogs the continual electric shocks that will
produce a state of helplessness if they anesthetize them at the same
time; nor can they produce depression in monkeys while keeping them
happy or oblivious with drugs. So in such cases they can truthfully
state that the objectives of the experiment cannot be achieved if
pain-relieving drugs are used, and then go on with the experiment as
they would have done before the act came into existence.

So we should not be surprised that, for instance, the report of the
Primate Equilibrium Platform experiment with soman should be prefaced
with the following statement:

The animals involved in this study were procured, maintained, and used
in accordance with the Animal Welfare Act and the “Guide for the Care
and Use of Laboratory Animals” prepared by the Institute of Laboratory
Animal Resources-National Research Council.

In fact the same statement appears on the Brooks Air Force Base Training
manual for the Primate Equilibrium Platform, on the report of the Armed
Forces Radiobiology Research Institute’s “primate activity wheel”
experiment, and on many other recent American publications from which I
have quoted. The statement tells us nothing at all about how much the
animals suffered, nor about how trivial the purpose for which they
suffered may have been; but it tells us a great deal about the value of
the Animal Welfare Act and of the “Guide for the Care and Use of
Laboratory Animals” prepared by the National Research Council’s
Institute of Laboratory Animal Resources.

The complete absence of effective regulation in the United States is in
sharp contrast to the situation in many other developed nations. In
Britain, for example, no experiment can be conducted without a license
granted by the secretary of state for home affairs, and the Animals
(Scientific Procedures) Act, 1986, expressly directs that in determining
whether to grant a license for an experimental project, “the Secretary
of State shall weigh the likely adverse effects on the animals concerned
against the benefit likely to accrue.” In Australia, the Code of
Practice developed by the leading governmental scientific bodies
(equivalent to the National Institutes of Health in the United States)
requires that all experiments must be approved by an Animal
Experimentation Ethics Committee. These committees must include a person
with an interest in animal welfare who is not employed by the
institution conducting the experiment, and an additional independent
person not involved in animal experimentation. The committee must apply
a detailed set of principles and conditions that include an instruction
to weigh the scientific or educational value of the experiment against
the potential effects on the welfare of animals. In addition, anesthesia
must be used if the experiment “may cause pain of a kind and degree for
which anesthesia would normally be used in medical or veterinary
practice.” The Australian Code of Practice applies to all researchers
obtaining government grants, and under state law is binding on all
experimenters in Victoria, New South Wales, and South Australia.¹¹¹
Sweden also requires experiments to be approved by committees that
include lay members. In 1986, after surveying the laws in Australia,
Canada, Japan, Denmark, Germany, the Netherlands, Norway, Sweden,
Switzerland, and the United Kingdom, the U.S. Congress Office of
Technology Assessment concluded:

Most of the countries examined for this assessment have laws far more
protective of experimental animals than those in the United States.
Despite these protections, animal welfare advocates have been applying
considerable pressure for even stronger laws, and many countries,
including Australia, Switzerland, West Germany, and the United Kingdom,
are considering major changes.¹¹²

Stronger laws have in fact already been passed in Australia and the
United Kingdom since that statement was made.

I hope this comparison will not be misunderstood. It is not intended to
show that all is well with animal experimentation in countries like the
United Kingdom and Australia. That would be far from the truth. In those
countries the “balancing” of potential benefits against harm to the
animals is still carried out within the assumption of a speciesist
attitude to animals, thus rendering it impossible for the interests of
animals to be given equal consideration with similar interests of
humans. I have compared the situation in the United States with that in
other countries only in order to show that American standards in this
matter are abysmal, not just by the standards of animal liberationists,
but by those accepted by the scientific communities of other major
developed nations. It would be salutary for United States scientists to
see themselves as their colleagues in other countries see them. At
medical and scientific conferences I attend in Europe and Australia, I
am frequently taken aside by scientists who tell me that they may not
agree with all my views about animal experimentation, but … and then
they tell me, with genuine horror in their voice, about something they
saw during their last trip to the United States. No wonder that in the
respected British science magazine _New Scientist_, a writer recently
described the United States as “a country which, as reflected in its
legislation to protect animals, seems to be a nation of barbarians.”¹¹³
As the United States lagged behind the civilized world in outlawing
human slavery, so the United States now lags behind in softening the
unrestrained brutalities of animal slavery.

Minor amendments to the United States Animal Welfare Act in 1985
improved exercise requirements for dogs and housing for primates, but
failed to deal with the real issue of control over what happens during
an experiment. The amendments set up institutional animal committees,
but in keeping with the unchanged exemption from interference given to
the experiments themselves, these committees have no authority over what
goes on in the experiments.¹¹⁴

In any case, despite the fact that the Animal Welfare Act was passed
more than twenty years ago, its enforcement is virtually nil. For a
start, the secretary of agriculture has never even issued regulations
extending the act’s provisions to mice, rats, birds, and farm animals
used in research. Presumably this is because the Department of
Agriculture does not even have enough inspectors to check on the
conditions of such animals as dogs, cats, and monkeys, let alone birds,
rats, mice, and farm animals. As the Office of Technology Assessment
said, “funds and personnel for enforcement have never lived up to the
expectations of those who believe the primary mission of the existing
law to be the prevention or alleviation of experimental animal
suffering.” OTA staff checked one list of 112 testing facilities, and
found that 39 percent were not even registered with the branch of the
Department of Agriculture that inspects laboratories. Moreover, the OTA
report states that this is probably a conservative estimate of the real
number of unregistered, and hence totally uninspected and uncontrolled,
animal laboratories.¹¹⁵

The United States regulation of animal experimentation is now a
continuing farce: there is a law that on its face applies to all
warm-blooded laboratory animals, but it can be put into effect only by
regulations that, in the words of the Office of Technology Assessment,
“probably do not affect a substantial percentage of animals used for
experimental purposes.” The OTA went on to say that this exclusion of
many species from the protection of the act “appears to frustrate the
intent of Congress and to be beyond the Secretary of Agriculture’s
statutory authority.”¹¹⁶ These are strong words for the usually
restrained OTA—but three years later, nothing at all has been done to
change the situation. Indeed, a 1988 report by a blue ribbon panel of
American scientists considered, but rejected, a recommendation that the
regulations be extended to cover all warmblooded animals. No reason was
given for this rejection: it stands as another example of the
obstructionist attitude of United States scientists to the most
elementary improvements in the conditions of the animals they use.¹¹⁷

So the farce shows no sign of coming to an end. The trouble is that it
is decidedly unfunny. There is no reason to believe that rats and mice
are less sensitive to pain and suffering, or less in need of minimum
standards for housing and transport, than guinea pigs, hamsters,
rabbits, or many other animals.

In descriptions of experiments in this chapter up to now, I have limited
myself to summarizing the reports written by the experimenters
themselves and published in the scientific journals. That evidence
cannot be accused of being exaggerated. But because of the total lack of
any adequate inspection or scrutiny of what happens in experiments, the
reality is often much worse than the published account. This became
clear in 1984 in the case of experiments conducted by Thomas Gennarelli
at the University of Pennsylvania. The aim of the experiments was to
inflict head injuries on monkeys, and then examine the nature of the
damage to the brain. According to the official grant documents the
monkeys were to be anesthetized before receiving the head injury. Thus
it would seem that the experiments involved no suffering. But members of
a group called the Animal Liberation Front had other information. They
had also learned that Gennarelli videotaped his experiments. They broke
into the laboratory and stole the tapes. When they viewed them, they saw
conscious, unanesthetized baboons struggling as they were being strapped
down before the head injuries were inflicted. They saw animals writhing,
apparently coming out of anesthesia, as surgeons were operating on their
exposed brains. They also heard the experimenters mocking and laughing
at frightened, suffering animals. The videotapes were so damning
that—though it took more than a year of hard work by the
Washington-based group People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals and
hundreds of animal activists—the secretary of health and human services
stopped Gennarelli’s funding.¹¹⁸ Since then, other examples have come to
light, based usually on information provided by someone working in the
laboratory who has blown the whistle, at the cost of his or her job. In
1986, for instance, Leslie Fain, an animal care technician at Gillette’s
testing laboratory in Rockville, Maryland, resigned her job and gave
Animal Liberationists photos she had taken inside the laboratory. The
photos showed Gillette testing new formulations of pink and brown inks
for its Paper Mate pens by putting them in the eyes of conscious
rabbits. The inks turned out to be extremely irritating, and caused a
bloody discharge from the eye in some rabbits.¹¹⁹ One can only guess at
how many laboratories there are in which the abuse of animals is just as
bad, but no one has been courageous enough to do anything about it.

When are experiments on animals justifiable? Upon learning of the nature
of many of the experiments carried out, some people react by saying that
all experiments on animals should be prohibited immediately. But if we
make our demands as absolute as this, the experimenters have a ready
reply: Would we be prepared to let thousands of humans die if they could
be saved by a single experiment on a single animal?

This question is, of course, purely hypothetical. There has never been
and never could be a single experiment that saved thousands of lives.
The way to reply to this hypothetical question is to pose another: Would
the experimenters be prepared to carry out their experiment on a human
orphan under six months old if that were the only way to save thousands
of lives?

If the experimenters would not be prepared to use a human infant then
their readiness to use nonhuman animals reveals an unjustifiable form of
discrimination on the basis of species, since adult apes, monkeys, dogs,
cats, rats, and other animals are more aware of what is happening to
them, more self-directing, and, so far as we can tell, at least as
sensitive to pain as a human infant. (I have specified that the human
infant be an orphan, to avoid the complications of the feelings of
parents. Specifying the case in this way is, if anything, overgenerous
to those defending the use of nonhuman animals in experiments, since
mammals intended for experimental use are usually separated from their
mothers at an early age, when the separation causes distress for both
mother and young.)

So far as we know, human infants possess no morally relevant
characteristic to a higher degree than adult nonhuman animals, unless we
are to count the infants’ potential as a characteristic that makes it
wrong to experiment on them. Whether this characteristic should count is
controversial—if we count it, we shall have to condemn abortion along
with experiments on infants, since the potential of the infant and the
fetus is the same. To avoid the complexities of this issue, however, we
can alter our original question a little and assume that the infant is
one with irreversible brain damage so severe as to rule out any mental
development beyond the level of a six-month-old infant. There are,
unfortunately, many such human beings, locked away in special wards
throughout the country, some of them long since abandoned by their
parents and other relatives, and, sadly, sometimes unloved by anyone
else. Despite their mental deficiencies, the anatomy and physiology of
these infants are in nearly all respects identical with those of normal
humans. If, therefore, we were to force-feed them with large quantities
of floor polish or drip concentrated solutions of cosmetics into their
eyes, we would have a much more reliable indication of the safety of
these products for humans than we now get by attempting to extrapolate
the results of tests on a variety of other species. The LD50 tests, the
Draize eye tests, the radiation experiments, the heatstroke experiments,
and many others described earlier in this chapter could have told us
more about human reactions to the experimental situation if they had
been carried out on severely brain-damaged humans instead of dogs or
rabbits.

So whenever experimenters claim that their experiments are important
enough to justify the use of animals, we should ask them whether they
would be prepared to use a brain-damaged human being at a similar mental
level to the animals they are planning to use. I cannot imagine that
anyone would seriously propose carrying out the experiments described in
this chapter on brain-damaged human beings. Occasionally it has become
known that medical experiments have been performed on human beings
without their consent; one case did concern institutionalized
intellectually disabled children, who were given hepatitis.¹²⁰ When such
harmful experiments on human beings become known, they usually lead to
an outcry against the experimenters, and rightly so. They are, very
often, a further example of the arrogance of the research worker who
justifies everything on the grounds of increasing knowledge. But if the
experimenter claims that the experiment is important enough to justify
inflicting suffering on animals, why is it not important enough to
justify inflicting suffering on humans at the same mental level? What
difference is there between the two? Only that one is a member of our
species and the other is not? But to appeal to that difference is to
reveal a bias no more defensible than racism or any other form of
arbitrary discrimination.

The analogy between speciesism and racism applies in practice as well as
in theory in the area of experimentation. Blatant speciesism leads to
painful experiments on other species, defended on the grounds of their
contribution to knowledge and possible usefulness for our species.
Blatant racism has led to painful experiments on other races, defended
on the grounds of their contribution to knowledge and possible
usefulness for the experimenting race. Under the Nazi regime in Germany,
nearly two hundred doctors, some of them eminent in the world of
medicine, took part in experiments on Jews and Russian and Polish
prisoners. Thousands of other physicians knew of these experiments, some
of which were the subject of lectures at medical academies. Yet the
records show that the doctors sat through verbal reports by doctors on
how horrible injuries were inflicted on these “lesser races,” and then
proceeded to discuss the medical lessons to be learned from them,
without anyone making even a mild protest about the nature of the
experiments. The parallels between this attitude and that of
experimenters today toward animals are striking. Then, as now, subjects
were frozen, heated, and put in decompression chambers. Then, as now,
these events were written up in dispassionate scientific jargon. The
following paragraph is taken from a report by a Nazi scientist of an
experiment on a human being, placed in a decompression chamber:

After five minutes spasms appeared; between the sixth and tenth minute
respiration increased in frequency, the TP [test person] losing
consciousness. From the eleventh to the thirtieth minute respiration
slowed down to three inhalations per minute, only to cease entirely at
the end of that period.… About half an hour after breathing ceased, an
autopsy was begun.¹²¹

Decompression chamber experimentation did not stop with the defeat of
the Nazis. It shifted to nonhuman animals. At the University of
Newcastle on Tyne, in England, for instance, scientists used pigs. The
pigs were subjected to up to eighty-one periods of decompression over a
period of nine months. All suffered attacks of decompression sickness,
and some died from these attacks.¹²² The example illustrates only too
well what the great Jewish writer Isaac Bashevis Singer has written: “In
their behavior towards creatures, all men [are] Nazis.”¹²³

Experimentation on subjects outside the experimenters’ own group is a
story that constantly repeats itself with different victims. In the
United States the most notorious twentieth-century instance of human
experimentation was the deliberate nontreatment of syphilis patients at
Tuskegee, Alabama, so that the natural course of the disease could be
observed. This was continued long after penicillin was shown to be an
effective treatment for syphilis. The untreated victims of the
experiment were, of course, blacks.¹²⁴ Perhaps the major international
human experimentation scandal of the past decade came to light in New
Zealand in 1987. A respected doctor at a leading Auckland hospital
decided not to treat patients with early signs of cancer. He was trying
to prove his unorthodox theory that this form of cancer would not
develop, but he did not tell the patients that they were part of an
experiment. His theory was wrong, and twenty-seven of his patients died.
This time the victims were women.¹²⁵

When such events come to light, the public reaction makes it clear that
our sphere of moral concern is wider than that of the Nazis, and we are
no longer prepared to countenance a lesser degree of concern for other
human beings; but there are still many sentient beings for whom we
appear to have no real concern at all.

We have still not answered the question of when an experiment might be
justifiable. It will not do to say “Never!” Putting morality in such
black-and-white terms is appealing, because it eliminates the need to
think about particular cases; but in extreme circumstances, such
absolutist answers always break down. Torturing a human being is almost
always wrong, but it is not absolutely wrong. If torture were the only
way in which we could discover the location of a nuclear bomb hidden in
a New York City basement and timed to go off within the hour, then
torture would be justifiable. Similarly, if a single experiment could
cure a disease like leukemia, that experiment would be justifiable. But
in actual life the benefits are always more remote, and more often than
not they are nonexistent. So how do we decide when an experiment is
justifiable?

We have seen that experimenters reveal a bias in favor of their own
species whenever they carry out experiments on nonhumans for purposes
that they would not think justified them in using human beings, even
brain-damaged ones. This principle gives us a guide toward an answer to
our question. Since a speciesist bias, like a racist bias, is
unjustifiable, an experiment cannot be justifiable unless the experiment
is so important that the use of a brain-damaged human would also be
justifiable.

This is not an absolutist principle. I do not believe that it could
never be justifiable to experiment on a brain-damaged human. If it
really were possible to save several lives by an experiment that would
take just one life, and there were no other way those lives could be
saved, it would be right to do the experiment. But this would be an
extremely rare case. Certainly none of the experiments described in this
chapter could pass this test. Admittedly, as with any dividing line,
there would be a gray area where it was difficult to decide if an
experiment could be justified. But we need not get distracted by such
considerations now. As this chapter has shown, we are in the midst of an
emergency in which appalling suffering is being inflicted on millions of
animals for purposes that on any impartial view are obviously inadequate
to justify the suffering. When we have ceased to carry out all those
experiments, then there will be time enough to discuss what to do about
the remaining ones which are claimed to be essential to save lives or
prevent greater suffering.

In the United States, where the present lack of control over
experimentation allows the kinds of experiments described in the
preceeding pages, a minimal first step would be a requirement that no
experiment be conducted without prior approval from an ethics committee
that includes animal welfare representatives and is authorized to refuse
approval to experiments when it does not consider that the potential
benefits outweigh the harm to the animals. As we have seen, systems of
this kind already exist in countries such as Australia and Sweden and
are accepted as fair and reasonable by the scientific community there.
On the basis of the ethical arguments in this book, such a system falls
far short of the ideal. The animal welfare representatives on such
committees come from groups that hold a spectrum of views, but, for
obvious reasons, those who receive and accept invitations to join animal
experimentation ethics committees tend to come from the less radical
groups within the movement. They may not themselves regard the interests
of nonhuman animals as entitled to equal consideration with the
interests of humans; or if they do hold such a position, they may find
it impossible to put it into practice when judging applications to
perform animal experiments, because they would be unable to persuade
other members of the committee. Instead, they are likely to insist on
proper consideration of alternatives, genuine efforts to minimize pain,
and a clear demonstration of significant potential benefits,
sufficiently important to outweigh any pain or suffering that cannot be
eliminated from the experiment. An animal experimentation ethics
committee operating today would almost inevitably apply these standards
in a speciesist manner, weighing animal suffering more lightly than
potential comparable human benefit; even so, an emphasis on such
standards would eliminate many painful experiments now permitted and
would reduce the suffering caused by others.

In a society that is fundamentally speciesist, there is no quick
solution to such difficulties with ethics committees. For this reason
some Animal Liberationists will have nothing to do with them. Instead
they demand the total and immediate elimination of all animal
experimentation. Such demands have been put forward many times during
the last century and a half of antivivisection activity, but they have
shown no sign of winning over the majority of voters in any country.
Meanwhile the number of animals suffering in laboratories continued to
grow, until the recent breakthroughs described earlier in this chapter.
These breakthroughs resulted from the work of people who found a way
around the “all or nothing” mentality that had effectively meant
“nothing” as far as the animals were concerned.

One reason the demand for immediate abolition of animal experimentation
has failed to persuade the public is that experimenters respond that to
accept this demand is to give up the prospect of finding a cure for
major diseases that still kill us and our children. In the United
States, where experimenters can do virtually as they please with
animals, one way of making progress might be to ask those who use this
argument to defend the need for animal experiments whether they would be
prepared to accept the verdict of an ethics committee that, like those
in many other countries, includes animal welfare representatives and is
entitled to weigh the costs to the animals against the possible benefits
of the research. If the answer is no, the defense of animal
experimentation by reference to the need to cure major diseases has been
proved to be simply a deceitful distraction that serves to mislead the
public about what the experimenters want: permission to do whatever they
like with animals. For otherwise why would the experimenter not be
prepared to leave the decision on carrying out the experiment to an
ethics committee, which would surely be as keen to see major diseases
ended as the rest of the community? If the answer is yes, the
experimenter should be asked to sign a statement asking for the creation
of such an ethics committee.

Suppose that we were able to go beyond minimal reforms of the sort that
already exist in the more enlightened nations. Suppose we could reach a
point at which the interests of animals really were given equal
consideration with the similar interests of human beings. That would
mean the end of the vast industry of animal experimentation as we know
it today. Around the world, cages would empty and laboratories would
close down. It should not be thought, though, that medical research
would grind to a halt or that a flood of untested products would come on
to the market. So far as new products are concerned it is true, as I
have already said, that we would have to make do with fewer of them,
using ingredients already known to be safe. That does not seem to be any
great loss. But for testing really essential products, as well as for
other kinds of research, alternative methods not requiring animals can
and would be found.

In the first edition of this book I wrote that “scientists do not look
for alternatives simply because they do not care enough about the
animals they are using.” Then I made a prediction: “Considering how
little effort has been put into this field, the early results promise
much greater progress if the effort is stepped up.” In the past decade,
both these statements have proved true. We have already seen that in
product testing there has been a huge increase in the amount of effort
put into looking for alternatives to animal experiments—not because
scientists have suddenly started to care more about animals, but as a
result of hard-fought campaigns by Animal Liberationists. The same thing
could happen in many other fields of animal experimentation.

Although tens of thousands of animals have been forced to inhale tobacco
smoke for months and even years, the proof of the connection between
tobacco use and lung cancer was based on data from clinical observations
in human beings.¹²⁶ The United States government continues to pour
billions of dollars into research on cancer, while it also subsidizes
the tobacco industry. Much of the research money goes toward animal
experiments, many of them only remotely connected with fighting
cancer—experimenters have been known to relabel their work “cancer
research” when they found they could get more money for it that way than
under some other label. Meanwhile we are continuing to lose the fight
against most forms of cancer. Figures released in 1988 by the United
States National Cancer Institute show that the overall rate of cancer,
even when adjusted for the increasing age of the population, has been
rising at about 1 percent per year for thirty years. Recent reports of a
decline in lung cancer rates among younger Americans may be the first
sign of a reversal in this trend, since lung cancer causes more deaths
than any other form of cancer. If lung cancer is declining, however,
this welcome news is not the result of any improvement in treatment but
of younger people, especially white males, smoking less. Lung cancer
survival rates have scarcely changed.¹²⁷ We know that smoking causes
between 80 and 85 percent of all lung cancer cases. We must ask
ourselves: Can we justify forcing thousands of animals to inhale
cigarette smoke so that they develop lung cancer, when we know we could
virtually wipe out the disease by eliminating the use of tobacco? If
people decide to continue to smoke, knowing that by doing so they risk
lung cancer, is it right to make animals suffer the cost of this
decision?

Our poor record in the treatment of lung cancer is matched in cancer
treatment more generally. Although there have been successes in treating
some specific cancers, since 1974 the number of people surviving for
five years or more after cancer has been diagnosed has increased by less
than 1 percent.¹²⁸ Prevention, particularly through educating people to
lead healthier lives, is a more promising approach.

More and more scientists are now appreciating that animal
experimentation often actually hinders the advance of our understanding
of diseases in humans and their cure. For example, researchers at the
National Institute of Environmental Health Sciences, in North Carolina,
recently warned that animal tests may fail to pick up chemicals that
cause cancer in people. Exposure to arsenic seems to increase the risk
that a person will develop cancer, but it does not have this effect in
laboratory tests on animals.¹²⁹ A malaria vaccine developed in the
United States in 1985 at the prestigious Walter Reed Army Institute of
Research worked in animals, but proved largely ineffective in humans; a
vaccine developed by Colombian scientists working with human volunteers
has proven more effective.¹³⁰ Nowadays defenders of animal research
often talk about the importance of finding a cure for AIDS; but Robert
Gallo, the first American to isolate HIV (the AIDS virus), has said that
a potential vaccine developed by the French researcher Daniel Zagury had
shown itself to be more effective in stimulating HIV antibody production
in human beings than in animals; and he added: “The results in chimps
haven’t been too exciting.… Maybe we should go into testing in man more
aggressively.”¹³¹ Significantly, people with AIDS have endorsed this
call: “Let us be your guinea pigs,” pleaded gay activist Larry
Kramer.¹³² Obviously this plea makes sense. A cure will be found faster
if experimentation is done directly on human volunteers; and because of
the nature of the disease, and the strong bonds between many members of
the gay community, there is no shortage of volunteers. Care needs to be
taken, of course, that those volunteering genuinely understand what they
are doing and are under no pressure or coercion to take part in an
experiment. But it would not be unreasonable to give such consent. Why
should people be dying from an invariably fatal disease while a
potential cure is tested on animals who do not normally develop AIDS
anyway?

The defenders of animal experimentation are fond of telling us that
animal experimentation has greatly increased our life expectancy. In the
midst of the debate over reform of the British law on animal
experimentation, for example, the Association of the British
Pharmaceutical Industry ran a full-page advertisement in the _Guardian_
under the headline “They say life begins at forty. Not so long ago,
that’s about when it ended.” The advertisement went on to say that it is
now considered to be a tragedy if a man dies in his forties, whereas in
the nineteenth century it was commonplace to attend the funeral of a man
in his forties, for the average life expectancy was only forty-two. The
advertisement stated that “it is thanks largely to the breakthroughs
that have been made through research which requires animals that most of
us are able to live into our seventies.”

Such claims are simply false. In fact, this particular advertisement was
so blatantly misleading that a specialist in community medicine, Dr.
David St. George, wrote to _The Lancet_ saying “the advertisement is
good teaching material, since it illustrates two major errors in the
interpretation of statistics.” He also referred to Thomas McKeown’s
influential book _The Role of Medicine_, published in 1976,¹³³ which set
off a debate about the relative contributions of social and
environmental changes, as compared with medical intervention, in
improvements in mortality since the mid-nineteenth century; and he
added:

This debate has been resolved, and it is now widely accepted that
medical interventions had only a marginal effect on population mortality
and mainly at a very late stage, after death rates had already fallen
strikingly.¹³⁴

J. B. and S. M. McKinley reached a similar conclusion in a study of the
decline of ten major infectious diseases in the United States. They
showed that in every case except poliomyelitis the death rate had
already fallen dramatically (presumably because of improved sanitation
and diet) before any new form of medical treatment was introduced.
Concentrating on the 40 percent fall in crude mortality in the United
States between 1910 and 1984, they estimated “conservatively” that

perhaps 3.5 percent of the fall in the overall death rate can be
explained through medical interventions for the major infectious
diseases. Indeed, given that it is precisely for these diseases that
medicine claims most success in lowering mortality, 3.5 percent probably
represents a reasonable upper-limit estimate of the total contribution
of medical measures to the decline in infectious disease mortality in
the United States.¹³⁵

Remember that this 3.5 percent is a figure for all medical intervention.
The contribution of animal experimentation itself can be, at most, only
a fraction of this tiny contribution to the decline in mortality.

No doubt there are some fields of scientific research that will be
hampered by any genuine consideration of the interests of animals used
in experimentation. No doubt there have been some advances in knowledge
which would not have been attained as easily without using animals.
Examples of important discoveries often mentioned by those defending
animal experimentation go back as far as Harvey’s work on the
circulation of blood. They include Banting and Best’s discovery of
insulin and its role in diabetes; the recognition of poliomyelitis as a
virus and the development of a vaccine for it; several discoveries that
served to make open heart surgery and coronary artery bypass graft
surgery possible; and the understanding of our immune system and ways to
overcome rejection of transplanted organs.¹³⁶ The claim that animal
experimentation was essential in making these discoveries has been
denied by some opponents of experimentation.¹³⁷ I do not intend to go
into the controversy here. We have just seen that any knowledge gained
from animal experimentation has made at best a very small contribution
to our increased lifespan; its contribution to improving the quality of
life is more difficult to estimate. In a more fundamental sense, the
controversy over the benefits derived from animal experimentation is
essentially unresolvable, because even if valuable discoveries were made
using animals, we cannot say how successful medical research would have
been if it had been compelled, from the outset, to develop alternative
methods of investigation. Some discoveries would probably have been
delayed, or perhaps not made at all; but many false leads would also not
have been pursued, and it is possible that medicine would have developed
in a very different and more efficacious direction, emphasizing healthy
living rather than cure.

In any case, the ethical question of the justifiability of animal
experimentation cannot be settled by pointing to its benefits for us, no
matter how persuasive the evidence in favor of such benefits may be. The
ethical principle of equal consideration of interests will rule out some
means of obtaining knowledge. There is nothing sacred about the right to
pursue knowledge. We already accept many restrictions on scientific
enterprise. We do not believe that scientists have a general right to
perform painful or lethal experiments on human beings without their
consent, although there are many cases in which such experiments would
advance knowledge far more rapidly than any other method. Now we need to
broaden the scope of this existing restriction on scientific research.

Finally, it is important to realize that the major health problems of
the world largely continue to exist, not because we do not know how to
prevent disease and keep people healthy, but because no one is putting
enough effort and money into doing what we already know how to do. The
diseases that ravage Asia, Africa, Latin America, and the pockets of
poverty in the industrialized West are diseases that, by and large, we
know how to cure. They have been eliminated in communities that have
adequate nutrition, sanitation, and health care. It has been estimated
that 250,000 children die each week around the world, and that one
quarter of these deaths are by dehydration caused by diarrhea. A simple
treatment, already known and needing no animal experimentation, could
prevent the deaths of these children.¹³⁸ Those who are genuinely
concerned about improving health care would probably make a more
effective contribution to human health if they left the laboratories and
saw to it that our existing stock of medical knowledge reached those who
need it most.

When all this has been said, there still remains the practical question:
What can be done to change the widespread practice of experimenting on
animals? Undoubtedly, some action that will change government policies
is needed, but what action precisely? What can the ordinary citizen do
to help bring about change?

Legislators tend to ignore protests about animal experimentation from
their constituents, because they are overly influenced by scientific,
medical, and veterinary groups. In the United States, these groups
maintain registered political lobbies in Washington, and they lobby hard
against proposals to restrict experimentation. Since legislators do not
have the time to acquire expertise in these fields, they rely on what
the “experts” tell them. But this is a moral question, not a scientific
one, and the “experts” usually have an interest in the continuation of
experimentation or else are so imbued with the ethic of furthering
knowledge that they cannot detach themselves from this stance and make a
critical examination of what their colleagues do. Moreover, professional
public relations organizations have now emerged, such as the National
Association for Biomedical Research, whose sole purpose is to improve
the image of animal research with the public and with legislators. The
association has published books, produced videotapes, and conducted
workshops on how researchers should defend experimentation. Along with a
number of similar organizations, it has prospered as more people have
become concerned about the experimentation issue. We have already seen,
in the case of another lobby group, the Association of the British
Pharmaceutical Industry, how such groups can mislead the public.
Legislators must learn that when discussing animal experimentation they
have to treat these organizations, and also the medical, veterinary,
psychological, and biological associations, as they would treat General
Motors and Ford when discussing air pollution.

Nor is the task of reform made any easier by the large companies
involved in the profitable businesses of breeding or trapping animals
and selling them, or manufacturing and marketing the cages for them to
live in, the food used to feed them, and the equipment used to
experiment on them. These companies are prepared to spend huge amounts
of money to oppose legislation that will deprive them of their
profitable markets. With financial interests like these allied to the
prestige of medicine and science the struggle to end speciesism in the
laboratory is bound to be difficult and protracted. What is the best way
to make progress? It does not seem likely that any major Western
democracy is going to abolish all animal experimentation at a stroke.
Governments just do not work like that. Animal experimentation will only
be ended when a series of piecemeal reforms have reduced its importance,
led to its replacement in many fields, and largely changed the public
attitude to animals. The immediate task, then, is to work for these
partial goals, which can be seen as milestones on the long march to the
elimination of all exploitation of sentient animals. All concerned to
end animal suffering can try to make known what is happening at
universities and commercial laboratories in their own communities.
Consumers can refuse to purchase products that have been tested on
animals—especially in cosmetics, alternatives are now available.
Students should decline to carry out experiments they consider
unethical. Anyone can study the academic journals to find out where
painful experiments are being carried out, and then find some way of
making the public aware of what is happening.

It is also necessary to make the issue political. As we have already
seen, legislators receive huge numbers of letters about animal
experiments. But it has taken many years of hard work to make animal
experimentation a political issue. Fortunately this has now started to
happen in several countries. In Europe and Australia animal
experimentation is being addressed seriously by the political parties,
especially those closer to the Green end of the political spectrum. In
the 1988 United States presidential election, the Republican party
platform said that the process of certifying alternatives to animal
testing of drugs and cosmetics should be made simpler and quicker.

The exploitation of laboratory animals is part of the larger problem of
speciesism and it is unlikely to be eliminated altogether until
speciesism itself is eliminated. Surely one day, though, our children’s
children, reading about what was done in laboratories in the twentieth
century, will feel the same sense of horror and incredulity at what
otherwise civilized people could do that we now feel when we read about
the atrocities of the Roman gladiatorial arenas or the
eighteenth-century slave trade.

_Chapter 3_

Down on the Factory Farm …

_or what happened to your dinner when it was still an animal_

For most human beings, especially those in modern urban and suburban
communities, the most direct form of contact with nonhuman animals is at
mealtime: we eat them. This simple fact is the key to our attitudes to
other animals, and also the key to what each one of us can do about
changing these attitudes. The use and abuse of animals raised for food
far exceeds, in sheer numbers of animals affected, any other kind of
mistreatment. Over 100 million cows, pigs, and sheep are raised and
slaughtered in the United States alone each year; and for poultry the
figure is a staggering 5 billion. (That means that about eight thousand
birds—mostly chickens—will have been slaughtered in the time it takes
you to read this page.) It is here, on our dinner table and in our
neighborhood supermarket or butcher’s shop, that we are brought into
direct touch with the most extensive exploitation of other species that
has ever existed.

In general, we are ignorant of the abuse of living creatures that lies
behind the food we eat. Buying food in a store or restaurant is the
culmination of a long process, of which all but the end product is
delicately screened from our eyes. We buy our meat and poultry in neat
plastic packages. It hardly bleeds. There is no reason to associate this
package with a living, breathing, walking, suffering animal. The very
words we use conceal its origins: we eat beef, not bull, steer, or cow,
and pork, not pig—although for some reason we seem to find it easier to
face the true nature of a leg of lamb. The term “meat” is itself
deceptive. It originally meant any solid food, not necessarily the flesh
of animals. This usage still lingers in an expression like “nut meat,”
which seems to imply a substitute for “flesh meat” but actually has an
equally good claim to be called “meat” in its own right. By using the
more general “meat” we avoid facing the fact that what we are eating is
really flesh.

These verbal disguises are merely the top layer of a much deeper
ignorance of the origin of our food. Consider the images conjured up by
the word “farm”: a house; a barn; a flock of hens, overseen by a
strutting rooster, scratching around the farmyard; a herd of cows being
brought in from the fields for milking; and perhaps a sow rooting around
in the orchard with a litter of squealing piglets running excitedly
behind her.

Very few farms were ever as idyllic as that traditional image would have
us believe. Yet we still think of a farm as a pleasant place, far
removed from our own industrial, profit-conscious city life. Of those
few who think about the lives of animals on farms, not many know much
about modern methods of animal raising. Some people wonder whether
animals are slaughtered painlessly, and anyone who has followed a
truckload of cattle on the road will probably know that farm animals are
transported in extremely crowded conditions; but not many suspect that
transportation and slaughter are anything more than the brief and
inevitable conclusion of a life of ease and contentment, a life that
contains the natural pleasures of animal existence without the hardships
that wild animals must endure in their struggle for survival.

These comfortable assumptions bear little relation to the realities of
modern farming. For a start, farming is no longer controlled by simple
country folk. During the last fifty years, large corporations and
assembly-line methods of production have turned agriculture into
agribusiness. The process began when big companies gained control of
poultry production, once the preserve of the farmer’s wife. Today, fifty
large corporations virtually control all poultry production in the
United States. In the field of egg production, where fifty years ago a
big producer might have had three thousand laying hens, today many
producers have more than 500,000 layers, and the largest have over 10
million. The remaining small producers have had to adopt the methods of
the giants or else go out of business. Companies that had no connection
with agriculture have become farmers on a huge scale in order to gain
tax concessions or to diversify profits. Greyhound Corporation now
produces turkeys, and your roast beef may have come from John Hancock
Mutual Life Insurance or from one of a dozen oil companies that have
invested in cattle feeding, building feedlots that hold 100,000 or more
cattle.¹

The big corporations and those who must compete with them are not
concerned with a sense of harmony among plants, animals, and nature.
Farming is competitive and the methods adopted are those that cut costs
and increase production. So farming is now “factory farming.” Animals
are treated like machines that convert low-priced fodder into
high-priced flesh, and any innovation will be used if it results in a
cheaper “conversion ratio.” Most of this chapter is simply a description
of these methods, and of what they mean for the animals to whom they are
applied. The aim is to demonstrate that under these methods animals lead
miserable lives from birth to slaughter. Once again, however, my point
is not that the people who do these things to the animals are cruel and
wicked. On the contrary, the attitudes of the consumers and the
producers are not fundamentally different. The farming methods I am
about to describe are merely the logical application of the attitudes
and prejudices that are discussed elsewhere in this book. Once we place
nonhuman animals outside our sphere of moral consideration and treat
them as things we use to satisfy our own desires, the outcome is
predictable.

As in the previous chapter, in order to make my account as objective as
possible I have not based the descriptions that follow on my own
personal observations of farms and the conditions on them. Had I done so
I could have been charged with writing a selective, biased account,
based on a few visits to unusually bad farms. Instead, the account is
drawn largely from the sources that can be expected to be most favorable
to the farming industry: the magazines and trade journals of the farm
industry itself.

Naturally, articles directly exposing the suffering of farm animals are
not to be found in farm magazines, especially not now that the
sensitivity of the issue has been brought to the industry’s attention.
Farm magazines are not interested in the question of animal suffering in
itself. Farmers are sometimes advised to avoid practices that would make
their animals suffer because the animals will gain less weight under
these conditions; and they are urged to handle their animals less
roughly when they send them to slaughter because a bruised carcass
fetches a lower price; but the idea that we should avoid confining
animals in uncomfortable conditions simply because this is in itself a
bad thing is not mentioned. Ruth Harrison, the author of _Animal
Machines_, a pioneering exposé of intensive farming methods in Britain,
concluded that “cruelty is acknowledged only where profitability
ceases.”² That, certainly, is the attitude exhibited in the pages of the
farming magazines, in the United States as well as in Britain.

Still, we can learn a great deal about the conditions of farm animals
from the farm magazines. We learn about the attitudes of some of the
farmers to the animals under their absolute and unrestricted rule, and
we learn also about the new methods and techniques that are being
adopted and about the problems that arise with these techniques.
Provided we know a little about the requirements of farm animals, this
information is enough to give us a broad picture of animal farming
today. We can put the picture in sharper focus by turning to some of the
scientific studies of the welfare of farm animals that, in response to
the pressure of the Animal Liberation movement, are appearing in
increasing numbers in agricultural and veterinary journals.

The first animal to be removed from the relatively natural conditions of
the traditional farm was the chicken. Human beings use chickens in two
ways: for their flesh and for their eggs. There are now standard
mass-production techniques for obtaining both of these products.

Promoters of agribusiness consider the rise of the chicken industry to
be one of the great success stories of farming. At the end of World War
II chicken for the table was still relatively rare. It came mainly from
small independent farmers or from the unwanted males produced by
egg-laying flocks. Today in the United States, 102 million broilers—as
table chickens are called—are slaughtered each week after being reared
in highly automated factorylike plants that belong to the large
corporations that control production. Eight of these corporations
account for over 50 percent of the 5.3 billion birds killed annually in
the U.S.³

The essential step in turning chickens from farmyard birds into
manufactured items was confining them indoors. A producer of broilers
gets a load of 10,000, 50,000, or more day-old chicks from the
hatcheries, and puts them into a long, windowless shed—usually on the
floor, although some producers use tiers of cages in order to get more
birds into the same size shed. Inside the shed, every aspect of the
birds’ environment is controlled to make them grow faster on less feed.
Food and water are fed automatically from hoppers suspended from the
roof. The lighting is adjusted according to advice from agricultural
researchers: for instance, there may be bright light twenty-four hours a
day for the first week or two, to encourage the chicks to gain weight
quickly; then the lights may be dimmed slightly and made to go off and
on every two hours, in the belief that the chickens are readier to eat
after a period of sleep; finally there comes a point, around six weeks
of age, when the birds have grown so much that they are becoming
crowded, and the lights will then be made very dim at all times. The
point of this dim lighting is to reduce the aggression caused by
crowding.

Broiler chickens are killed when they are seven weeks old (the natural
lifespan of a chicken is about seven years). At the end of this brief
period, the birds weigh between four and five pounds; yet they still may
have as little as half a square foot of space per chicken—or less than
the area of a sheet of standard typing paper. (In metric terms, this is
450 square centimeters for a hen weighing more than two kilos.) Under
these conditions, when there is normal lighting, the stress of crowding
and the absence of natural outlets for the birds’ energies lead to
outbreaks of fighting, with birds pecking at each other’s feathers and
sometimes killing and eating one another. Very dim lighting has been
found to reduce such behavior and so the birds are likely to live out
their last weeks in near-darkness.

Feather-pecking and cannibalism are, in the broiler producer’s language,
“vices.” They are not natural vices, however; they are the result of the
stress and crowding to which modern broiler producers subject their
birds. Chickens are highly social animals, and in the farmyard they
develop a hierarchy, sometimes called a “pecking order.” Every bird
yields, at the food trough or elsewhere, to those who are higher in the
pecking order, and takes precedence over those who are below. There may
be a few confrontations before the order is established, but more often
than not a show of force, rather that actual physical contact, is
enough. As Konrad Lorenz, a renowned observer of animal behavior, wrote
in the days when flocks were still small:

Do animals thus know each other among themselves? They certainly do.…
Every poultry farmer knows that … there exists a very definite order, in
which each bird is afraid of those that are above her in rank. After
some few disputes, which need not necessarily come to blows, each bird
knows which of the others she has to fear and which must show respect to
her. Not only physical strength, but also personal courage, energy, and
even the self-assurance of every individual bird are decisive in the
maintenance of the pecking order.⁴

Other studies have shown that a flock of up to ninety chickens can
maintain a stable social order, each bird knowing its place; but 80,000
birds crowded together in a single shed is obviously a different matter.
The birds cannot establish a social order, and as a result they fight
frequently with each other. Quite apart from the inability of the
individual bird to recognize so many other birds, the mere fact of
extreme crowding probably contributes to irritability and excitability
in chickens, as it does in human beings and other animals. This is
something that farmers have long known:

Feather-pecking and cannibalism easily become serious vices among birds
kept under intensive conditions. They mean lower productivity and lost
profits. Birds become bored and peck at some outstanding part of another
bird’s plumage.… While idleness and boredom are predisposing causes of
the vices, cramped, stuffy and overheated housing are contributory
causes.⁵

Farmers must stop “vices” since they cost money; but, although they may
know that overcrowding is the root cause, they cannot do anything about
this, since in the competitive state of the industry, eliminating
overcrowding could mean eliminating one’s profit margin at the same
time. Costs for the building, for the automatic feeding equipment, for
the fuel used to heat and ventilate the building, and for the labor
would remain the same, but with fewer birds per shed to sell, income
would be reduced. So farmers direct their efforts to reducing the
consequences of the stress that costs them money. The unnatural way in
which the birds are kept causes the vices, but to control them the
poultry farmer must make the conditions still more unnatural. Very dim
lighting is one way of doing this. A more drastic step, though one now
very widely used in the industry, is “debeaking.”

First started in San Diego in the 1940s, debeaking used to be performed
with a blowtorch. The farmer would burn away the upper beaks of the
chickens so that they were unable to pick at each other’s feathers. A
modified soldering iron soon replaced this crude technique, and today
specially designed guillotinelike devices with hot blades are the
preferred instrument. The infant chick’s beak is inserted into the
instrument, and the hot blade cuts off the end of it. The procedure is
carried out very quickly, about fifteen birds a minute. Such haste means
that the temperature and sharpness of the blade can vary, resulting in
sloppy cutting and serious injury to the bird:

An excessively hot blade causes blisters in the mouth. A cold or dull
blade may cause the development of a fleshy, bulb-like growth on the end
of the mandible. Such growths are very sensitive.⁶

Joseph Mauldin, a University of Georgia extension poultry scientist,
reported on his field observations at a conference on poultry health:

There are many cases of burned nostrils and severe mutilations due to
incorrect procedures which unquestionably influence acute and chronic
pain, feeding behavior and production factors. I have evaluated beak
trimming quality for private broiler companies and most are content to
achieve 70% falling into properly trimmed categories.… Replacement
pullets have their beaks trimmed by crews who are paid for quantity
rather than quality work.⁷

Even when the operation is done correctly, it is a mistake to think of
it as a painless procedure, like cutting toenails. As an expert British
government committee under zoologist Professor F. W. Rogers Brambell
found some years ago:

Between the horn and the bone is a thin layer of highly sensitive soft
tissue, resembling the “quick” of the human nail. The hot knife used in
debeaking cuts through this complex of horn, bone and sensitive tissue,
causing severe pain.⁸

Moreover the damage done to the bird by debeaking is long term: chickens
mutilated in this way eat less and lose weight for several weeks.⁹ The
most likely explanation for this is that the injured beak continues to
cause pain. J. Breward and M. J. Gentle, researchers at the British
Agricultural and Food Research Council’s Poultry Research Centre,
investigated the beak stumps of debeaked hens and found that the damaged
nerves grew again, turning in on themselves to form a mass of
intertwining nerve fibers, called a neuroma. These neuromas have been
shown in humans with amputated stumps to cause both acute and chronic
pain. Breward and Gentle found that this is probably also the case in
the neuromas formed by debeaking.¹⁰ Subsequently Gentle, expressing
himself with the caution to be expected from a poultry scientist writing
in a scientific journal, has said:

In conclusion, it is fair to say that we do not know how much discomfort
or pain birds experience after beak trimming but in a caring society
they should be given the benefit of the doubt. To prevent cannibalism
and feather pecking of poultry, good husbandry is essential and in
circumstances where light intensity cannot be controlled the only
alternative is to attempt to breed birds which do not exhibit these
damaging traits.¹¹

There is also another possible solution. Debeaking, which is routinely
performed in anticipation of cannibalism by most producers, greatly
reduces the amount of damage a chicken can do to other chickens. But it
obviously does nothing to reduce the stress and overcrowding that lead
to such unnatural cannibalism in the first place. Old-fashioned farmers,
keeping a small flock with plenty of space, had no need to debeak their
birds.

Once, chickens were individuals; if a chicken bullied others (and this
could happen, though it was not the general rule) that bird would be
removed from the flock. Similarly, birds who fell sick or were injured
could be attended to, or if necessary, quickly killed. Now one person
looks after tens of thousands of birds. A United States secretary of
agriculture wrote enthusiastically about how one person could care for
60,000 to 75,000 broilers.¹² _Poultry World_ recently published a
feature story on the broiler unit of David Dereham, who takes care of
88,000 broilers, housed under one roof, all by himself, and farms sixty
acres of land as well! “Take care of” does not mean what it used to,
since if a poultry farmer were to spend no more than one second a day
inspecting each bird, it would take more than twenty-four hours a day
merely to complete the inspection of 88,000 birds, let alone do the
other chores and a bit of farming on the side. And then there is the
exceedingly dim lighting to make the task of inspection even more
difficult. In fact, all the modern poultry farmer does is remove dead
birds. It is cheaper to lose a few extra birds in this way than to pay
for the additional labor needed to watch the health of individual birds.

In order to allow total control of light and some control of temperature
(there is usually heating, but rarely cooling) the broiler sheds have
solid, windowless walls and rely on artificial ventilation. The birds
never see daylight, until the day they are taken out to be killed; nor
do they breathe air which is not heavy with the ammonia from their own
droppings. The ventilation is adequate to keep the birds alive in normal
circumstances, but if there should be a mechanical failure they soon
suffocate. Even as obvious a possibility as a power failure can be
disastrous, since not all broiler producers have their own auxiliary
power units.

Among other ways in which birds can suffocate in a broiler house is a
phenomemon known as “piling.” Chickens kept in the broiler sheds become
nervous, jittery creatures. Unused to strong light, loud noise, or other
intrusions, they may panic at a sudden disturbance and flee to one
corner of the shed. In their terrified rush to safety they pile on top
of each other so that, as one poultry farmer describes it, they “smother
each other in a pitiful heap of bodies in one corner of the rearing
area.”¹⁴

Even if the birds escape these hazards, they may succumb to any of a
number of diseases that are often prevalent in the broiler houses. One
new and still mysterious cause of death is known simply as “acute death
syndrome,” or ADS. Apparently the product of the unnatural conditions
generated by the broiler industry, ADS has been shown to kill an average
of roughly 2 percent of broiler flocks in Canada and Australia, and
presumably the figures are similar wherever the same methods are used.¹⁵
It has been described in the following way:

Chickens exhibited a sudden attack prior to death characterised by loss
of balance, violent flapping, and strong muscular contractions.… Birds
were observed to fall forwards or backwards during the initial loss of
balance and could turn over on their back or their sternum during the
course of violent flapping.¹⁶

None of the studies offers a clear explanation of why these apparently
healthy chickens should suddenly collapse and die, but a poultry
specialist with the British Ministry of Agriculture has linked it to the
very goal for which the entire broiler industry strives—rapid growth:

Broiler mortality levels have increased and it is reasonable to
speculate whether this can be indirectly attributed to the very
considerable genetic and nutritional advances that have been made. In
other words, we may be expecting broilers to grow too
quickly—multiplying their weight 50–60 times in 7 weeks.… “Flip-overs,”
that is, the sudden death of thriving young broilers (usually males) may
also be connected with this “super-charged” growth.¹⁷

The fast growth rate also causes crippling and deformities that force
producers to kill an additional 1 to 2 percent of broiler chickens—and
since only severe cases are culled, the number of birds suffering from
deformities is bound to be much higher.¹⁸ The authors of a study of one
particular form of crippling concluded: “We consider that birds might
have been bred to grow so fast that they are on the verge of structural
collapse.”¹⁹

The atmosphere in which the birds must live is itself a health hazard.
During the seven or eight weeks the birds are in the sheds, no effort is
made to change the litter or remove the birds’ droppings. Despite
mechanical ventilation, the air becomes charged with ammonia, dust, and
microorganisms. Studies have shown that, as one might expect, dust,
ammonia, and bacteria have damaging effects on the birds’ lungs.²⁰ The
department of community medicine at the University of Melbourne,
Australia, conducted a study into the health hazards of this atmosphere
for chicken farmers. They found that 70 percent of farmers reported sore
eyes, nearly 30 percent regular coughing, and nearly 15 percent asthma
and chronic bronchitis. As a result, the researchers warned chicken
farmers to spend as little time as possible in their sheds and to wear a
respirator when they go in. But the study said nothing about respirators
for the chickens.²¹

When the birds must stand and sit on rotting, dirty, ammonia-charged
litter, they also suffer from ulcerated feet, breast blisters, and hock
burns. “Chicken parts” are often the remaining parts of damaged birds
whose bodies cannot be sold whole. Damage to the feet, however, is not a
problem for the industry, since the feet are cut off after slaughter
anyway.

If living in long, crowded, ammonia-filled, dusty, windowless sheds is
stressful, the birds’ first and only experience of sunlight is no less
so. The doors will be flung open and the birds, accustomed now to
semidarkness, are grabbed by the legs, carried out upside down, and
summarily stuffed into crates which are piled on the back of a truck.
Then they are driven to the “processing” plant where the chickens are to
be killed, cleaned, and turned into neat plastic packages. At the plant
they are taken off the truck and stacked, still in crates, to await
their turn. That may take several hours, during which time they remain
without food and water. Finally they are taken out of the crates and
hung upside down on the conveyor belt taking them to the knife that will
end their joyless existence.

The plucked and dressed bodies of the chickens will then be sold to
millions of families who will gnaw on their bones without pausing for an
instant to think that they are eating the dead body of a once living
creature, or to ask what was done to that creature in order to enable
them to buy and eat its body. And if they did stop to ask, where would
they find the answer? If they get their information from the chicken
tycoon Frank Perdue, the fourth largest broiler producer in the United
States, but definitely first in self-promotion, they will be told that
the chickens on his “farm” are pampered and “lead such a soft life.”²²
How are ordinary people to find out that Perdue keeps his chickens in
150-yard-long buildings that house 27,000 birds? How are they to know
that Perdue’s mass production system alone kills 6.8 million birds a
week, and that, like many other broiler producers, he cuts the beaks off
his chickens in order to prevent them from becoming cannibals under the
stress of modern factory life?²³

Perdue’s publicity promotes a common myth: that economic rewards for the
farmer and a good life for the birds or animals go hand in hand.
Apologists for factory farming often say that if the birds or animals
were not happy, they would not thrive and hence would not be profitable.
The broiler industry provides a clear refutation of this naive myth. A
study published in _Poultry Science_ showed that giving chickens as
little as 372 square centimeters per bird (20 percent less than the
standard amount used in the industry) could be profitable, even though
so small a space allowance meant that 6.4 percent of the birds died
(more than at lower densities), that birds were underweight, and that
there was a high incidence of breast blisters. As the authors point out,
the key to profitability in the poultry industry is not profit per bird,
but profit for the unit as a whole:

Mean monetary returns per bird started to decline … as stocking density
increased. However, when monetary returns were calculated on the basis
of returns per unit of floor area, the reverse effect occurred; monetary
returns increased as stocking density increased. Although extremely high
stocking densities were tested, the point of diminishing returns was not
reached despite the reduction in growth rate.²⁴

The reader who, after reading this section, is contemplating buying
turkey instead of chicken should be warned that this traditional
centerpiece of the family’s Thanksgiving dinner is now reared by the
same methods as broiler chickens and that debeaking is the general rule
among turkeys too. According to _Turkey World_, an “explosion of turkey
production” has been taking place during the last few years and is
expected to continue. The $2 billion turkey industry raised 207 million
turkeys in 1985, with twenty large corporations producing over 80
percent of them. Turkeys spend between thirteen and twenty-four weeks in
intensive conditions, more than twice as long as their smaller
counterparts, before they meet their end.²⁵

“A hen,” Samuel Butler once wrote, “is only an egg’s way of making
another egg.” Butler, no doubt, thought he was being funny; but when
Fred C. Haley, president of a Georgia poultry firm that controls the
lives of 225,000 laying hens, describes the hen as “an egg producing
machine” his words have more serious implications. To emphasize his
businesslike attitude, Haley adds, “The object of producing eggs is to
make money. When we forget this objective, we have forgotten what it is
all about.”²⁶

Nor is this only an American attitude. A British farming magazine has
told its readers:

The modern layer is, after all, only a very efficient converting
machine, changing the raw material—feedingstuffs—into the finished
product—the egg—less, of course, maintenance requirements.²⁷

The idea that the layer is an efficient way to turn feed into eggs is
common in the industry trade journals, particularly in advertisements.
As may be anticipated, its consequences for the laying hens are not
good.

Laying hens go through many of the same procedures as broilers, but
there are some differences. Like broilers, layers have to be debeaked,
to prevent the cannibalism that would otherwise occur in their crowded
conditions; but because they live much longer than broilers, they often
go through this operation twice. So we find poultry specialist Dick
Wells, head of Britain’s National Institute of Poultry Husbandry,
recommending debeaking “sometime between 5 and 10 days of age,” because
there is less stress on the chicks at this time than if the operation is
done earlier, and in addition “it is a good way of decreasing the risk
of early mortality.”²⁸ When the hens are moved from the growing house to
the laying facility between twelve and eighteen weeks of age they are
often debeaked again.²⁹

The sufferings of laying chickens begin early in life. The newly hatched
chicks are sorted into males and females by a “chick-puller.” Since the
male chicks have no commercial value, they are discarded. Some companies
gas the little birds, but often they are dumped alive into a plastic
sack and allowed to suffocate under the weight of other chicks dumped on
top of them. Others are ground up, while still alive, to be turned into
feed for their sisters. At least 160 million birds are gassed,
suffocated, or die this way every year in the United States alone.³⁰
Just how many suffer each particular fate is impossible to tell, because
no records are kept: the growers think of getting rid of male chicks as
we think of putting out the trash.

Life for the female laying birds is longer, but this is scarcely a
benefit. Pullets (as the younger birds not yet ready to lay are called)
used to be reared outdoors, in the belief that this made them stronger
laying birds, better able to withstand life in the cage. Now they have
been moved inside, and in many cases are placed in cages almost from
birth, since with tiers of cages more birds can be accommodated in each
shed and the overhead per bird is correspondingly lower. Since the birds
grow rapidly, however, they have to be moved to larger cages and this is
a disadvantage, since “mortality may be a little higher.… Broken legs
and bruised heads are bound to occur when you move birds.”³¹

Whatever the method of rearing used, all the big egg producers now keep
their laying hens in cages. (These are often referred to as “batteries”
or “battery cages,” not because there is anything electrical about them,
but from the original meaning of the word “battery” as “a set of similar
or connected units of equipment.”) When cages were first introduced
there was only one bird to a cage, the idea being that the farmer could
then tell which birds were not laying enough eggs to give an economic
return on their food. Those birds would then be killed. Then it was
found that more birds could be housed and costs per bird reduced if two
birds were put in each cage. That was only the first step. Now there is
no question of keeping a tally of each bird’s eggs. Cages are used
because of the greater number of birds who can be housed, warmed, fed,
and watered in one building, and the greater use that can be made of
labor-saving automatic equipment.

The economic demand that labor costs be kept to an absolute minimum
means that laying hens get no more individual attention than broilers.
Alan Hainsworth, owner of a poultry farm in upstate New York, told an
inquiring local reporter that four hours a day was all he needed for the
care of his 36,000 laying hens, while his wife looked after the 20,000
pullets: “It takes her about 15 minutes a day. All she checks is their
automatic feeders, water cups and any deaths during the night.”

This kind of care does not ensure a happy flock, though, as the
reporter’s description shows:

Walk into the pullet house and the reaction is immediate—complete
pandemonium. The squawking is loud and intense as some 20,000 birds
shove to the farthest side of their cages in fear of the human
intruders.³²

Julius Goldman’s Egg City, fifty miles northwest of Los Angeles, was one
of the first million-plus layer units. Already in 1970, when the
_National Geographic Magazine_ did an enthusiastic survey of what were
then still relatively novel farming methods, it consisted of two million
hens divided into block-long buildings containing 90,000 hens each, five
birds to a sixteen-by-eighteen-inch cage. Ben Shames, Egg City’s
executive vice-president, explained to their reporter the methods used
to look after so many birds:

We keep track of the food eaten and the eggs collected in 2 rows of
cages among the 110 rows in each building. When production drops to the
uneconomic point, all 90,000 birds are sold to processors for potpies or
chicken soup. It doesn’t pay to keep track of every row in the house,
let alone individual hens; with 2 million birds on hand you have to rely
on statistical samplings.³³

In most egg factories the cages are stacked in tiers, with food and
water troughs running along the rows filled automatically from a central
supply. The cages have sloping wire floors. The slope—usually a gradient
of one in five—makes it more difficult for the birds to stand
comfortably, but it causes the eggs to roll to the front of the cage
where they can easily be collected by hand or, in the more modern
plants, carried by conveyor belt to a packing plant.

The wire floor also has an economic justification. The excrement drops
through and can be allowed to pile up for many months until it is all
removed in a single operation. (Some producers remove it more
frequently; others don’t.) Unfortunately the claws of the hen are not
well adapted to living on wire, and reports of damage to hens’ feet are
common whenever anyone bothers to make an examination. Without any solid
ground to wear them down, the birds’ toenails become very long and may
get permanently entangled in the wire. A former president of a national
poultry organization reminisced in an industry magazine about this:

We have discovered chickens literally grown fast to the cages. It seems
that the chickens’ toes got caught in the wire mesh in some manner and
would not loosen. So, in time, the flesh of the toes grew completely
around the wire. Fortunately for the birds, they were caught near the
front of the cages where food and water were easily available to them.³⁴

Next we must consider the amount of living space available to laying
hens in cages. In Britain, the Protection of Birds Act, passed in 1954,
is intended to prevent cruelty to birds. Clause 8, subsection 1 of this
law runs as follows:

If any person keeps or confines any bird whatsoever in any cage or other
receptacle which is not sufficient in height, length or breadth to
permit the bird to stretch its wings freely, he shall be guilty of an
offence against the Act and be liable to a special penalty.

While any caging is objectionable, the principle that a cage should be
large enough to allow birds to stretch their wings freely seems an
absolute minimum necessary to protect them from an intolerable degree of
confinement that frustrates a very basic urge. So may we assume that
poultry cages in Britain must at least be large enough to give the birds
this minimal freedom? No. The subsection quoted above has a short but
significant proviso attached to it:

Provided that this subsection shall not apply to poultry …

This amazing proviso testifies to the relative strength of desires that
emanate from the stomach and those that are based on compassion in a
country that has a reputation for kindness to animals. Nothing in the
nature of those birds we call “poultry” makes them less desirous of
stretching their wings than other birds. The only conclusion we can draw
is that the members of the British Parliament are against cruelty except
when it produces their breakfast.

There is a close parallel to this in the United States. Under the Animal
Welfare Act of 1970 and subsequent revisions, standards have been set
requiring cages for animals to “provide sufficient space to allow each
animal to make normal postural and social adjustments with adequate
freedom of movement.” This act applies to zoos, circuses, wholesale pet
dealers, and laboratories, but not to animals being reared for food.³⁵

So how do cages for laying hens measure up by the minimal standard set
for birds in general? To answer this question we need to know that the
wingspan of the most common type of hen averages around thirty inches.
Cage sizes vary, but according to _Poultry Tribune_,

a typical size is 12 by 20 inches in which anywhere from one to five
layers are housed. Space available per bird varies from 240 to 48 square
inches depending on the number of birds per cage. There is a tendency to
crowd the layers to reduce building and equipment costs per bird.³⁶

Obviously this size is too small for even one bird to stretch her wings
fully, let alone five birds in the same cage—and as the last line of the
quoted passage hints, four or five birds, not one or two, is the
industry standard.

Since the first edition of this book was published, the conditions under
which hens are housed in modern intensive farming have been the subject
of numerous studies, both by scientific and governmental committees. In
1981 the British House of Commons Agriculture Committee issued a report
on animal welfare in which it said “we have seen for ourselves battery
cages, both experimental and commercial, and we greatly dislike what we
saw.” The committee recommended that the British government should take
the initiative in having battery cages phased out within five years.³⁷
Still more telling, however, was a study conducted at the Houghton
Poultry Research Station in Britain on the space required by hens for
various activities. This study found that the typical hen at rest
physically occupies an area of 637 square centimeters, but if a bird is
to be able to turn around at ease, she would need a space of 1,681
square centimeters if kept in a single cage. In a five-bird cage, the
study concluded that the size of the cage should allow room at the front
for all birds, and therefore needed to be not less than 106.5
centimeters long and 41 centimeters deep, giving each bird 873 square
centimeters (approximately 42 by 16 inches).³⁸ The 48 square inches
noted above in the _Poultry Tribune_ article, when five birds are in the
standard twelve-by-twenty-inch cages, converts to just 300 square
centimeters. With only four birds in such cages, each bird has 375
square centimeters.

Although the British government has taken no action on the
recommendation to take the intitiative in phasing out cages, change is
possible. In 1981 Switzerland began a ten-year phase-out of battery
cages. By 1987 birds in cages had to have a minimum of 500 square
centimeters; and on the first day of 1992, traditional cages will be
outlawed and all laying hens will have access to protected, soft-floored
nesting boxes.³⁹ In the Netherlands, conventional battery cages will
become illegal in 1994, and hens will have a minimum space allowance of
1,000 square centimeters, as well as access to nesting and scratching
areas. More far-reaching still, however, is a Swedish law passed in July
1988 that requires the abolition of cages for hens over the next ten
years and states that cows, pigs, and animals raised for their furs must
be kept “in as natural an environment as possible.”⁴⁰

The rest of Europe is still debating the future of the battery cage. In
1986 the ministers of agriculture of the European Community countries
set the minimum space allowance for laying hens at 450 square
centimeters. Now it has been decided that this minimum will not become a
legal requirement until 1995. Dr. Mandy Hill, deputy director of the
British Ministry of Agriculture’s Gleadthorpe experimental farm, has
estimated that 6.5 million birds in Britain will need to be rehoused,
indicating that this many birds at present have less than this
ridiculously low minimum.⁴¹ But since the total British laying flock is
around 50 million, and approximately 90 percent of these are kept in
cages, this also shows that the new minimum will do no more than write
into the law the very high stocking densities that most egg producers
are already using. Only a minority who squeeze their birds even more
tightly than is standard in the industry will have to change. Meanwhile
in 1987 the European Parliament recommended that battery cages be phased
out in the European Community within ten years.⁴² But the European
Parliament only has advisory powers, and Europeans anxious to see the
end of the cages have nothing to celebrate yet.

The United States, however, lags far behind Europe in even beginning to
tackle this problem. The European Community minimum standard of 450
square centimeters is equivalent to seventy square inches per hen; in
the United States, United Egg Producers has recommended forty-eight
square inches as a U.S. standard.⁴³ But the space allowed to birds on
farms is often still less. At the Hainsworth farm in Mt. Morris, New
York, four hens were squeezed into cages twelve inches by twelve
inches—36 square inches per bird—and the reporter added: “Some hold five
birds when Hainsworth has more birds than room.”⁴⁴ The truth is that
whatever official or semiofficial recommendations there may be, one
never knows how many hens are packed into cages unless one goes and
looks. In Australia, where a government “Code of Practice” suggests that
there should be no more than four hens in an eighteen-by-eighteen-inch
cage, an unannounced visit to one farm in the state of Victoria in 1988
revealed seven birds in one cage that size, and five or six in many
others. Yet the Department of Agriculture in the state of Victoria
refused to prosecute the producer.⁴⁵ Seven birds in a cage eighteen
inches square have just 289 square centimeters, or forty-six square
inches. At these stocking rates a single sheet of typing paper
represents the living space for two hens, and the birds are virtually
sitting on top of each other.

Under the conditions standard on modern egg farms in the United States,
Britain, and almost every other developed nation except, shortly,
Switzerland, the Netherlands, and Sweden, every natural instinct the
birds have is frustrated. They cannot walk around, scratch the ground,
bathe in the dust, build nests, or stretch their wings. They are not
part of a flock. They cannot keep out of each other’s way, and weaker
birds have no escape from the attacks of stronger ones, already maddened
by the unnatural conditions. The extraordinary degree of crowding
results in a condition that scientists call “stress,” resembling the
stress that occurs in human beings subject to extreme crowding,
confinement, and frustration of basic activities. We saw that in
broilers this stress leads to aggressive pecking and cannibalism. In
layers, kept for longer periods, the Texas naturalist Roy Bedichek
observed other signs:

I have looked attentively at chickens raised in this fashion and to me
they seem to be unhappy.… The battery chickens I have observed seem to
lose their minds about the time they would normally be weaned by their
mothers and off in the weeds chasing grasshoppers on their own account.
Yes, literally, actually, the battery becomes a gallinaceous madhouse.⁴⁶

Noise is another indication of distress. Hens scratching in a field are
generally quiet, making only an occasional cluck. Caged hens tend to be
very noisy. I have already quoted the reporter who visited the pullet
house on the Hainsworth farm and found “complete pandemonium.” Here is
the same reporter’s account of the laying house:

The birds in the laying house are hysterical. The uproar of the pullet
house was no preparation for this. Birds squawk, cackle and cluck as
they scramble over one another for a peck at the automatically
controlled grain trough or a drink of water. This is how the hens spend
their short life of ceaseless production.⁴⁷

The impossibility of building a nest and laying an egg in it is another
source of distress for the hen. Konrad Lorenz has described the laying
process as the worst torture to which a battery hen is exposed:

For the person who knows something about animals it is truly
heart-rending to watch how a chicken tries again and again to crawl
beneath her fellow-cagemates, to search there in vain for cover. Under
these circumstances hens will undoubtedly hold back their eggs for as
long as possible. Their instinctive reluctance to lay eggs amidst the
crowd of their cagemates is certainly as great as the one of civilised
people to defecate in an analogous situation.⁴⁸

Lorenz’s view has been supported by a study in which hens were able to
gain access to a nesting box only by overcoming increasingly difficult
obstacles. Their high motivation to lay in a nest was shown by the fact
that they worked just as hard to reach the nesting box as they did to
reach food after they had been deprived of food for twenty hours.⁴⁹
Perhaps one reason why hens have evolved an instinct to lay eggs in
privacy is that the vent area becomes red and moist when the egg is
laid, and if this is visible to other birds, they may peck at it. If
this pecking draws blood, further pecking will result, which can lead to
cannibalism.

Hens also provide another kind of evidence that they never lose their
nesting instinct. Several of my friends have adopted a few hens who were
at the end of their commercial laying period and about to be sent to the
slaughterhouse. When these birds are released in a backyard and provided
with some straw, they immediately start to build nests—even after more
than a year spent in a bare metal cage. In Switzerland, by the end of
1991, the law will require that laying hens have protected, darkened,
and soft-floored or litter-lined nesting boxes. Swiss scientists have
even investigated what kind of litter hens prefer and found that both
caged hens and hens who had been reared on litter preferred oat husks or
wheat straw; as soon as they discovered that they had a choice, none
laid eggs on wire floors or even on synthetic grass. Significantly the
study found that while nearly all the hens reared on litter had left the
nesting boxes forty-five minutes after they were admitted to them, the
cage-reared birds seemed to be so entranced with their new-found
comforts that at the end of this period 87 percent of them were still
sitting there!⁵⁰

This story is repeated with other basic instincts thwarted by the cage
system. Two scientists watched hens who had been kept in cages for the
first six months of their lives and found that within the first ten
minutes after release, half of the hens had already flapped their wings,
an activity that was barely possible in the cages.⁵¹ The same is true of
dustbathing—another important instinctive activity that has been shown
to be necessary for maintaining feather quality.⁵² A farmyard hen will
find a suitable area of fine soil and then form a hollow in it, fluffing
up the soil into her feathers and then shaking energetically to remove
the dust. The need to do this is instinctive, and present even in caged
birds. One study found that birds kept on wire floors had “a higher
denudation of the belly” and suggested that “the lack of appropriate
material for dustbathing may be an important factor, as it is well known
that hens perform dustbathing activities directly on the wire floor.”⁵³
Indeed, another researcher found that hens kept on wire actually engage
in dustbathing-like behavior—without any dust to fluff into their
feathers—more often than birds kept on sand, although for shorter
periods of time.⁵⁴ The urge to dustbathe is so strong that hens keep
trying to do so, despite the wire floors, and rub the feathers off their
bellies in the process. Again, if released from the cages, these birds
will take up dustbathing with real relish. It is wonderful to see how a
dejected, timid, almost featherless hen can, in a relatively short
period, recover both her feathers and her natural dignity when put into
a suitable environment.

To appreciate the constant and acute frustration of the lives of hens in
modern egg factories it is best to watch a cage full of hens for a short
period. They seem unable to stand or perch comfortably. Even if one or
two birds were content with their positions, so long as other birds in
the cage are moving, they must move too. It is like watching three
people trying to spend a comfortable night in a single bed—except that
the hens are condemned to this fruitless struggle for an entire year
rather than a single night. An added irritation is that after a few
months in the cages the birds start to lose their feathers, partly from
rubbing against the wire, and partly because other birds are constantly
pecking at them. The result is that their skin begins to rub against the
wire, and it is common to see birds who have been in the cages for some
time with few feathers, and skin rubbed bright red and raw, especially
around the tail.

As with broilers, feather-pecking is a sign of stress and, as one of the
previously quoted studies put it, “the lack of appropriate stimulation
from the physical environment.”⁵⁵ It has been shown that in an enriched
environment, with access to perches, litter in which to scratch, and
nesting boxes, hens peck less and do less feather damage than when they
are kept in conventional cages.⁵⁶ Feather-pecking is itself the cause of
further injuries, because, as another group of researchers has noted,

scratches and torn skin, especially on the back … are more likely to
occur when the skin on the back is no longer protected by feathers.
Thus, fear, feather loss and pain may, at times, all be part of the same
syndrome.⁵⁷

Finally, in most cages there is one bird—maybe more than one in larger
cages—who has lost the will to resist being shoved aside and pushed
underfoot by other birds. Perhaps these are the birds who, in a normal
farmyard, would be low in the pecking order; but under normal conditions
this would not matter so much. In the cage, however, these birds can do
nothing but huddle in a corner, usually near the bottom of the sloping
floor, where their fellow inmates trample over them as they try to get
to the food or water troughs.

Although after all this evidence it might seem otiose to study whether
hens prefer cages or outside runs, Dr. Marian Dawkins of the department
of zoology at Oxford University has done just that, and her work
provides yet more scientific backing for what has already been said.
Given a choice, hens familiar with both grassed runs and cages will go
to the run. In fact, most of them will prefer a run with no food on it
to a cage that does have food in it.⁵⁸

Ultimately the most convincing way a hen can indicate that her
conditions are inadequate is by dying. A high rate of mortality will
occur only under the most extreme conditions, since the normal life span
of a chicken is far longer than the eighteen months to two years that
laying hens are allowed to live. Hens, like humans in concentration
camps, will cling tenaciously to life under the most miserable
conditions. Yet it is commonplace for an egg farm to lose between 10 and
15 percent of its hens in one year, many of them clearly dying of stress
from overcrowding and related problems. Here is one example:

According to the manager of a 50,000 bird egg ranch near Cucamonga,
California, five to ten of his hens succumb daily to confinement stress.
(That’s between two and four thousand per year.) “These birds,” he says,
“don’t die of any disease. They just can’t take the stress of crowded
living.”⁵⁹

A carefully controlled study by members of the department of poultry
science at Cornell University confirmed that crowding increases death
rates. Over a period of less than a year, mortality among layers housed
three to a twelve-by-eighteen-inch cage was 9.6 percent; when four birds
were put in the same cage, mortality jumped to 16.4 percent; with five
birds in the cage, 23 percent died. Despite these findings, the
researchers advised that “under most conditions Leghorn layers should be
housed at four birds per 12 by 18 inch cage,” since the greater total
number of eggs obtained made for a larger return on capital and labor,
which more than compensated for the higher costs in respect of what the
researchers termed “bird depreciation.”⁶⁰ Indeed, if egg prices are
high, the report concluded, “five layers per cage make a greater
profit.” This situation parallels that which we have already seen
demonstrated with regard to broilers, and again proves that animal
factory managers can make bigger profits by keeping their animals in
more crowded conditions, even though more of the animals may die under
those conditions. Since laying eggs is a bodily function (like ovulation
for a woman) hens continue to lay eggs, even when they are kept in
conditions that frustrate all their behavioral needs.

So the hens that produce our eggs live and die. Perhaps those who die
early are the lucky ones, since their hardier companions have nothing in
store for them except another few months of crowded discomfort. They lay
until their productivity declines, and then they are sent off to be
slaughtered and made into chicken pies or soups, which by then is all
they can be used for.

There is only one likely alternative to this routine, and it is not a
pleasant one. When egg production begins to drop off it is possible to
restore the hens’ reproductive powers by a procedure know as
“force-molting.” The object of force-molting is to make the hen go
through the physiological processes associated, under natural
conditions, with the seasonal loss of old plumage and growth of fresh
feathers. After a molt, whether natural or artificial, the hen lays eggs
more frequently. To induce a hen to molt when she is living in a
controlled-environment shed without seasonal changes in temperature or
length of light requires a considerable shock to her system. Typically
the hens will find that their food and water, which have been freely
available to them until this time, are suddenly cut off. For instance,
until quite recently a British Ministry of Agriculture booklet advised
that the second day of a forced molt should be as follows:

No food, light or water. Make sure the food troughs are really empty,
clean out any remaining mash, collect eggs, then turn off the water and
lights and leave the birds for 24 hours.⁶¹

The standard practice was then that after two days water would be
restored and food after another day. Over the next few weeks the
lighting would be returned to normal and those hens who had
survived—some succumbed from the shock—might be expected to be
sufficiently productive to be worth keeping for another six months or
so. Since 1987, as a result of pressure from animal welfare groups, this
method of force-molting has been illegal in Britain, and hens must get
food and water every day. In the United States it is still entirely
legal. Many poultry farmers, however, do not consider this procedure
worth the trouble; hens are cheap, so they prefer to get a new flock as
soon as the present one is past its peak.

To the very end, egg producers allow no sentiment to affect their
attitudes to the birds who have laid so many eggs for them. Unlike the
murderer who gets a special meal before being hanged, the condemned hens
may get no food at all. “Take feed away from spent hens” advises a
headline in _Poultry Tribune_, and the article below tells farmers that
food given to hens in the thirty hours prior to slaughter is wasted,
since processors pay no more for food that remains in the digestive
tract.⁶²

Of all the animals commonly eaten in the Western world, the pig is
without doubt the most intelligent. The natural intelligence of a pig is
comparable and perhaps even superior to that of a dog; it is possible to
rear pigs as companions to human beings and train them to respond to
simple commands much as a dog would. When George Orwell put the pigs in
charge in _Animal Farm_ his choice was defensible on scientific as well
as literary grounds.

The high intelligence of pigs must be borne in mind when we consider
whether the conditions in which they are reared are satisfactory. While
any sentient being, intelligent or not, should be given equal
consideration, animals of different capacities have different
requirements. Common to all is a need for physical comfort. We have seen
that this elementary requirement is denied to hens; and, as we shall
see, it is denied to pigs as well. In addition to physical comfort, a
hen requires the structured social setting of a normal flock; she may
also miss the warmth and reassuring clucks of the mother hen immediately
after hatching; and research has provided evidence that even a chicken
can suffer from simple boredom.⁶³ To whatever extent this is true of
chickens, it is certainly true, and to a greater extent, of pigs.
Researchers at Edinburgh University have studied commercial pigs
released into a seminatural enclosure, and have found that they have
consistent patterns of behavior: they form stable social groups, they
build communal nests, they use dunging areas well away from the nest,
and they are active, spending much of the day rooting around the edge of
the woodlands. When sows are ready to give birth, they leave the
communal nest and build their own nest, finding a suitable site,
scraping a hole, and lining it with grass and twigs. There they give
birth and live for about nine days, until they and their piglets rejoin
the group.⁶⁴ As we shall see, factory farming makes it impossible for
the pigs to follow these instinctive behavior patterns.

Pigs in modern factory farms have nothing to do but eat, sleep, stand
up, and lie down. Usually they have no straw or other bedding material,
because this complicates the task of cleaning. Pigs kept in this way can
hardly fail to put on weight, but they will be bored and unhappy.
Occasionally farmers notice that their pigs like stimulation. One
British farmer wrote to _Farmer’s Weekly_ describing how he had housed
pigs in a derelict farmhouse and found that they played all around the
building, chasing each other up and down the stairs. He concluded:

Our stock need variety of surroundings.… Gadgets of different make,
shape and size should be provided.… Like human beings, they dislike
monotony and boredom.⁶⁵

This common-sense observation has now been backed up by scientific
studies. French research has shown that when deprived or frustrated pigs
are provided with leather strips or chains to pull, they have reduced
levels of corticosteroids (a hormone associated with stress) in their
blood.⁶⁶ British research has shown that pigs kept in a barren
environment are so bored that if they are given both food and an
earth-filled trough, they will root around in the earth before eating.⁶⁷

When kept in barren, overcrowded conditions pigs are prone to “vice,” as
hens are. Instead of feather-pecking and cannibalism pigs take to biting
each other’s tails. This leads to fighting in the pig pen and reduces
gains in weight. Since pigs do not have beaks, farmers cannot debeak
them to prevent this, but they have found another way of eliminating the
symptoms without altering the conditions that cause the trouble: they
cut off the pigs’ tails.

According to the U.S. Department of Agriculture:

Tail docking has become a common practice to prevent tail biting of pigs
in confinement. It should be done by all producers of feeder pigs. Cut
tails 1/4 to 1/2 inch from the body with side-cutting pliers or another
blunt instrument. The crushing action helps to stop bleeding. Some
producers use a chicken debeaker for docking; this also cauterizes the
cut surface.⁶⁸

This is a doubly disgraceful recommendation. But before I explain why,
here are the candid views of a pig producer on tail docking:

They hate it! The pigs just hate it! And I suppose we could probably do
without tail-docking if we gave them more room, because they don’t get
so crazy and mean when they have more space. With enough room, they’re
actually quite nice animals. But we can’t afford it. These buildings
cost a lot.⁶⁹

In addition to more space, another possible remedy is suggested by a
leading farm animal researcher:

The probable underlying cause … is that pigs are using species-typical
activities in an unusual way because no suitable object is available.
The lower incidence of tail-biting in units with straw bedding is
probably due, at least in part, to the “recreational” effects of the
straw.⁷⁰

Now we can see why the U.S. Department of Agriculture’s cold
recommendations are disgraceful. First, no suggestion is made that pigs
having their tails cut off should be given painkillers or anesthetics.
Second, there is no mention of the fact that the need to deprive pigs of
their tails is an indication that the pigs are too crowded or deprived
of straw or anything else to attract their interest. The problem seems
to be that bored pigs gnaw at any attractive object, and if gnawing on
the tail of another pig should produce an injury and draw blood, some
pigs will be attracted to the blood and begin biting in earnest.⁷¹ It is
entirely typical of the mentality of modern animal production, though,
that the answer of both the Department of Agriculture and of the pig
producers is to mutilate the animals instead of giving them the living
conditions they need.

Another respect in which confined pigs resemble confined hens is that
they suffer from stress, and in many cases they die from it. Because in
pig farming an individual pig makes a much larger contribution to total
profits than the individual hen does, the pig farmer has to take this
problem more seriously than the poultry farmer does. There is a name for
the condition—the “porcine stress syndrome”—and the symptoms have been
described in one farming journal as; “extreme stress … rigidity, blotchy
skin, panting, anxiety, and often—sudden death.”⁷² The condition is
especially upsetting to producers because, as the same article says:
“Painfully, you often lose PSS hogs when they near market weight, with a
full investment of feed.”

There is also strong evidence that porcine stress syndrome has increased
dramatically as confinement rearing has become more common.⁷³ Confined
pigs are so delicate that any disturbance can bring on the symptoms,
including a strange noise, sudden bright lights, or the farmer’s dog.
Nevertheless, if one were to suggest reducing stress by eliminating
confinement methods of production, the reaction would almost certainly
be that expressed in _Farmer and Stockbreeder_ some years ago, when
confinement was still fairly new and stress-related deaths were just
beginning to be noticed:

These deaths in no way nullify the extra return obtained from the higher
total output.⁷⁴

In the pig industry, in contrast to the broiler and egg industry, total
confinement is not yet universal. But the trend is in that direction. A
University of Missouri survey revealed that as long ago as 1979, 54
percent of all medium-sized producers and 63 percent of all large
producers had total confinement facilities.⁷⁵ Increasingly, it is the
large producers that dominate the industry. In 1987 William Haw,
president of National Farms, Inc., said that “within ten years the hog
business will be the same as the broiler chicken industry is now, with
fewer than 100 operators of any significance.”⁷⁶ It is the old story:
small family farms are being pushed out of business by large factories,
each “manufacturing” between 50,000 and 300,000 pigs a year. Tyson
Foods, the largest broiler company in the world, slaughtering more that
8.5 million birds a week, has now entered the pig market. The company
runs sixty-nine farrowing and nursery complexes and sends to slaughter
more than 600,000 pigs per year.⁷⁷

So most pigs now spend their entire lives indoors. They are born and
suckled in a farrowing unit, raised initially in a nursery, and brought
to slaughter weight in a growing-feeding unit. Unless they are to be
used as breeders, they are sent to market at between five and six months
of age weighing about 220 pounds.

The desire to cut labor costs has been one major reason for the shift to
confinement. With an intensive system, one man is said to be able to
handle the entire operation, thanks to automated feeding and slatted
floors that allow the manure to drop through for easy disposal. Another
saving, with this as with all other confinement systems, is that with
less room to move about, the pig will burn up less of its food in
“useless” exercise, and so can be expected to put on more weight for
each pound of food consumed. In all of this, as one pig producer said,
“What we are really trying to do is modify the animal’s environment for
maximum profit.”⁷⁸

In addition to stress, boredom, and crowding, modern pig confinement
units create physical problems for the pigs. One is the atmosphere. Here
is a quotation from the herdsman at Lehman Farms, of Strawn, Illinois:

The ammonia really chews up the animals’ lungs.… The bad air’s a
problem. After I’ve been working in here awhile, I can feel it in my own
lungs. But at least I get out of here at night. The pigs don’t, so we
have to keep them on tetracycline, which really does help control the
problem.⁷⁹

Nor is this a producer of particularly low standards. The year before
this statement was made, Lehman had been named Illinois Pork
All-American by the National Pork Producers’ Council.

Another physical problem for the pigs is that the floors of confinement
units are designed for ease of maintenance and the elimination of chores
like manure disposal, rather than for the comfort of the animals. In
most units the floors are either slatted or solid concrete. Neither is
satisfactory; both damage the feet and legs of the pigs. Studies have
shown extraordinarily high rates of foot damage, but a discussion of
slatted floors by the editor of _Farmer and Stockbreeder_ stated the
producers’ attitude to this question clearly:

The commonsense approach at this stage in our knowledge is that for
expendable stock the slatted floor seems to have more merit than
disadvantage. The animal will usually be slaughtered before serious
deformity sets in. On the other hand, breeding stock, with a longer
working life before it, must grow and keep good legs; risk of damage
here would seem to outweigh the advantages.⁸⁰

An American producer put it more tersely:

We don’t get paid for producing animals with good posture around here.
We get paid by the pound.⁸¹

While the fact that the animal will usually be slaughtered before
serious deformity sets in may minimize the financial loss to the
producer, it can hardly comfort the animals, standing continuously on
unsuitable flooring, acquiring foot or leg deformities that would become
serious were the pigs not to be slaughtered at an early age.

The solution, of course, is to take the pigs off bare concrete floors.
One British pig farmer with three hundred sows did just that, putting
his pigs in outdoor, straw-lined yards with kennels. He reported:

During the time that all our pregnant sows were close housed, we
suffered considerable losses due to abrasion, twisted gut, lameness,
sores and hip problems.… We can demonstrate that we have few lame sows
and minimal damage due to fighting in the [outdoor] group.⁸²

Very few pigs have the luxury of straw yards, and the overall trend is
still in the wrong direction. Taking a lead again from the poultry
industry, pig farmers in Holland, Belgium, and England have begun
rearing baby pigs in cages. American producers are now trying it. Apart
from the usual desire for faster gains on less feed and more tender meat
because of restricted opportunities to exercise, the main advantage of
cages is that the piglets can be weaned from their mothers earlier. This
means that the sow’s lactation will cease, and within a few days she
will become fertile. She will then be made pregnant again, either by a
boar or by artificial insemination. The result is that with early
weaning a sow can produce an average of 2.6 litters a year, instead of
the maximum of 2.0 that can be produced if the pigs are allowed to
suckle for three months as they would naturally do.⁸³

Most cage pig rearers allow the piglets to nurse from their mothers for
at least a week before moving them to cages; but Dr. J. Frank Hurnick, a
Canadian agricultural researcher, has recently developed a mechanical
sow. According to one report, “Hurnick’s success could allow intensive
breeding efforts to be directed at increasing litter size. So far,
litters have always been limited by the capacity of the sow mammary
system.”⁸⁴ By the combination of mechanical nursing and other novel
techniques like superovulation, which increases the number of fertile
eggs the sow produces, researchers foresee highly automated systems of
pig production producing as many as forty-five pigs per sow per year,
instead of the sixteen that have been the average.

Two aspects of these developments are alarming. First there is the
effect on the baby pigs, deprived of their mothers and confined in wire
cages. In mammals, the early separation of mother and child causes
distress to both. As for the cages themselves, an ordinary citizen who
kept dogs in similar conditions for their entire lives would risk
prosecution for cruelty. A pig producer who keeps an animal of
comparable intelligence in this manner, however, is more likely to be
rewarded with a tax concession or, in some countries, a direct
government subsidy.

The second alarming aspect of the new techniques is that the sow is
being turned into a living reproduction machine. “The breeding sow
should be thought of, and treated as, a valuable piece of machinery
whose function is to pump out baby pigs like a sausage machine.”⁸⁵ So
said a leading corporate manager with Wall’s Meat Company; and the
United States Department of Agriculture actually encourages producers to
think of the pig in this way: “If the sow is considered a pig
manufacturing unit, then improved management at farrowing and on through
weaning will result in more pigs weaned per sow per year.”⁸⁶ Under the
best conditions there is little joy in an existence that consists of
pregnancy, birth, having one’s babies taken away, and becoming pregnant
again so that the cycle can be repeated—and sows do not live under the
best conditions. They are closely confined for both pregnancy and birth.
While pregnant they are usually locked into individual metal stalls two
feet wide and six feet long, or scarcely bigger than the sow herself; or
they may be chained by a collar around the neck; or they may be in
stalls yet still be chained. There they will live for two or three
months. During all that time, they will be unable to walk more than a
single step forward or backward, or to turn around, or to exercise in
any other way. Again, savings on feed and labor are the reason for this
brutal form of solitary imprisonment.

When the sow is ready to give birth she is moved—but only to a
“farrowing pen.” (Humans give birth, but pigs “farrow.”) Here the sow
may be even more tightly restricted in her movements than she was in her
stall. A device nicknamed “the iron maiden,” consisting of an iron frame
that prevents free movement, has been introduced and widely used in many
countries. The ostensible purpose is to stop the sow rolling onto and
crushing her piglets, but this could also be achieved by providing her
with more natural conditions.

When the sow is confined both while pregnant and while nursing—or when
she is deprived of the opportunity to nurse—she is tightly restricted
for almost the whole of her life. In confinement, the environment is
monotonous and the pig has scant chance to choose or alter her
environment. The U.S. Department of Agriculture admits that “the sow
kept in a crate cannot fulfill her strong instinct to build a nest” and
this frustration can contribute to farrowing and lactation problems.⁸⁷

The sows themselves make it clear what they think of this form of
confinement. At the University of Wageningen, in the Netherlands, G.
Cronin obtained a Ph.D. for a study of the behavior of confined sows.
Here is his description of how they behave when first put in a stall
with a tether:

The sows threw themselves violently backwards, straining against the
tether. Sows thrashed their heads about as they twisted and turned in
their struggle to free themselves. Often loud screams were emitted and
occasionally individuals crashed bodily against the side boards of the
tether stalls. This sometimes resulted in sows collapsing to the
floor.⁸⁸

These violent attempts to escape can last up to three hours. When they
subside, Cronin reports, the sows lie still for long periods, often with
their snouts thrust under the bars, making occasional quiet groans and
whining noises. After a further period, the sows show other signs of
stress, such as gnawing the bars of their stalls, chewing when there is
nothing to chew, waving their heads back and forth, and so on. This is
known as stereotypical behavior. Anyone who has been to a zoo that keeps
lions, tigers, or bears in barren concrete enclosures will have seen
stereotypical behavior—the animals pace endlessly up and down the fences
of their cages. The sow does not have even this opportunity. As we have
seen, in natural conditions the sow is a highly active animal, spending
several hours a day finding food, eating, and exploring her environment.
Now, gnawing at the bars of the stall is, as a veterinarian has noted,
“one of the few physical expressions available to her in her barren
environment.”⁸⁹

In 1986 the Scottish Farm Buildings Investigation Unit, a
government-supported research organization, published a review of the
scientific evidence on the question: “Does close confinement cause
distress in sows?” After discussing more than twenty different studies,
the report likened the stereotypical behavior of sows to
obsessive-compulsive behavior in neurotic human beings who continuously
wash or wring their hands. Its answer to the question investigated was
unequivocal: “The close confinement of sows causes severe distress.”⁹⁰
The British Farm Animal Welfare Council, an official advisory body to
the British government, reached the same conclusion, in more official
language, in its 1988 report:

Both stall and tether systems fail to meet certain welfare criteria to
which we attach particular importance. As a result of their design the
animals housed in them are prevented from exercising and from displaying
most natural behaviour patterns; in the wide range of systems seen by
members there was little scope to reduce the continuing stress which can
be caused by confinement in these systems.… We recommend … that the
Government should introduce legislation as a matter of urgency to
prevent all further installations of units of these designs.⁹¹

Only when the sow is placed with the boar does she have a short period
of freedom in a larger pen—although this is still likely to be indoors.
For at least ten months in every year, the pregnant and nursing sow will
be unable to walk around. When artificial insemination is more widely
used, this sensitive animal will be denied her last chance to exercise,
as well as the only remaining natural contact she has with another
member of her species, apart for her fleeting contact with her
offspring.

In 1988, after more than twenty years of confinement of sows, an
important study was published showing that the unfortunate confined sows
and boars used for breeding have yet another source of distress: they
are kept permanently hungry. Animals being fattened for market are given
as much as they will eat; but to give breeding animals more than the
bare minimum required to keep them reproducing is, from the producer’s
point of view, simply a waste of money. The study showed that pigs fed
the rations recommended by the Agricultural Research Council in Great
Britain are getting only 60 percent of what they would eat if they had
more food available. Moreover, their readiness to press levers in order
to get additional food was much the same after eating their daily
rations as it was before, indicating that they were still hungry
immediately after feeding. As the scientists concluded:

Commercial levels of feeding for pregnant sows and boars, whilst meeting
the needs of the producer, do not satisfy feeding motivation. It has
often been assumed that high production levels cannot be achieved in the
absence of adequate welfare. Yet the hunger resulting from the low food
levels offered to the pig breeding population may act as a major source
of stress.⁹²

Once again, the producer’s profits and the interests of the animal are
in conflict. It is truly amazing how often this can be
demonstrated—while the agribusiness lobby constantly assures us that
only happy, well-cared-for animals can be productive.

Of all the forms of intensive farming now practiced, the veal industry
ranks as the most morally repugnant. The essence of veal raising is the
feeding of a high-protein food to confined, anemic calves in a manner
that will produce a tender, pale-colored flesh that will be served to
the patrons of expensive restaurants. Fortunately this industry does not
compare in size with poultry, beef, or pig production; nevertheless it
is worth our attention because it represents an extreme, both in the
degree of exploitation to which it subjects the animals and in its
absurd inefficiency as a method of providing people with nourishment.

Veal is the flesh of a young calf. The term was originally reserved for
calves killed before they had been weaned from their mothers. The flesh
of these very young animals was paler and more tender than that of a
calf who had begun to eat grass; but there was not much of it, since
calves begin to eat grass when they are a few weeks old and still very
small. The small amount available came from the unwanted male calves
produced by the dairy industry. A day or two after being born they were
trucked to market where, hungry and frightened by the strange
surroundings and the absence of their mothers, they were sold for
immediate delivery to the slaughterhouse.

Then in the 1950s veal producers in Holland found a way to keep the calf
alive longer without the flesh becoming red or less tender. The trick
depends on keeping the calf in highly unnatural conditions. If calves
were left to grow up outside they would romp around the fields,
developing muscles that would toughen their flesh and burning up
calories that the producer must replace with costly feed. At the same
time they would eat grass, and their flesh would lose the pale color
that the flesh of newborn calves has. So the specialist veal producers
take their calves straight from the auction ring to a confinement unit.
Here, in a converted barn or specially built shed, they have rows of
wooden stalls, each 1 foot 10 inches wide by 4 feet 6 inches long. It
has a slatted wooden floor, raised above the concrete floor of the shed.
The calves are tethered by a chain around the neck to prevent them from
turning in their stalls when they are small. (The chain may be removed
when the calves grow too big to turn around in such narrow stalls.) The
stall has no straw or other bedding, since the calves might eat it,
spoiling the paleness of their flesh. They leave their stalls only to be
taken out to slaughter. They are fed a totally liquid diet, based on
nonfat milk powder with vitamins, minerals, and growth-promoting drugs
added. Thus the calves live for the next sixteen weeks. The beauty of
the system, from the producers’ point of view, is that at this age the
veal calf may weigh as much as four hundred pounds, instead of the
ninety-odd pounds that newborn calves weigh; and since veal fetches a
premium price, rearing veal calves in this manner is a profitable
occupation.

This method of raising calves was introduced to the United States in
1962 by Provimi, Inc., a feed manufacturer based in Watertown,
Wisconsin. Its name comes from the “proteins, vitamins, and minerals” of
which its feeds are composed—ingredients that, one might think, could be
put to better use than veal raising. Provimi, according to its own
boast, created this “new and complete concept in veal raising” and it is
still by far the largest company in the business, controlling 50 to 75
percent of the domestic market. Its interest in promoting veal
production lies in developing a market for its feed. Describing what it
considered “optimum veal production,” Provimi’s now defunct newssheet,
_The Stall Street Journal_, gives us an insight into the nature of the
industry, which in the United States and some European countries has
remained essentially unchanged since its introduction:

The dual aims of veal production are firstly, to produce a calf of the
greatest weight in the shortest possible time and secondly, to keep its
meat as light colored as possible to fulfill the consumer’s requirement.
All at a profit commensurate to the risk and investment involved.⁹³

The narrow stalls and their slatted wooden floors are a serious source
of discomfort to the calves. When the calves grow larger, they cannot
even stand up and lie down without difficulty. As a report from a
research group headed by Professor John Webster of the animal husbandry
unit at the School of Veterinary Science, University of Bristol, in
England, noted:

Veal calves in crates 750 mm wide cannot, of course, lie flat with their
legs extended.… Calves may lie like this when they feel warm and wish to
lose heat.… Well-grown veal calves at air temperatures above 20 degrees
C [68 degrees F] may be uncomfortably hot. Denying them the opportunity
to adopt a position designed to maximise heat loss only makes things
worse.… Veal calves in boxes over the age of 10 weeks were unable to
adopt a normal sleeping position with their heads tucked into their
sides. We conclude that denying veal calves the opportunity to adopt a
normal sleeping posture is a significant insult to welfare. To overcome
this, the crates would need to be at least 900 mm wide.⁹⁴

American readers should note that 750 millimeters is equivalent to 2
feet 6 inches, and 900 millimeters to 3 feet, both considerably more
than standard 1 foot 10 inch crates used in the United States.

The crates are also too narrow to permit the calf to turn around. This
is another source of frustration. In addition, a stall too narrow to
turn around in is also too narrow to groom comfortably in; and calves
have an innate desire to twist their heads around and groom themselves
with their tongues. As the University of Bristol researchers said:

Because veal calves grow so fast and produce so much heat they tend to
shed their coats at about 10 weeks of age. During this time they have a
great urge to groom themselves. They are also particularly prone to
infestation with external parasites, especially in mild, humid
conditions. Veal calves in crates cannot reach much of their body. We
conclude that denying the veal calf the opportunity to groom itself
thoroughly is an unacceptable insult to welfare whether this is achieved
by constraining its freedom of movement or, worse, by the use of a
muzzle.⁹⁵

A slatted wooden floor without any bedding is hard and uncomfortable; it
is rough on the calves’ knees as they get up and lie down. In addition,
animals with hooves are uncomfortable on slatted floors. A slatted floor
is like a cattle grid, which cattle always avoid, except that the slats
are closer together. The spaces, however, must still be large enough to
allow most of the manure to fall or be washed through, and this means
that they are large enough to make the calves uncomfortable on them. The
Bristol team described the young calves as “for some days insecure and
reluctant to change position.”

The young calves sorely miss their mothers. They also miss something to
suck on. The urge to suck is strong in a baby calf, as it is in a baby
human. These calves have no teat to suck on, nor do they have any
substitute. From their first day in confinement—which may well be only
the third or fourth day of their lives—they drink from a plastic bucket.
Attempts have been made to feed calves through artificial teats, but the
task of keeping the teats clean and sterile is apparently not worth the
producer’s trouble. It is common to see calves frantically trying to
suck some part of their stalls, although there is usually nothing
suitable; and if you offer a veal calf your finger you will find that he
immediately begins to suck on it, as human babies suck their thumbs.

Later the calf develops a need to ruminate—that is, to take in roughage
and chew the cud. But roughage is strictly forbidden because it contains
iron and will darken the flesh, so, again, the calf may resort to vain
attempts to chew the sides of his stall. Digestive disorders, including
stomach ulcers, are common in veal calves. So is chronic diarrhea. To
quote the Bristol study once again:

The calves are deprived of dry feed. This completely distorts the normal
development of the rumen and encourages the development of hair balls
which may also lead to chronic indigestion.⁹⁶

As if this were not enough, the calf is deliberately kept anemic.
Provimi’s _Stall Street Journal_ explains why:

Color of veal is one of the primary factors involved in obtaining
“top-dollar” returns from the fancy veal markets.… “Light color” veal is
a premium item much in demand at better clubs, hotels and restaurants.
“Light color” or pink veal is partly associated with the amount of iron
in the muscle of the calves.⁹⁷

So Provimi’s feeds, like those of other manufacturers of veal feeds, are
deliberately kept low in iron. A normal calf would obtain iron from
grass and other forms of roughage, but since veal calves are not allowed
this, they become anemic. Pale pink flesh is in fact anemic flesh. The
demand for flesh of this color is a matter of snob appeal. The color
does not affect the taste and it certainly does not make the flesh more
nourishing—it just means that it lacks iron.

The anemia is, of course, controlled. Without any iron at all the calves
would drop dead. With a normal intake their flesh will not fetch as much
per pound. So a balance is struck which keeps the flesh pale and the
calves—or most of them—on their feet long enough for them to reach
market weight. The calves, however, are unhealthy and anemic animals.
Kept deliberately short of iron, they develop a craving for it and will
lick any iron fittings in their stalls. This explains the use of wooden
stalls. As Provimi tells its customers:

The main reason for using hardwood instead of metal box-stalls is that
metal may affect the light veal color.… Keep all iron out of reach of
your calves.⁹⁸

And again:

It is also necessary that calves do not have access to a continuous
source of iron. (Water supplied should be checked. If a high level of
iron [excess of 0.5 ppm] is present an iron filter should be
considered.) Calf crates should be constructed so calves have no access
to rusty metal.⁹⁹

The anemic calf’s insatiable craving for iron is one of the reasons the
producer is anxious to prevent him turning around in his stall. Although
calves, like pigs, normally prefer not to go near their own urine or
manure, urine does contain some iron. The desire for iron is strong
enough to overcome the natural repugnance, and the anemic calves will
lick the slats that are saturated with urine. The producer does not like
this, because it gives calves a little iron and because in licking the
slats the calves may pick up infections from their manure, which falls
on the same spot as their urine.

We have seen that in the view of Provimi, Inc., the twin aims of veal
production are producing a calf of the greatest possible weight in the
shortest possible time and keeping the meat as light in color as
possible. We have seen what is done to achieve the second of these aims,
but there is more to be said about the techniques used to achieve fast
growth.

To make animals grow quickly they must take in as much food as possible,
and they must use up as little of this food as possible in their daily
life. To see that the veal calf takes in as much as possible, most
calves are given no water. Their only source of liquid is their food—the
rich milk replacer based on powdered milk and added fat. Since the
buildings in which they are housed are kept warm, the thirsty animals
take in more of their food than they would do if they could drink water.
A common result of this overeating is that the calves break out in a
sweat, rather like, it has been said, an executive who has had too much
to eat too quickly.¹⁰⁰ In sweating, the calf loses moisture, which makes
him thirsty, so that he overeats again next time. By most standards this
process is an unhealthy one, but by the standards of the veal producer
aiming at producing the heaviest calf in the shortest possible time, the
long-term health of the animal is irrelevant, so long as he survives to
be taken to market; and so Provimi advises that sweating is a sign that
“the calf is healthy and growing at capacity.”¹⁰¹

Getting the calf to overeat is half the battle; the other half is
ensuring that as much as possible of what has been eaten goes toward
putting on weight. Confining the calf so that he cannot exercise is one
requirement for achieving this aim. Keeping the barn warm also
contributes to it, since a cold calf burns calories just to keep warm.
Even warm calves in their stalls are apt to become restless, however,
for they have nothing to do all day except at their two mealtimes. A
Dutch researcher has written:

Veal calves suffer from the inability to do something.… The food-intake
of a veal calf takes only 20 minutes a day! Besides that there is
nothing the animal can do.… One can observe teeth grinding, tail
wagging, tongue swaying and other stereotype behavior.… Such stereotype
movements can be regarded as a reaction to a lack of occupation.¹⁰²

To reduce the restlessness of their bored calves, many veal producers
leave the animals in the dark at all times, except when they are being
fed. Since the veal sheds are normally windowless, this simply means
turning off the lights. Thus the calves, already missing most of the
affection, activity, and stimulation that their natures require, are
deprived of visual stimulation and of contact with other calves for more
than twenty-two hours out of every twenty-four. Illnesses have been
found to be more persistent in dark sheds.¹⁰³

Calves kept in this manner are unhappy and unhealthy animals. Despite
the fact that the veal producer selects only the strongest, healthiest
calves to begin with, uses a medicated feed as a routine measure, and
gives additional injections at the slightest sign of illness, digestive,
respiratory, and infectious diseases are widespread. It is common for a
veal producer to find that one in ten of a batch of calves do not
survive the fifteen weeks of confinement. Between 10 and 15 percent
mortality over such a short period would be disastrous for anyone
raising calves for beef, but veal producers can tolerate this loss
because the high-priced restaurants are prepared to pay well for their
products.

Given the cozy relationship that normally exists between veterinarians
working with farm animals and intensive producers (it is, after all, the
owners, not the animals, who pay the bills), it gives us some indication
of the extreme conditions under which veal calves are kept to learn that
this is one aspect of animal production that has strained relations
between veterinarians and producers. A 1982 issue of _The Vealer_
reports:

Besides waiting too long to call veterinarians for a really sick calf,
vets do not look favorable [sic] on relations with veal growers because
they have long defied accepted agricultural methods. The feeding of long
hay to livestock, in order to maintain a proper digestive system, has
been considered a sound practice for years.¹⁰⁴

The one bright spot in this sorry tale is that the conditions created by
the veal crates are so appalling for animal welfare that British
government regulations now require that a calf must be able to turn
around without difficulty, must be fed a daily diet containing
“sufficient iron to maintain it in full health and vigour,” and must
receive enough fiber to allow normal development of the rumen.¹⁰⁵ These
are minimal welfare requirements, and still fall well short of
satisfying the needs of calves; but they are violated by almost all the
veal units in the United States and by many in Europe.

If the reader will recall that this whole laborious, wasteful, and
painful process of veal raising exists for the sole purpose of pandering
to people who insist on pale, soft veal, no further comment should be
needed.

As we have seen, the veal industry is an offshoot of dairying. Producers
must ensure that their dairy cows become pregnant every year in order to
keep them in milk. Their offspring are taken from them at birth, an
experience that is as painful for the mother as it is terrifying for the
calf. The mother often makes her feelings plain by constant calling and
bellowing for days after her infant is taken. Some female calves will be
reared on milk substitutes to become replacements of dairy cows when
they reach the age, at around two years, when they can produce milk.
Other calves will be sold at between one to two weeks of age to be
reared as beef in fattening pens or feedlots. The remainder will be sold
to veal producers, who also rely on the dairy industry for the milk diet
that is fed to calves to keep them anemic. Even if not sent to a veal
unit, as Professor John Webster of the department of animal husbandry at
the University of Bristol has written:

The calf born to the dairy cow is routinely submitted to more insults to
normal development than any other farm animal. It is taken from its
mother shortly after birth, deprived of its natural food, whole cow’s
milk, and fed one of a variety of cheaper liquid substitutes.¹⁰⁶

The dairy cow, once seen peacefully, even idyllically, roaming the
hills, is now a carefully monitored, fine-tuned milk machine. The
bucolic picture of the dairy cow playing with her calf in the pasture is
no part of commercial milk production. Many dairy cows are reared
indoors. Some are kept in individual pens with only enough room to stand
up and lie down. Their environment is completely controlled: they are
fed calculated amounts of feed, temperatures are adjusted to maximize
milk yield, and lighting is artificially set. Some farmers have found
that a cycle of sixteen hours of light with only eight hours of darkness
is conducive to greater output.

After her first calf is taken away, the cow’s production cycle begins.
She is milked twice, sometimes three times a day, for ten months. After
the third month she will be made pregnant again. She will be milked
until about six or eight weeks before her next calf is due, and then
again as soon as the calf is removed. Usually this intense cycle of
pregnancy and hyperlactation can last only about five years, after which
the “spent” cow is sent to slaughter to become hamburger or dog food.

In order to obtain the highest output, producers feed cows high-energy
concentrates such as soybeans, fish meal, brewing byproducts, and even
poultry manure. The cow’s peculiar digestive system cannot adequately
process this food. The rumen is designed to digest slowly fermenting
grass. During peak production, a few weeks after giving birth, the cow
often expends more energy than she is able to take in. Because her
capacity to produce surpasses her ability to metabolize her feed, the
cow begins to break down and use her own body tissues; she begins
“milking off her own back.”¹⁰⁷

Dairy cows are sensitive animals who manifest both psychological and
physiological disturbances as a result of stress. They have a strong
need to identify with their “caretakers.” Today’s system of dairy
production does not allow the farmer more than five minutes a day with
each animal. In an article entitled “Dairy Farms That Don’t Need
Pastures,” one of the largest “milk factories” boasts of an advance that
“allows one worker to feed 800 calves in 45 minutes—a job that
ordinarily might take several men all day.”¹⁰⁸

Now the rush is on to find ways of interfering with the cow’s natural
hormonal and reproductive processes to make her produce still more milk.
Bovine growth hormone (known in Europe as bovine somatotropin or BST) is
being touted as a way of dramatically increasing milk yields. Cows given
daily injections of the hormone have been shown to produce about 20
percent more milk. But in addition to the soreness likely to develop
from the daily injections, the cows’ bodies will be made to work harder
still; they will require an even richer diet, and they can be expected
to suffer still more from illnesses that already affect dairy cows in
large numbers. David Kronfeld, professor of nutrition and chief of large
animal medicine at the University of Pennsylvania School of Veterinary
Medicine, has said that in one trial over half of the cows given BST
were treated for mastitis (a painful inflammation of the mammary gland)
compared to none in a control group receiving no BST.¹⁰⁹ Opposition to
BST is now coming from dairy farmers as well as animal welfare
advocates. This is scarcely surprising, for studies at Cornell
University and the United States Congress Office of Technology
Assessment have indicated that the adoption of BST by the larger farms
could put out of business 80,000 American dairy farmers—half the present
number.¹¹⁰ One dairy farmer from the west of England has pointed out
that “the main beneficiaries of these cow injections would be a number
of high flying pharmaceutical companies” and has pleaded: “At least let
us have milk from contented cows and not from greedy industrialists’ pin
cushions.”¹¹¹

But the production increases brought about by bovine growth hormone are
nothing compared to those anticipated by the enthusiasts of new
reproductive technology. In 1952 the first calf was produced by means of
artificial insemination. Today this is virtually the standard method. In
the 1960s the first calves were produced from embryos transferred from
one cow to another. This technology means that with the use of hormone
injections, a particularly high-yielding cow can be made to produce
dozens of eggs at one time. After she is artificially inseminated using
semen from a prize bull, the embryos can be flushed out of her womb and
transplanted into cheaper surrogate cows through incisions in their
flanks. Thus a whole herd can rapidly be bred from only the very best
stock. The ability to freeze embryos, developed during the 1970s, has
made embryo transfer more easily marketable, and now 150,000 embryo
transfers are attempted each year in the United States, with at least
100,000 calves resulting from these attempts. Genetic engineering, and
perhaps cloning, will be the next steps in the continuing efforts to
create ever more productive animals.¹¹²

Traditionally, cattle raised for beef in America have roamed freely over
the vast open spaces that we see in cowboy movies. But as a supposedly
humorous article in the _Peoria Journal Star_ indicates, the modern
range isn’t what it used to be:

A cowboy’s home ain’t necessarily on the range. More ’n likely, home is
a feedlot where the closest a beef comes to the smell of sage is in a
pot roast. This is cowboy’n modern-like. This is Norris Farms where
instead of running 700 head on 20,000 acres of sparse-grass prairie,
they run 7,000 head on 11 acres of concrete.¹¹³

By comparison with chickens, pigs, veal calves, and dairy cows, beef
cattle still see more of the great outdoors, but the time they have to
do so has been diminished. Twenty years ago, cattle would have roamed
for about two years. Now, the lucky ones who get to roam at all are
rounded up after about six months to be “finished”—that is, to be
brought to market weight and condition by being fed a richer diet than
grass. For this pupose they are shipped long distances to feedlots. Here
for six to eight months they eat corn and other cereals. Then they are
sent for slaughter.

The growth of large feedlots has been the dominant trend in the cattle
industry. Of the 34 million cattle slaughtered in 1987 in the U.S., 70
percent were sent for slaughter from feedlots. Large feedlots are now
responsible for one third of the nation’s beef. They are substantial
commercial undertakings, often financed by oil companies or Wall Street
money looking for tax concessions. Feedlots are profitable because
cattle fatten more quickly on grain than on grass. Yet, like dairy cows,
beef cattle do not have stomachs suited for the concentrated diet that
they receive in feedlots. Often, in an effort to obtain more fiber than
their feedlot diets provide, the cattle lick their own and each other’s
coats. The large amount of hair taken into the rumen may cause
abscesses.¹¹⁴ Diluting the grain with the roughage that cattle need and
crave, however, would slow down their weight gain.

Feedlots do not confine cattle as severely as cages confine hens, or
stalls confine sows, veal calves, and often dairy cows. Stocking
densities have been increasing, but even when they go as high as nine
hundred animals to the acre, each animal has fifty square feet of space
and can wander around the compound, which may be an acre in area, and
not be isolated from other animals. Boredom from the barren, unchanging
environment is the problem, not restriction of movement.

One very serious problem is exposure to the elements. In summer the
cattle may be out in the sun without shade; in winter they may have no
protection from conditions to which they are not naturally suited.
During the 1987 snow storms, some farmers reported heavy losses,
estimating that as many as 25 to 30 percent of the calves and 5 to 10
percent of the adult cattle were lost. One Colorado farmer reported,
“There was little protection for the calves. Most of those calves were
lost due to exposure. We got a wet snow, and then it got cold right
after that.” In another instance, seventy-five calves out of one hundred
were lost in the storm.¹¹⁵

In Europe some beef producers have followed the lead of the poultry,
pig, and veal industries and brought their animals indoors. In the
United States, Britain, and Australia, permanent indoor confinement is
considered economically unjustified. It protects animals from the
weather, but always at the cost of much more crowding, since the cattle
producer wants the greatest possible return on the capital invested in
the building. Intensively confined beef cattle are generally kept
together in groups, in pens rather than in single stalls. Slatted floors
are often used for ease of cleaning, although beef cattle, like pigs and
veal calves, are uncomfortable on slats and can become lame.

No aspect of animal raising is safe from the inroads of technology and
the pressure to intensify production. Baby lambs, those joyous symbols
of springtime, have already entered the dark interiors of confinement
houses.¹¹⁶ At the Oregon State University Rabbit Research Center,
researchers have developed a cage system for rearing rabbits and are
experimenting with stocking densities of two rabbits per square foot.¹¹⁷
In Australia, selected sheep producing superfine wool have now been
brought indoors in individual and group pens—the aim being to keep the
fleece clean and long. Wool from these sheep sells for five or six times
the usual price.¹¹⁸ Although the fur trade likes to emphasize its
“ranch-raised” furs to minimize the bad publicity it gets from the
trapping of wild animals, fur “ranches” are highly intensive. Mink,
raccoons, ferrets, and other fur-bearing animals are kept in small wire
cages. The beautiful arctic fox, for instance, normally ranges over
thousands of acres of tundra: on a fur farm it has a wire cage measuring
forty-two by forty-five inches.

We have now surveyed the main trends in animal raising in which
traditional methods have been transformed into factory style animal
production. Sadly, as far as the animals are concerned, there has been
very little improvement since the first edition of this book was
published fifteen years ago. At that time it was already clear that
modern production methods are incompatible with any genuine concern for
the welfare of the animals. The evidence was first compiled in Ruth
Harrison’s pathbreaking book, _Animal Machines_, published in 1964, and
was authoritatively supported by the Brambell committee, a committee
appointed by the British minister of agriculture that consisted of the
best qualified experts available. In addition to Brambell, himself a
noted zoologist, the committee included W. H. Thorpe, the director of
the department of animal behavior at Cambridge University, and other
experts in veterinary science, animal husbandry, and agriculture. After
a thorough investigation, in 1965 they published an eighty-five-page
official report. In the report, the committee firmly rejected the
argument that productivity is a satisfactory indication of the absence
of suffering—the fact that an animal is putting on weight can, they
said, be a “pathological condition.” They also rejected the view that
farm animals don’t suffer from confinement because they are bred for it
and are used to it. In an important appendix to the report, Thorpe
stressed that observations of the behavior of domestic animals have
shown that they are “still essentially what they were in the prehistoric
wild,” with innate behavior patterns and needs that are still present
even if the animal has never known natural conditions. Thorpe concluded:

Certain basic facts are clear enough to justify action. Whilst accepting
the need for much restriction, we must draw the line at conditions which
completely suppress all or nearly all the natural, instinctive urges and
behavior patterns characteristic of actions appropriate to the high
degree of social organization as found in the ancestral wild species and
which have been little, if at all, bred out in the process of
domestication. In particular it is clearly cruel so to restrain an
animal for a large part of its life that it cannot use any of its normal
locomotary behavior patterns.¹²⁰

Accordingly, the committee’s recommendations were based on the following
modest but fundamental principle:

In principle we disapprove of a degree of confinement of an animal which
necessarily frustrates most of the major activities which make up its
natural behavior.… An animal should at least have sufficient freedom of
movement to be able without difficulty to turn around, groom itself, get
up, lie down and stretch its limbs.¹²¹

These “five basic freedoms” as they have since been called—to turn
around, to groom, to get up, to lie down, and to stretch the limbs
freely—are still denied to all caged hens, all sows in stalls and
tethers, and all veal calves in crates. Yet since the Brambell committee
issued its report a wealth of scientific material has confirmed the
verdict of the Brambell committee in all its major aspects. We have
already seen, for example, how Thorpe’s comments about the retention of
natural behavior patterns in domestic animals have been fully borne out
by the Edinburgh University study of pigs in a seminatural setting.¹²²
The fallacy of the argument that animals must be content if they produce
is now also universally accepted among scientists. A 1986 study
published in _American Scientist_ represents an informed view of the
argument:

With respect to domesticated animals, however, this argument can be
misleading for several reasons. Farm animals have been selected for
their ability to grow and reproduce under a wide range of conditions and
circumstances, some adverse. Hens, for example, may continue to lay eggs
normally even when severely injured. Furthermore, growth and
reproduction are frequently manipulated by practices such as alteration
of the photoperiod or the addition of growth-promoting substances like
antibiotics to the feed. Finally, on a modern factory farm where a
single worker may care for as many as 2,000 head of cattle or 250,000
broiler chickens per year, the practice of measuring growth or
reproduction as eggs or pounds of meat produced in relation to
construction, fuel, or feed costs provides little information about the
productive status of an individual animal.¹²³

Dr. Bill Gee, foundation director of the Australian government’s Bureau
of Animal Health, has said:

It is claimed that productivity of farm animals is a direct indicator of
their welfare. This misconception needs to be buried once and for all.
“Welfare” refers to the well-being of individual animals, whereas
“productivity” refers to output per dollar spent or per unit of
resources.¹²⁴

I have taken care to document the misconception in this argument at
several points in this chapter. It would be nice to think that the
argument could be buried once and for all, but no doubt it will keep
cropping up whenever agribusiness apologists think it useful to lull the
consumer into believing that all is well down on the farm.

Some recognition of the weight of evidence against intensive farming
methods was given by the European Parliament when in 1987 it considered
a report on animal welfare and adopted a policy that contained the
following points:

•Putting an end to keeping veal calves in individual crates, and to
depriving them of iron and roughage.

•Phasing out the battery cage within ten years.

•Discontinuing keeping sows in individual stalls or on tethers.

•Stopping routine mutilations such as tail docking and the castration of
male pigs.¹²⁵

These proposals were passed by a vote of 150 to 0, with 2 abstentions.
But as we have already noted, although the European Parliament is made
up of elected representatives of all the nations of the European
Community, it is an advisory body only. The powerful agribusiness lobby
is working hard to stop the policy being put into practice. The
resolution stands, nevertheless, as an indication of informed European
opinion on these issues. When it comes to actions, not words, a real
improvement in the conditions of animals since publication of the first
edition of this book has occurred in only a few instances. In
Switzerland battery cages for hens are being phased out and eggs from
alternative systems of housing hens are already widely available in
shops. These new systems allow the birds freedom to walk around,
scratch, dustbathe, flutter up to a perch, and lay eggs in protected
nest-boxes with suitable nesting materials. Yet the eggs from hens kept
in this way are only fractionally more expensive than those from hens
kept in cages.¹²⁶ In Britain, the only real sign of progress for farm
animals is the prohibition of individual stalls for veal calves. It is
Sweden that is now showing the way forward in animal welfare, as it has
often done in respect of other social reforms; the Swedish laws passed
in 1988 will transform conditions for the entire range of farm animals.

Throughout this chapter I have been concentrating on conditions in the
United States and Britain. Readers in other countries may be inclined to
believe that conditions in their own country are not so bad; but if they
live in one of the industrialized nations (other than Sweden) they have
no grounds for complacency. In most countries, conditions are much
closer to those in the United States than to those recommended above.

Finally, it is important to remember that although the implementation of
the Brambell committee’s “five freedoms,” or of the resolutions of the
European Parliament, or even of the new Swedish legislation, would be a
major advance in Britain, the United States, and almost anywhere else
where factory farming exists, none of these reforms give equal
consideration to the similar interests of animals and humans. They
represent, to varying degrees, an enlightened and more humane form of
speciesism, but speciesism nonetheless. In no country yet has a
government body questioned the idea that the interests of animals count
less than similar human interests. The issue is always whether there is
“avoidable” suffering, and this means suffering that can be avoided
while the same animal products are produced, at a cost that is not
significantly higher than before. The unchallenged assumption is that
humans may use animals for their own purposes, and they may raise and
kill them to satisfy their preference for a diet containing animal
flesh.

I have concentrated on modern intensive farming methods in this chapter
because the general public is largely ignorant of the suffering these
methods involve; but it is not only intensive farming that causes
animals to suffer. Suffering has been inflicted on animals for human
benefit whether they are reared by modern or traditional methods. Some
of this suffering has been normal practice for centuries. This may lead
us to disregard it, but it is no consolation to the animal on whom it is
inflicted. Consider, for example, some of the routine operations to
which cattle are still subjected.

Nearly all beef producers dehorn, brand, and castrate their animals. All
of these processes can cause severe physical pain. Horns are cut off
because horned animals take up more space at a feeding trough or in
transit and can harm one another when packed tightly together. Bruised
carcasses and damaged hides are costly. The horns are not merely
insensitive bone. Arteries and other tissue have to be cut when the horn
is removed, and blood spurts out, especially if the calf is not dehorned
shortly after birth.

Castration is practiced because steers are thought to put on weight
better than bulls—although in fact they seem only to put on more fat—and
because of a fear that the male hormones will cause a taint to develop
in the flesh. Castrated animals are also easier to handle. Most farmers
admit that the operation causes shock and pain to the animal.
Anesthetics are generally not used. The procedure is to pin the animal
down, take a knife, and slit the scrotum, exposing the testicles. You
then grab each testicle in turn and pull on it, breaking the cord that
attaches it; on older animals it may be necessary to cut the cord.¹²⁷

Some farmers, to their credit, are troubled by this painful surgery. In
an article entitled “The Castration Knife Must Go,” C. G. Scruggs,
editor of _The Progressive Farmer_, refers to the “extreme stress of
castration” and suggests that since lean meat is increasingly in demand,
male animals could be left unmutilated.¹²⁸ The same view has been
expressed in the pig industry, where the practice is similar. According
to an article in the British magazine _Pig Farming_:

Castration itself is a beastly business, even to the hardened commercial
pig man. I’m only surprised that the antivivisection lobby have not made
a determined attack on it.

And since research has now shown a way of detecting the taint that boar
meat occasionally has, the article suggests that we “think about giving
our castrating knives a rest.”¹²⁹

Branding cattle with a hot iron is widely practiced, as a protection
against straying and cattle rustlers (who still exist in some parts), as
well as to assist record-keeping. Although cattle have thicker skins
than humans, their skins are not thick enough to protect them against a
red-hot iron applied directly to the skin—the hair having been clipped
away first—and held there for five seconds. To permit this operation to
be done, the animal is thrown to the ground and pinned down.
Alternatively, cattle may be held in a contraption called a “squeeze
chute,” which is an adjustable crate that can be fitted tightly around
the animal. Even so, as one guide notes, “the animal will usually jump
when you apply the iron.”¹³⁰

As an additional mutilation, cattle are likely to have their ears cut
with a sharp knife into special shapes so that, out on the range, they
can be identified from a distance or when they are viewed from the front
or rear, where the brand would not be visible.¹³¹

These, then, are some of the standard procedures of traditional methods
of rearing cattle. Other animals are treated in similar ways when they
are reared for food. And finally, in considering the welfare of animals
under traditional systems, it is important to remember that almost all
methods involve the separation of mother and young at an early age, and
that this causes considerable distress to both. No form of animal
raising allows the animals to grow up and become part of a community of
animals of varying ages, as they would under natural conditions.

Although castration, branding, and the separation of mother and child
have caused suffering to farm animals for centuries, the cruelty of
transportation and slaughter aroused the most anguished pleas from the
humane movement in the nineteenth century. In the United States the
animals were driven from pastures near the Rockies down to the railheads
and jammed into railway cars for several days without food until the
train reached Chicago. There, in gigantic stockyards reeking of blood
and putrefying flesh, those who had survived the journey would wait
until their turn came to be dragged and goaded up the ramp at the top of
which stood the man with the poleax. If they were lucky, his aim was
good; but many were not lucky.

Since that time there have been some changes. In 1906 a federal law was
passed limiting the time that animals could spend in a railway car
without food or water to twenty-eight hours, or thirty-six hours in
special cases. After that time the animals must be unloaded, fed, given
water, and rested for at least five hours before the journey is resumed.
Obviously, a period of twenty-eight to thirty-six hours in a lurching
railway car without food or water is still long enough to cause
distress, but it is an improvement. As for slaughter, there has been
improvement here too. Most animals are stunned before slaughter now,
which means, in theory, that they die painlessly—although as we shall
see there are doubts about this, and also important exceptions. Because
of these improvements, transportation and slaughter are today lesser
problems, I believe, than the factory like methods of production that
turn animals into machines for converting low-priced fodder into
high-priced flesh. Nevertheless, any account of what happens to your
dinner while it is still an animal would be incomplete without some
description of transportation and slaughter methods.

Transportation of animals includes more than the final trip to
slaughter. When slaughtering was concentrated at major centers like
Chicago this used to be the longest, and in many cases the only, trip
the animals made. They grew to market weight on the open ranges on which
they were born. When refrigeration techniques enabled slaughtering to
become less centralized, the trip to slaughter became correspondingly
shorter. Today, however, it is much less common for animals, especially
cattle, to be born and raised to market weight in the same region. Young
calves may be born in one state—say, Florida—and then trucked to pasture
many hundred of miles away—perhaps in west Texas. Cattle who have spent
a year out on the ranges in Utah or Wyoming may be rounded up and sent
to feedlots in Iowa or Oklahoma. These animals face trips of up to two
thousand miles. For them, the journey to the feedlot is likely to be
longer and more harrowing than the journey to the slaughterhouse.

The federal law of 1906 provided that animals transported by rail had to
be rested, fed, and given water at least every thirty-six hours. It said
nothing about animals being transported by truck. Trucks were not used
for transporting animals in those days. Over eighty years later, the
transportation of animals by truck is still not regulated at the federal
level. Repeated attempts have been made to bring the law about trucks
into line with that about rail transport, but so far none has succeeded.
Accordingly, cattle often spend up to forty-eight or even seventy-two
hours inside a truck without being unloaded. Not all truckers would
leave cattle this long without rest, food, or water, but some are more
concerned with getting the job finished than with delivering their load
in good condition.

Animals placed in a truck for the first time in their lives are likely
to be frightened, especially if they have been handled hastily and
roughly by the men loading the truck. The motion of the truck is also a
new experience, and one which may make them ill. After one or two days
in the truck without food or water they are desperately thirsty and
hungry. Normally cattle eat frequently thoughout the day; their special
stomachs require a constant intake of food if the rumen is to function
properly. If the journey is in winter, subzero winds can result in
severe chill; in summer the heat and sun may add to the dehydration
caused by the lack of water. It is difficult for us to imagine what this
combination of fear, travel sickness, thirst, near-starvation,
exhaustion, and possibly severe chill feels like to the animals. In the
case of young calves who may have gone through the stress of weaning and
castration only a few days earlier, the effect is still worse.
Veterinary experts recommend that, simply in order to improve their
prospects of surviving, young calves should be weaned, castrated, and
vaccinated at least thirty days prior to being transported. This gives
them a chance to recover from one stressful experience before being
subjected to another. These recommendations, however, are not always
followed.¹³²

Although the animals cannot describe their experiences, the reactions of
their bodies tell us something. There are two main reactions:
“shrinkage” and “shipping fever.” All animals lose weight during
transportation. Some of this weight loss is due to dehydration and the
emptying of the intestinal tract. This loss is easily regained; but more
lasting losses are also the rule. For an eight-hundred-pound steer to
lose seventy pounds, or 9 percent of his weight, on a single trip is not
unusual; and it may take more than three weeks for the animal to recover
the loss. This “shrink,” as it is known in the trade, is regarded by
researchers as an indication of the stress to which the animal has been
subjected. Shrink is, of course, a worry to the meat industry, since
animals are sold by the pound.

“Shipping fever,” a form of pneumonia that strikes cattle after they
have been transported, is the other major indicator of stress in
transportation. Shipping fever is associated with a virus that healthy
cattle have no difficulty in resisting; severe stress, however, weakens
their resistance.

Shrinkage and susceptibility to fever are indications that the animals
have been subjected to extreme stress; but the animals who shrink and
get shipping fever are the ones who survive. Others die before reaching
their destination, or arrive with broken limbs or other injuries. In
1986, USDA inspectors condemned over 7,400 cattle, 3,100 calves, and
5,500 pigs because they were dead or seriously injured before they
reached the slaughterhouse, while 570,000 cattle, 57,000 calves, and
643,000 pigs were injured severely enough for parts of their bodies to
be condemned.¹³³

Animals who die in transit do not die easy deaths. They freeze to death
in winter and collapse from thirst and heat exhaustion in summer. They
die, lying unattended in stockyards, from injuries sustained in falling
off a slippery loading ramp. They suffocate when other animals pile on
top of them in overcrowded, badly loaded trucks. They die from thirst or
starve when careless stockmen forget to give them food or water. And
they die from the sheer stress of the whole terrifying experience. The
animal that you may be having for dinner tonight did not die in any of
these ways; but these deaths are and always have been part of the
overall process that provides people with their meat.

Killing an animal is in itself a troubling act. It has been said that if
we had to kill our own meat we would all be vegetarians. Certainly very
few people ever visit a slaughterhouse, and films of slaughterhouse
operations are not popular on television. People may hope that the meat
they buy came from an animal who died without pain, but they do not
really want to know about it. Yet those who, by their purchases, require
animals to be killed do not deserve to be shielded from this or any
other aspect of the production of the meat they buy.

Death, though never pleasant, need not be painful. If all goes according
to plan, in developed nations with humane slaughter laws, death comes
quickly and painlessly. The animals are supposed to be stunned by
electric current or a captive-bolt pistol and have their throats cut
while they are still unconscious. They may feel terror shortly before
their death, when being goaded up the ramp to slaughter, smelling the
blood of those who have gone before; but the moment of death itself can,
in theory, be entirely painless. Unfortunately, there is often a gap
between theory and practice. A _Washington Post_ reporter recently
described a slaughterhouse in Virginia operated by Smithfield, the
largest meatpacking concern on the United States East Coast:

The pork process ends in a highly automated state-of-the-art factory
where neatly packaged airtight plastic packets of sliced bacon and ham
roll off the conveyor belt. But it begins outside behind the plant, in a
stinking, muddy, bloodstained pig pen. Inside the Gwaltney of Smithfield
slaughterhouse visitors are allowed only a few minutes’ stay lest the
stench of dead pigs cling to their clothes and bodies long after the
visit has ended.

The process begins when the squealing hogs are corralled from their pens
up a wooden plank where a worker stuns their heads with an electric
shock. As they fall from the shock, a worker quickly hangs the pigs
upside-down on a conveyor belt, placing their rear legs in a metal
clamp. Sometimes the stunned hogs fall off the conveyor belt and regain
consciousness, and workers have to scramble to hoist the hogs’ legs back
into the metal clamps before they begin running wildly through the
confined area. The hogs actually are killed by a worker who stabs the
stunned and often still-squirming animals with a knife in the jugular
vein and lets most of the blood drain out. The freshly butchered pigs
then move from the blood-splattered slaughterhouse into the scalding
pot.¹³⁴

Much of the suffering that occurs in slaughterhouses is a result of the
frantic pace at which the killing line must work. Economic competition
means that slaughterhouses strive to kill more animals per hour than
their competitors. Between 1981 and 1986, for example, conveyor speed at
one large American plant increased from 225 bodies an hour to 275. The
pressure to work faster means that less care is taken—and not only with
the animals. In 1988 a United States congressional committee reported
that no other U.S. industry has a higher injury or illness rate than the
slaughter industry. Evidence was given that 58,000 slaughterhouse
employees are injured a year, or about 160 a day. If so little care is
taken with humans, what is likely to be the fate of the animals? Another
major problem with the industry is that, because it is so unpleasant,
employees do not last long, and annual turnover rates between 60 and 100
percent are common in many plants. This means a constant stream of
inexperienced staff handling frightened animals in a strange
environment.¹³⁵

In Britain, where slaughterhouses are in theory tightly controlled by
humane slaughter legislation, the government’s Farm Animal Welfare
Council investigated slaughterhouses and found:

We have concluded that unconsciousness and insensibility are being
assumed to exist in many slaughtering operations when it is highly
probable that the degree is not sufficient to render the animal
insensitive to pain.

The council added that while there were laws requiring that stunning be
conducted effectively and without unnecessary pain by skilled personnel
using proper equipment, “we are not satisfied that they are adequately
enforced.”¹³⁶

Since that report was published, a senior British scientist has raised
doubts about whether electrical stunning is painless, even when properly
administered. Dr. Harold Hillman, reader in physiology and director of
the Unity Laboratory in Applied Neurobiology at the University of
Surrey, notes that people who have experienced electric shock, either
accidentally or during electroconvulsive therapy for mental illness,
report great pain. It is significant, he points out, that
electroconvulsive therapy is now normally administered under a general
anesthetic. If electric shock instantly rendered the patient incapable
of feeling pain, this would not be necessary. For this reason, Dr.
Hillman doubts that electrocution, used as a method of capital
punishment in some American states, is humane; the prisoner in the
electric chair may for a time be paralyzed, but not unconscious. Dr.
Hillman then turns to electric stunning in slaughterhouses: “Stunning is
believed to be humane, because it is thought that the animals do not
suffer pain or distress. This is almost certainly untrue, for the same
reasons as have been indicated for the electric chair.”¹³⁷ So it is
quite possible that slaughter is not at all painless, even when properly
carried out in a modern slaughterhouse.

Even if these problems could be overcome, there is another problem with
the slaughter of animals. Many countries, including Britain and the
United States, have an exception for slaughter according to Jewish and
Moslem rituals that require the animals to be fully conscious when
slaughtered. A second important exception in the United States is that
the Federal Humane Slaughter Act, passed in 1958, applies only to
slaughterhouses selling meat to the United States government or its
agencies and does not apply to the largest number of animals
killed—poultry.

Let us consider this second loophole first. There are approximately
6,100 slaughterhouses in the United States, yet fewer than 1,400 were
federally inspected for compliance with the humane slaughter law. It is
therefore entirely legal for the remaining 4,700 to use the ancient and
barbaric poleax; and this method is still in use in some American
slaughterhouses.

The poleax is really a heavy sledgehammer rather than an ax. The person
wielding the long-handled hammer stands above the animal and tries to
knock him unconscious with a single blow. The problem is that the target
is moving and the long overhead swing must be carefully aimed; for to
succeed the hammer must land at a precise point on the animal’s head,
and frightened animals are quite likely to move their heads. If the
swing is a fraction astray the hammer can crash through the animal’s eye
or nose; then, as the animal thrashes around in agony and terror,
several more blows may be needed to knock the animal unconscious. The
most skilled wielder of the poleax cannot be expected to land the blow
perfectly every time. As the job may require the killing of eighty or
more animals an hour, if the poleax misses in only one out of every
hundred swings, the result will still be terrible pain for several
animals every day. It should also be remembered that to develop skill
with the poleax it is necessary for an unskilled person to get a lot of
practice. The practice will be on live animals.

Why are such primitive methods, universally condemned as inhumane, still
in use? The reason is the same as in other aspects of animal raising: if
humane procedures cost more or reduce the number of animals that can be
killed per hour, a firm cannot afford to adopt humane methods while its
rivals continue to use the old methods. The cost of the charge used to
fire the captivebolt pistol, though only a few cents per animal, is
sufficient to deter slaughterhouses from using it. Electrical stunning
is cheaper in the long run, but installation is expensive. Unless the
law forces slaughterers to adopt one of these methods they may not be
used.

The other major loophole in the humane slaughter laws is that slaughter
according to a religious ritual need not comply with the provision that
the animal be stunned before being killed. Orthodox Jewish and Moslem
dietary laws forbid the consumption of meat from an animal who is not
“healthy and moving” when killed. Stunning, which is thought to cause
injury prior to cutting the throat, is therefore unacceptable. The idea
behind these requirements may have been to prohibit the eating of flesh
from an animal who had been found sick or dead; as interpreted by the
religiously orthodox today, however, the law also rules out making the
animal unconscious a few seconds before it is killed. The killing is
supposed to be carried out with a single cut with a sharp knife, aimed
at the jugular veins and the carotid arteries. At the time this method
of slaughter was laid down in Jewish law it was probably more humane
than any alternative; now, however, it is less humane, under the best
circumstances, than, for example, the use of the captive-bolt pistol to
render an animal instantly insensible.

Moreover, in the United States there are special circumstances that turn
this method of slaughter into a grotesque travesty of any humane
intentions that may once have lain behind it. This is the result of a
combination of the requirements of ritual slaughter and of the Pure Food
and Drug Act of 1906, which for sanitary reasons stipulates that a
slaughtered animal must not fall in the blood of a previously
slaughtered animal. Effectively, this means that the animal must be
killed while being suspended from a conveyor belt, or held above the
floor in some other way, instead of when lying on the slaughterhouse
floor. The requirement does not affect the welfare of an animal who has
been made fully unconscious before being killed, since the suspension
does not take place until the animal is unconscious; but it has horrible
results if the animal must be conscious when killed. Instead of being
quickly knocked to the floor and killed almost as they hit the ground,
animals being ritually slaughtered in the United States may be shackled
around a rear leg, hoisted into the air, and then hang, fully conscious,
upside down on the conveyor belt for between two and five minutes—and
occasionally much longer if something goes wrong on the “killing
line”—before the slaughterer makes his cut. The process has been
described as follows:

When a heavy iron chain is clamped around the leg of a heavy beef animal
weighing between 1,000 and 2,000 pounds, and the steer is jerked off its
feet, the skin will open and slip away from the bone. The canon bone
will often be snapped or fractured.¹³⁸

The animal, upside down, with ruptured joints and often a broken leg,
twists frantically in pain and terror, so that it must be gripped by the
neck or have a clamp inserted in its nostrils to enable the slaughterer
to kill the animal with a single stroke, as the religious law
prescribes. It is difficult to imagine a clearer example of how sticking
strictly to the letter of a law can pervert its spirit. (It should be
noted, however, that even Orthodox rabbis are not unanimous in
supporting the prohibition of stunning prior to killing; in Sweden,
Norway, and Switzerland, for example, the rabbis have accepted
legislation requiring the stunning with no exemptions for ritual
slaughter. Many Moslems have also accepted stunning prior to
slaughter.¹³⁹)

The American Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals has
developed a “casting pen” that permits a conscious animal to be killed
in compliance with U.S. hygiene regulations without being hoisted by the
leg. This device is now used for approximately 80 percent of large
cattle undergoing ritual slaughter, but for less than 10 percent of
calves. Temple Grandin of Grandin Livestock Handling Systems, Inc.,
says: “Since religious slaughter is exempt from the Humane Slaughter
Act, some plants are not willing to spend money for humaneness.”¹⁴⁰

Those who do not follow Jewish or Moslem dietary laws may believe that
the meat they buy has not been killed in this obsolete fashion; but they
could be mistaken. For meat to be passed as “kosher” by the Orthodox
rabbis, it must, in addition to being from an animal killed while
conscious, have had the forbidden tissues, such as veins, lymph nodes,
and the sciatic nerve and its branches removed. Cutting these parts out
of the hindquarters of an animal is a laborious business and so only the
forequarters are sold as kosher meat, and the remainder usually ends up
on supermarket shelves without any indication of its origin. This means
that far more animals are slaughtered without prior stunning than would
be necessary to supply the demand for this type of meat. Britain’s Farm
Animal Welfare Council has estimated that “a high proportion” of the
meat slaughtered by ritual methods is distributed to the open
markets.¹⁴¹

The slogan “religious freedom” and the charge that those who attack
ritual slaughter are motivated by anti-Semitism have sufficed to prevent
legislative interference with this practice in the United States,
Britain, and many other countries. But obviously one does not have to be
anti-Semitic or anti-Moslem to oppose what is done to animals in the
name of religion. It is time for adherents of both these religions to
consider again whether the current interpretations of laws relating to
slaughter are really in keeping with the spirit of religious teaching on
compassion. Meanwhile, those who do not wish to eat meat slaughtered
contrary to the current teachings of their religion have a simple
alternative: not to eat meat at all. In making this suggestion, I am not
asking more of religious believers than I ask of myself; it is only that
the reasons for them to do it are stronger because of the additional
suffering involved in producing the meat they eat.

We live in a time of conflicting currents. While there are those who
insist on continuing to kill animals by biblical methods of slaughter,
our scientists are busy developing revolutionary techniques by which
they hope to change the very nature of the animals themselves. A
momentous step toward a world of animals designed by human beings was
taken in 1988 when the United States Patent and Trademark Office granted
researchers at Harvard University a patent for a genetically engineered
mouse, specially made to be more susceptible to cancer so that it can be
used to screen possible carcinogens. The grant followed a 1980 Supreme
Court decision which made it possible to patent man-made microorganisms,
but this was the first time that a patent had been given for an
animal.¹⁴²

Religious leaders, animal rights advocates, environmentalists, and
ranchers (who are worried about the prospect of being forced to pay
royalties to remain competitive) have now formed a coalition to stop the
patenting of animals. Meanwhile genetic engineering companies are
already working with agribusiness interests to invest money in research
designed to create new animals. Unless public pressure puts a stop to
such work, there will be huge fortunes to be made from animals who put
on more weight or produce more milk or eggs in a shorter time.

The threat to animal welfare is already obvious. Researchers at the U.S.
Department of Agriculture’s farm at Beltsville, Maryland, have
introduced genes for growth hormones into pigs. The genetically altered
pigs developed serious side effects, including pneumonia, internal
bleeding, and a severe form of crippling arthritis. Apparently only one
of these pigs survived to adulthood, and then lived for only two years.
This pig was shown on British television, appropriately enough, on _The
Money Programme_. The pig was unable to stand.¹⁴³ One of the researchers
responsible told _The Washington Times_:

We’re at the Wright Brothers stage compared to the 747. We’re going to
crash and burn for a number of years and not get very far off the ground
for a while.

But it will be the animals who “crash and burn,” not the researchers.
_The Washington Times_ also quoted defenders of genetic engineering as
rejecting the animal welfare arguments, saying:

People have cross-bred, domesticated, slaughtered and otherwise
exploited animals for centuries. Nothing will change fundamentally.¹⁴⁴

As this chapter has shown, that is true. We have long treated animals as
things for our convenience, and for the last thirty years we have been
applying our latest scientific techniques to make them serve our ends
better. Genetic engineering, revolutionary as it may be in one sense, is
in another sense just one more way of bending animals to our purposes.
The real need is that attitudes and practices change fundamentally.

_Chapter 4_

Becoming a Vegetarian …

_or how to produce less suffering and more food at a reduced cost to the
environment_

Now that we have understood the nature of speciesism and seen the
consequences it has for nonhuman animals it is time to ask: What can we
do about it? There are many things that we can and should do about
speciesism. We should, for instance, write to our political
representatives about the issues discussed in this book; we should make
our friends aware of these issues; we should educate our children to be
concerned about the welfare of all sentient beings; and we should
protest publicly on behalf of nonhuman animals whenever we have an
effective opportunity to do so.

While we should do all these things, there is one other thing we can do
that is of supreme importance; it underpins, makes consistent, and gives
meaning to all our other activities on behalf of animals. This one thing
is that we take responsibility for our own lives, and make them as free
of cruelty as we can. The first step is that we cease to eat animals.
Many people who are opposed to cruelty to animals draw the line at
becoming a vegetarian. It was of such people that Oliver Goldsmith, the
eighteenth-century humanitarian essayist, wrote: “They pity, and they
eat the objects of their compassion.”¹

As a matter of strict logic, perhaps, there is no contradiction in
taking an interest in animals on both compassionate and gastronomic
grounds. If one is opposed to inflicting suffering on animals, but not
to the painless killing of animals, one could consistently eat animals
who had lived free of all suffering and been instantly, painlessly
slaughtered. Yet practically and psychologically it is impossible to be
consistent in one’s concern for nonhuman animals while continuing to
dine on them. If we are prepared to take the life of another being
merely in order to satisfy our taste for a particular type of food, then
that being is no more than a means to our end. In time we will come to
regard pigs, cattle, and chickens as things for us to use, no matter how
strong our compassion may be; and when we find that to continue to
obtain supplies of the bodies of these animals at a price we are able to
pay it is necessary to change their living conditions a little, we will
be unlikely to regard these changes too critically. The factory farm is
nothing more than the application of technology to the idea that animals
are means to our ends. Our eating habits are dear to us and not easily
altered. We have a strong interest in convincing ourselves that our
concern for other animals does not require us to stop eating them. No
one in the habit of eating an animal can be completely without bias in
judging whether the conditions in which that animal is reared cause
suffering.

It is not practically possible to rear animals for food on a large scale
without inflicting considerable suffering. Even if intensive methods are
not used, traditional farming involves castration, separation of mother
and young, breaking up social groups, branding, transportation to the
slaughterhouse, and finally slaughter itself. It is difficult to imagine
how animals could be reared for food without these forms of suffering.
Possibly it could be done on a small scale, but we could never feed
today’s huge urban populations with meat raised in this manner. If it
could be done at all, the animal flesh thus produced would be vastly
more expensive than animal flesh is today—and rearing animals is already
an expensive and inefficient way of producing protein. The flesh of
animals reared and killed with equal consideration for the welfare of
animals while they were alive would be a delicacy available only to the
rich.

All this is, in any case, quite irrelevant to the immediate question of
the ethics of our daily diet. Whatever the theoretical possibilities of
rearing animals without suffering may be, the fact is that the meat
available from butchers and supermarkets comes from animals who were not
treated with any real consideration at all while being reared. So we
must ask ourselves, not: Is it _ever_ right to eat meat? but: Is it
right to eat _this_ meat? Here I think that those who are opposed to the
needless killing of animals and those who oppose only the infliction of
suffering must join together and give the same, negative answer.

Becoming a vegetarian is not merely a symbolic gesture. Nor is it an
attempt to isolate oneself from the ugly realities of the world, to keep
oneself pure and so without responsibility for the cruelty and carnage
all around. Becoming a vegetarian is a highly practical and effective
step one can take toward ending both the killing of nonhuman animals and
the infliction of suffering upon them. Assume, for the moment, that it
is only the suffering that we disapprove of, not the killing. How can we
stop the use of the intensive methods of animal rearing described in the
previous chapter?

So long as people are prepared to buy the products of intensive farming,
the usual forms of protest and political action will never bring about a
major reform. Even in supposedly animal-loving Britain, although the
wide controversy stirred by the publication of Ruth Harrison’s _Animal
Machines_ forced the government to appoint a group of impartial experts
(the Brambell committee) to investigate the issue of mistreatment of
animals and make recommendations, when the committee reported the
government refused to carry out its recommendations. In 1981 the House
of Commons Agriculture Committee made yet another inquiry into intensive
farming, and this inquiry also led to recommendations for eliminating
the worst abuses. Once again, nothing was done.² If this was the fate of
the movement for reform in. Britain, nothing better can be expected in
the United States, where the agribusiness lobby is still more powerful.

This is not to say that the normal channels of protest and political
action are useless and should be abandoned. On the contrary, they are a
necessary part of the overall struggle for effective change in the
treatment of animals. In Britain, especially, organizations like
Compassion in World Farming have kept the issue before the public, and
even succeeded in bringing about an end to veal crates. More recently
American groups have also started to arouse public concern over
intensive farming. But in themselves, these methods are not enough.

The people who profit by exploiting large numbers of animals do not need
our approval. They need our money. The purchase of the corpses of the
animals they rear is the main support the factory farmers ask from the
public (the other, in many countries, is big government subsidies). They
will use intensive methods as long as they can sell what they produce by
these methods; they will have the resources needed to fight reform
politically; and they will be able to defend themselves against
criticism with the reply that they are only providing the public with
what it wants.

Hence the need for each one of us to stop buying the products of modern
animal farming—even if we are not convinced that it would be wrong to
eat animals who have lived pleasantly and died painlessly. Vegetarianism
is a form of boycott. For most vegetarians the boycott is a permanent
one, since once they have broken away from flesh-eating habits they can
no longer approve of slaughtering animals in order to satisfy the
trivial desires of their palates. But the moral obligation to boycott
the meat available in butcher shops and supermarkets today is just as
inescapable for those who disapprove only of inflicting suffering, and
not of killing. Until we boycott meat, and all other products of animal
factories, we are, each one of us, contributing to the continued
existence, prosperity, and growth of factory farming and all the other
cruel practices used in rearing animals for food.

It is at this point that the consequences of speciesism intrude directly
into our lives, and we are forced to attest personally to the sincerity
of our concern for nonhuman animals. Here we have an opportunity to do
something, instead of merely talking and wishing the politicians would
do something. It is easy to take a stand about a remote issue, but
speciesists, like racists, reveal their true nature when the issue comes
nearer home. To protest about bullfighting in Spain, the eating of dogs
in South Korea, or the slaughter of baby seals in Canada while
continuing to eat eggs from hens who have spent their lives crammed into
cages, or veal from calves who have been deprived of their mothers,
their proper diet, and the freedom to lie down with their legs extended,
is like denouncing apartheid in South Africa while asking your neighbors
not to sell their houses to blacks.

To make the boycott aspect of vegetarianism more effective, we must not
be shy about our refusal to eat flesh. Vegetarians in omnivorous
societies are always being asked about the reasons for their strange
diets. This can be irritating, or even embarrassing, but it also
provides opportunities to tell people about cruelties of which they may
be unaware. (I first learned of the existence of factory farming from a
vegetarian who took the time to explain to me why he wasn’t eating the
same food I was.) If a boycott is the only way to stop cruelty, then we
must encourage as many as possible to join the boycott. We can only be
effective in this if we ourselves set the example.

People sometimes attempt to justify eating flesh by saying that the
animal was already dead when they bought it. The weakness of this
rationalization—which I have heard used, quite seriously, many
times—should be obvious as soon as we consider vegetarianism as a form
of boycott. The nonunion grapes available in stores during the grape
boycott inspired by Cesar Chavez’s efforts to improve the wages and
conditions of the grape-pickers had already been produced by underpaid
laborers, and we could no more raise the pay those laborers had received
for picking those grapes than we could bring our steak back to life. In
both cases the aim of the boycott is not to alter the past but to
prevent the continuation of the conditions to which we object.

I have emphasized the boycott element of vegetarianism so much that the
reader may ask whether, if the boycott does not spread and prove
effective, anything has been achieved by becoming a vegetarian. But we
must often venture when we cannot be certain of success, and it would be
no argument against becoming a vegetarian if this were all that could be
said against it, since none of the great movements against oppression
and injustice would have existed if their leaders had made no efforts
until they were assured of success. In the case of vegetarianism,
however, I believe we do achieve something by our individual acts, even
if the boycott as a whole should not succeed. George Bernard Shaw once
said that he would be followed to his grave by numerous sheep, cattle,
pigs, chickens, and a whole shoal of fish, all grateful at having been
spared from slaughter because of his vegetarian diet. Although we cannot
identify any individual animals whom we have benefited by becoming a
vegetarian, we can assume that our diet, together with that of the many
others who are already avoiding meat, will have some impact on the
number of animals raised in factory farms and slaughtered for food. This
assumption is reasonable because the number of animals raised and
slaughtered depends on the profitability of this process, and this
profit depends in part on the demand for the product. The smaller the
demand, the lower the price and the lower the profit. The lower the
profit, the fewer the animals that will be raised and slaughtered. This
is elementary economics, and it can easily be observed in tables
published by the poultry trade journals, for instance, that there is a
direct correlation between the price of poultry and the number of
chickens placed in broiler sheds to begin their joyless existence.

So vegetarianism is really on even stronger ground than most other
boycotts or protests. The person who boycotts South African produce in
order to bring down apartheid achieves nothing unless the boycott
succeeds in forcing white South Africans to modify their policies
(though the effort may have been well worth making, whatever the
outcome); but vegetarians know that they do, by their actions,
contribute to a reduction in the suffering and slaughter of animals,
whether or not they live to see their efforts spark off a mass boycott
of meat and an end to cruelty in farming.

In addition to all this, becoming a vegetarian has a special
significance because the vegetarian is a practical, living refutation of
a common, yet utterly false, defense of factory farming methods. It is
sometimes said that these methods are needed to feed the world’s soaring
population. Because the truth here is so important—important enough, in
fact, to amount to a convincing case for vegetarianism that is quite
independent of the question of animal welfare that I have emphasized in
this book—I shall digress briefly to discuss the fundamentals of food
production.

At this moment, millions of people in many parts of the world do not get
enough to eat. Millions more get a sufficient quantity, but they do not
get the right kind of food; mostly, they do not get enough protein. The
question is, does raising food by the methods practiced in the affluent
nations make a contribution to the solution of the hunger problem?

Every animal has to eat in order to grow to the size and weight at which
it is considered ready for human beings to eat. If a calf, say, grazes
on rough pasture land that grows only grass and could not be planted
with corn or any other crop that provides food edible by human beings,
the result will be a net gain of protein for human beings, since the
grown calf provides us with protein that we cannot—yet—extract
economically from grass. But if we take that same calf and place him in
a feedlot, or any other confinement system, the picture changes. The
calf must now be fed. No matter how little space he and his companions
are crowded into, land must be used to grow the corn, sorghum, soybeans,
or whatever it is that the calf eats. Now we are feeding the calf food
that we ourselves could eat. The calf needs most of this food for the
ordinary physiological processes of day-to-day living. No matter how
severely the calf is prevented from exercising, his body must still burn
food merely to keep him alive. The food is also used to build inedible
parts of the calf’s body, like bones. Only the food left over after
these needs are satisfied can be turned into flesh, and eventually be
eaten by human beings.

How much of the protein in his food does the calf use up, and how much
is available for human beings? The answer is surprising. It takes
twenty-one pounds of protein fed to a calf to produce a single pound of
animal protein for humans. We get back less than 5 percent of what we
put in. No wonder that Frances Moore Lappé has called this kind of
farming “a protein factory in reverse”!³

We can put the matter another way. Assume we have one acre of fertile
land. We can use this acre to grow a high-protein plant food, like peas
or beans. If we do this, we will get between three hundred and five
hundred pounds of protein from our acre. Alternatively we can use our
acre to grow a crop that we feed to animals, and then kill and eat the
animals. Then we will end up with between forty and fifty-five pounds of
protein from our acre. Interestingly enough, although most animals
convert plant protein into animal protein more efficiently than cattle
do—a pig, for instance, needs “only” eight pounds of protein to produce
one pound for humans—this advantage is almost eliminated when we
consider how much protein we can produce per acre, because cattle can
make use of sources of protein that are indigestible for pigs. So most
estimates conclude that plant foods yield about ten times as much
protein per acre as meat does, although estimates vary, and the ratio
sometimes goes as high as twenty to one.⁴

If instead of killing the animals and eating their flesh we use them to
provide us with milk or eggs we improve our return considerably.
Nevertheless the animals must still use protein for their own purposes
and the most efficient forms of egg and milk production do not yield
more than a quarter of the protein per acre that can be provided by
plant foods.

Protein is, of course, only one necessary nutrient. If we compare the
total number of calories produced by plant foods with animal foods, the
comparison is still all in favor of plants. A comparison of yields from
an acre sown with oats or broccoli with yields from an acre used for
feed to produce pork, milk, poultry, or beef shows that the acre of oats
produces six times the calories yielded by pork, the most efficient of
the animal products. The acre of broccoli yields nearly three times as
many calories as pork. Oats produce more than twenty-five times as many
calories per acre as beef. Looking at some other nutrients shatters
other myths fostered by meat and dairy industries. For instance, an acre
of broccoli produces twenty-four times the iron produced by an acre used
for beef, and an acre of oats sixteen times the same amount of iron.
Although milk production does yield more calcium per acre than oats,
broccoli does better still, providing five times as much calcium as
milk.⁵

The implications of all this for the world food situation are
staggering. In 1974 Lester Brown of the Overseas Development Council
estimated that if Americans were to reduce their meat consumption by
only 10 percent for one year, it would free at least 12 million tons of
grain for human consumption—or enough to feed 60 million people. Don
Paarlberg, a former U.S. assistant secretary of agriculture, has said
that merely reducing the U.S. livestock population by half would make
available enough food to make up the calorie deficit of the nonsocialist
underdeveloped nations nearly four times over.⁶ Indeed, the food wasted
by animal production in the affluent nations would be sufficient, if
properly distributed, to end both hunger and malnutrition throughout the
world. The simple answer to our question, then, is that raising animals
for food by the methods used in the industrial nations does not
contribute to the solution of the hunger problem.

Meat production also puts a strain on other resources. Alan Durning, a
researcher at the Worldwatch Institute, an environmental thinktank based
in Washington, D.C., has calculated that one pound of steak from steers
raised in a feedlot costs five pounds of grain, 2,500 gallons of water,
the energy equivalent of a gallon of gasoline, and about thirty-five
pounds of eroded topsoil. More than a third of North America is taken up
with grazing, more than half of U.S. croplands are planted with
livestock feed, and more than half of all water consumed in the United
States goes to livestock.⁷ In all these respects plant foods are far
less demanding of our resources and our environment.

Let us consider energy usage first. One might think that agriculture is
a way of using the fertility of the soil and the energy provided by
sunlight to increase the amount of energy available to us. Traditional
agriculture does precisely that. Corn grown in Mexico, for instance,
produces 83 calories of food for each calorie of fossil fuel energy
input. Agriculture in developed countries, however, relies on a large
input of fossil fuel. The most energy-efficient form of food production
in the United States (oats, again) produces barely 2.5 food calories per
calorie of fossil fuel energy, while potatoes yield just over 2, and
wheat and soybeans around 1.5. Even these meager results, however, are a
bonanza compared to United States animal production, every form of which
costs more energy than it yields. The least inefficient—range-land
beef—uses more than 3 calories of fossil fuel for every food calorie it
yields; while the most inefficient—feedlot beef—takes 33 fuel calories
for every food calorie. In energy efficiency, eggs, lamb, milk, and
poultry come between the two forms of beef production. In other words,
limiting ourselves to United States agriculture, growing crops is
generally at least five times more energy-efficient than grazing cattle,
about twenty times more energy-efficient than producing chickens, and
more than fifty times as energy-efficient as feedlot cattle production.⁸
United States animal production is workable only because it draws on
millions of years of accumulated solar energy, stored in the ground as
oil and coal. This makes economic sense to agribusiness corporations
because meat is worth more than oil; but for a rational long-term use of
our finite resources, it makes no sense at all.

Animal production also compares poorly with crop production as far as
water use is concerned. A pound of meat requires fifty times as much
water as an equivalent quantity of wheat.⁹ _Newsweek_ graphically
described this volume of water when it said, “The water that goes into a
1000 pound steer would float a destroyer.”¹⁰ The demands of animal
production are drying up the vast underground pools of water on which so
many of the drier regions of America, Australia, and other countries
rely. In the cattle country that stretches from western Texas to
Nebraska, for example, water tables are falling and wells are going dry
as the huge underground lake known as the Ogalalla Aquifer—another
resource which, like oil and coal, took millions of years to
create—continues to be used up to produce meat.¹¹

Nor should we neglect what animal production does to the water that it
does not use. Statistics from the British Water Authorities Association
show that there were more than 3,500 incidents of water pollution from
farms in 1985. Here is just one example from that year: a tank at a pig
unit burst, sending a quarter-million liters of pig excrement into the
River Perry and killing 110,000 fish. More than half of the prosecutions
by water authorities for serious pollution of rivers are now against
farmers.¹² This is not surprising, for a modest 60,000-bird egg factory
produces eighty-two tons of manure every week, and in the same period
two thousand pigs will excrete twenty-seven tons of manure and
thirty-two tons of urine. Dutch farms produce 94 million tons of manure
a year, but only 50 million can safely be absorbed by the land. The
excess, it has been calculated, would fill a freight train stretching
16,000 kilometers from Amsterdam to the farthest shores of Canada. But
the excess is not being carted away; it is dumped on the land where it
pollutes water supplies and kills the remaining natural vegetation in
the farming regions of the Netherlands.¹³ In the United States, farm
animals produce 2 billion tons of manure a year—about ten times that of
the human population—and half of it comes from factory-reared animals,
where the waste does not return naturally to the land.¹⁴ As one pig
farmer put it: “Until fertilizer gets more expensive than labor, the
waste has very little value to me.”¹⁵ So the manure that should restore
the fertility of our soils ends up polluting our streams and rivers.

It will, however, be the squandering of the forests that turns out to be
the greatest of all the follies caused by the demand for meat.
Historically, the desire to graze animals has been the dominant motive
for clearing forests. It still is today. In Costa Rica, Colombia, and
Brazil, in Malaysia, Thailand, and Indonesia, rainforests are being
cleared to provide grazing land for cattle. But the meat produced from
the cattle does not benefit the poor of those countries. Instead it is
sold to the well-to-do in the big cities, or it is exported. Over the
past twenty-five years, nearly half of Central America’s tropical
rainforests have been destroyed, largely to provide beef to North
America.¹⁶ Perhaps 90 percent of the plant and animal species on this
planet live in the tropics, many of them still unrecorded by science.¹⁷
If the clearing continues at its present rate, they will be pushed into
extinction. In addition, clearing the land causes erosion, the increased
runoff leads to flooding, peasants no longer have wood for fuel, and
rainfall may be reduced.¹⁸

We are losing these forests just at the moment when we are starting to
learn how truly vital they are. Since the North American drought of
1988, many people have heard of the threat posed to our planet by the
greenhouse effect, caused mainly by increasing amounts of carbon dioxide
in the atmosphere. Forests store immense amounts of carbon; it has been
estimated that despite all the clearing that has taken place, the
world’s remaining forests still hold four hundred times the amount of
carbon released into the atmosphere each year by human use of fossil
fuels. Destroying a forest releases the carbon into the atmosphere in
the form of carbon dioxide. Conversely, a new, growing forest absorbs
carbon dioxide from the atmosphere and locks it up as living matter. The
destruction of existing forests will intensify the greenhouse effect; in
large-scale reforestation, combined with other measures to reduce the
output of carbon dioxide, lies our only hope of mitigating it.¹⁹ If we
fail to do so, the warming of our planet will mean, within the next
fifty years, widespread droughts, further destruction of forests from
climatic change, the extinction of innumerable species unable to cope
with the changes in their habitat, and a melting of the polar ice caps,
which will in turn raise sea levels and flood coastal cities and plains.
A rise of one meter in the level of the sea would flood 15 percent of
Bangladesh, affecting 10 million people; and it would threaten the very
existence of some low-lying Pacific island nations such as the Maldives,
Tuvalu, and Kiribati.²⁰

Forests and meat animals compete for the same land. The prodigious
appetite of the affluent nations for meat means that agribusiness can
pay more than those who want to preserve or restore the forests. We are,
quite literally, gambling with the future of our planet—for the sake of
hamburgers.

How far should we go? The case for a radical break in our eating habits
is clear; but should we eat nothing but plant foods? Where exactly do we
draw the line?

Drawing precise lines is always difficult. I shall make some
suggestions, but the reader might well find what I say here less
convincing than what I have said before about the more clear-cut cases.
You must decide for yourself where you are going to draw the line, and
your decision may not coincide exactly with mine. This does not matter
all that much. We can distinguish bald men from men who are not bald
without deciding every borderline case. It is agreement on the
fundamentals that is important.

I hope that anyone who has read this far will recognize the moral
necessity of refusing to buy or eat the flesh or other products of
animals who have been reared in modern factory farm conditions. This is
the clearest case of all, the absolute minimum that anyone with the
capacity to look beyond considerations of narrow self-interest should be
able to accept.

Let us see what this minimum involves. It means that, unless we can be
sure of the origin of the particular item we are buying, we must avoid
chicken, turkey, rabbit, pork, veal, beef, and eggs. At the present time
relatively little lamb is intensively produced; but some is, and more
may be in future. The likelihood of your beef coming from a feedlot or
some other form of confinement—or from grazing land created by clearing
rainforest—will depend on the country in which you live. It is possible
to obtain supplies of all these meats that do not come from factory
farms, but unless you live in a rural area this takes a lot of effort.
Most butchers have no idea how the animals whose bodies they are selling
were raised. In some cases, such as that of chickens, traditional
methods of rearing have disappeared so completely that it is almost
impossible to buy a chicken that was free to roam outdoors; and veal is
a meat that simply cannot be produced humanely. Even when meat is
described as “organic” this may mean no more than that the animals were
not fed the usual doses of antibiotics, hormones, or other drugs; small
solace for an animal who was not free to walk around outdoors. As for
eggs, in many countries “free range eggs” are widely available, though
in most parts of the United States they are still very difficult to get.

Once you have stopped eating poultry, pork, veal, beef, and factory farm
eggs the next step is to refuse to eat any slaughtered bird or mammal.
This is only a very small additional step, since so few of the birds or
mammals commonly eaten are not intensively reared. People who have no
experience of how satisfying an imaginative vegetarian diet can be may
think of it as a major sacrifice. To this I can only say: “Try it!” Buy
a good vegetarian cookbook (some are listed in Appendix 2 of this book)
and you will find that being a vegetarian is no sacrifice at all. The
reason for taking this extra step may be the belief that it is wrong to
kill these creatures for the trivial purpose of pleasing our palates; or
it may be the knowledge that even when these animals are not intensively
raised they suffer in the various other ways described in the previous
chapter.

Now more difficult questions arise. How far down the evolutionary scale
shall we go? Shall we eat fish? What about shrimps? Oysters? To answer
these questions we must bear in mind the central principle on which our
concern for other beings is based. As I said in the first chapter, the
only legitimate boundary to our concern for the interests of other
beings is the point at which it is no longer accurate to say that the
other being has interests. To have interests, in a strict,
nonmetaphorical sense, a being must be capable of suffering or
experiencing pleasure. If a being suffers, there can be no moral
justification for disregarding that suffering, or for refusing to count
it equally with the like suffering of any other being. But the converse
of this is also true. If a being is not capable of suffering, or of
enjoyment, there is nothing to take into account.

So the problem of drawing the line is the problem of deciding when we
are justified in assuming that a being is incapable of suffering. In my
earlier discussion of the evidence that nonhuman animals are capable of
suffering, I suggested two indicators of this capacity: the behavior of
the being, whether it writhes, utters cries, attempts to escape from the
source of pain, and so on; and the similarity of the nervous system of
the being to our own. As we proceed down the evolutionary scale we find
that on both these grounds the strength of the evidence for a capacity
to feel pain diminishes. With birds and mammals the evidence is
overwhelming. Reptiles and fish have nervous systems that differ from
those of mammals in some important respects but share the basic
structure of centrally organized nerve pathways. Fish and reptiles show
most of the pain behavior that mammals do. In most species there is even
vocalization, although it is not audible to our ears. Fish, for
instance, make vibratory sounds, and different “calls” have been
distinguished by researchers, including sounds indicating “alarm” and
“aggravation.”²¹ Fish also show signs of distress when they are taken
out of the water and allowed to flap around in a net or on dry land
until they die. Surely it is only because fish do not yelp or whimper in
a way that we can hear that otherwise decent people can think it a
pleasant way of spending an afternoon to sit by the water dangling a
hook while previously caught fish die slowly beside them.

In 1976 the British Royal Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to
Animals set up an independent panel of inquiry into shooting and
angling. The panel was chaired by Lord Medway, a noted zoologist, and
made up of experts outside the RSPCA. The inquiry examined in detail
evidence on whether fish can feel pain, and concluded unequivocally that
the evidence for pain in fish is as strong as the evidence for pain in
other vertebrate animals.²² People more concerned about causing pain
than about killing may ask: Assuming fish _can_ suffer, how much _do_
they actually suffer in the normal process of commercial fishing? It may
seem that fish, unlike birds and mammals, are not made to suffer in the
process of rearing them for our tables, since they are usually not
reared at all: human beings interfere with them only to catch and kill
them. Actually this is not always true: fish farming—which is as
intensive a form of factory farming as raising feedlot beef—is a rapidly
growing industry. It began with freshwater fish like trout, but the
Norwegians developed a technique for producing salmon in cages in the
sea, and other countries are now using this method for a variety of
marine fish. The potential welfare problems of farmed fish, such as
stocking densities, the denial of the migratory urge, stress during
handling, and so on have not even been investigated. But even with fish
who are not farmed, the death of a commercially caught fish is much more
drawn out than the death of, say, a chicken, since fish are simply
hauled up into the air and left to die. Since their gills can extract
oxygen from water but not from air, fish out of the water cannot
breathe. The fish on sale in your supermarket may have died slowly, from
suffocation. If it was a deep-sea fish, dragged to the surface by the
net of a trawler, it may have died painfully from decompression.

When fish are caught rather than farmed, the ecological argument against
eating intensively reared animals does not apply to fish. We do not
waste grain or soybeans by feeding them to fish in the ocean. Yet there
is a different ecological argument that counts against the extensive
commercial fishing of the oceans now practiced, and this is that we are
rapidly fishing out the oceans. In recent years fish catches have
declined dramatically. Several once-abundant species of fish, such as
the herrings of Northern Europe, the California sardines, and the New
England haddock, are now so scarce as to be, for commercial purposes,
extinct. Modern fishing fleets trawl the fishing grounds systematically
with fine-gauge nets that catch everything in their way. The nontarget
species—known in the industry as “trash”—may make up as much as half the
catch.²³ Their bodies are thrown overboard. Because trawling involves
dragging a huge net along the previously undisturbed bottom of the
ocean, it damages the fragile ecology of the seabed. Like other ways of
producing animal food, such fishing is also wasteful of fossil fuels,
consuming more energy than it produces.²⁴ The nets used by the tuna
fishing industry, moreover, also catch thousands of dolphins every year,
trapping them underwater and drowning them. In addition to the
disruption of ocean ecology caused by all this overfishing there are bad
consequences for humans too. Throughout the world, small coastal
villages that live by fishing are finding their traditional source of
food and income drying up. From the communities on Ireland’s west coast
to the Burmese and Malayan fishing villages the story is the same. The
fishing industry of the developed nations has become one more form of
redistribution from the poor to the rich.

So out of concern for both fish and human beings we should avoid eating
fish. Certainly those who continue to eat fish while refusing to eat
other animals have taken a major step away from speciesism; but those
who eat neither have gone one step further.

When we go beyond fish to the other forms of marine life commonly eaten
by humans, we can no longer be quite so confident about the existence of
a capacity for pain. Crustacea—lobster, crabs, prawns, shrimps—have
nervous systems very different from our own. Nevertheless, Dr. John
Baker, a zoologist at the University of Oxford and a fellow of the Royal
Society, has stated that their sensory organs are highly developed,
their nervous systems complex, their nerve cells very similar to our
own, and their responses to certain stimuli immediate and vigorous. Dr.
Baker therefore believes that lobster, for example, can feel pain. He is
also clear that the standard method of killing lobster—dropping them
into boiling water—can cause pain for as long as two minutes. He
experimented with other methods sometimes said to be more humane, such
as putting them in cold water and heating them slowly, or leaving them
in fresh water until they cease to move, but found that both of these
led to more prolonged struggling and, apparently, suffering.²⁵ If
crustacea can suffer, there must be a great deal of suffering involved,
not only in the method by which they are killed, but also in the ways in
which they are transported and kept alive at markets. To keep them fresh
they are frequently simply packed, alive, on top of each other. So even
if there is some room for doubt about the capacity of these animals to
feel pain, the fact that they may be suffering a great deal, combined
with the absence of any need to eat them on our part, makes the verdict
plain: they should receive the benefit of the doubt.

Oysters, clams, mussels, scallops, and the like are mollusks, and
mollusks are in general very simple organisms. (There is an exception:
the octopus is a mollusk, but far more developed, and presumably more
sentient, than its distant mollusk relatives.) With creatures like
oysters, doubts about a capacity for pain are considerable; and in the
first edition of this book I suggested that somewhere between a shrimp
and an oyster seems as good a place to draw the line as any.
Accordingly, I continued occasionally to eat oysters, scallops, and
mussels for some time after I became, in every other respect, a
vegetarian. But while one cannot with any confidence say that these
creatures do feel pain, so one can equally have little confidence in
saying that they do not feel pain. Moreover, if they do feel pain, a
meal of oysters or mussels would inflict pain on a considerable number
of creatures. Since it is so easy to avoid eating them, I now think it
better to do so.²⁶

This takes us to the end of the evolutionary scale, so far as creatures
we normally eat are concerned; essentially, we are left with a
vegetarian diet. The traditional vegetarian diet, however, includes
animal products, such as eggs and milk. Some have tried to accuse
vegetarians of inconsistency here. “Vegetarian,” they say, is a word
that has the same root as “vegetable” and a vegetarian should eat only
food of vegetable origin. Taken as a verbal quibble, this criticism is
historically inaccurate. The term “vegetarian” came into general use as
a result of the formation of the Vegetarian Society in England in 1847.
Since the rules of the society permit the use of eggs and milk, the term
“vegetarian” is properly applied to those who use these animal products.
Recognizing this linguistic _fait accompli_, those who eat neither
animal flesh nor eggs nor milk nor foods made from milk call themselves
“vegans.” The verbal point, however, is not the important one. What we
should ask is whether the use of these other animal products is morally
justifiable. This question is a real one because it is possible to be
adequately nourished without consuming any animal products at all—a fact
that is not widely known, although most people now know that vegetarians
can live long and healthy lives. I shall say more on the topic of
nutrition later in this chapter; for the present it is enough to know
that we can do without eggs and milk. But is there any reason why we
should?

We have seen that the egg industry is one of the most ruthlessly
intensive forms of modern factory farming, exploiting hens relentlessly
to produce the most eggs at the least cost. Our obligation to boycott
this type of farming is as strong as our obligation to boycott
intensively produced pork or chicken. But what of free-range eggs,
assuming you can get them? Here the ethical objections are very much
less. Hens provided with both shelter and an outdoor run to walk and
scratch around in live comfortably. They do not appear to mind the
removal of their eggs. The main grounds for objection are that the male
chicks of the egg-laying strain will have been killed on hatching, and
the hens themselves will be killed when they cease to lay productively.
The question is, therefore, whether the pleasant lives of the hens (plus
the benefits to us of the eggs) are sufficient to outweigh the killing
that is a part of the system. One’s answer to that will depend on one’s
view about killing, as distinct from the infliction of suffering. There
is some further discussion of the relevant philosophical issues in the
final chapter of this book.²⁷ In keeping with the reasons given there, I
do not, on balance, object to free-range egg production.

Milk and milk products like cheese and yogurt raise different issues. We
have seen in Chapter 3 that dairy production can be distressing for the
cows and their calves in several ways: the necessity of making the cow
pregnant, and the subsequent separation of the cow and her calf; the
increasing degree of confinement on many farms; the health and stress
problems caused by feeding cows very rich diets and breeding them for
ever-greater milk yields; and now the prospect of further stress from
daily injections of bovine growth hormone.

In principle, there is no problem in doing without dairy products.
Indeed, in many parts of Asia and Africa, the only milk ever consumed is
human milk, for infants. Many adults from these parts of the world lack
the ability to digest the lactose that milk contains, and they become
ill if they drink milk. The Chinese and Japanese have long used soybeans
to make many of the things we make from dairy products. Soy milks are
now widely available in Western countries, and tofu ice cream is popular
with those trying to reduce their intake of fat and cholesterol. There
are even cheeses, spreads, and yogurts made from soybeans.

Vegans, then, are right to say that we ought not to use dairy products.
They are living demonstrations of the practicality and nutritional
soundness of a diet that is totally free from the exploitation of other
animals. At the same time, it should be said that, in our present
speciesist world, it is not easy to keep so strictly to what is morally
right. A reasonable and defensible plan of action is to change your diet
at a measured pace with which you can feel comfortable. Although in
principle all dairy products are replaceable, in practice in Western
societies it is much more difficult to cut out meat and dairy products
than it is to elminate meat alone. Until you start reading food labels
with an eye to avoiding dairy products, you will never believe how many
foods contain them. Even buying a tomato sandwich becomes a problem,
since it will probably be spread either with butter, or with a margarine
containing whey or nonfat milk. There is little gained for animals if
you give up animal flesh and battery eggs, and simply replace them with
an increased amount of cheese. On the other hand, the following is, if
not ideal, a reasonable and practical strategy:

•replace animal flesh with plant foods;

•replace factory farm eggs with free-range eggs if you can get them;
otherwise avoid eggs;

• replace the milk and cheese you buy with soymilk, tofu, or other plant
foods, but do not feel obliged to go to great lengths to avoid all food
containing milk products.

Eliminating speciesism from one’s dietary habits is very difficult to do
all at once. People who adopt the strategy I support here have made a
clear public commitment to the movement against animal exploitation. The
most urgent task of the Animal Liberation movement is to persuade as
many people as possible to make this commitment, so that the boycott
will spread and gain attention. If because of an admirable desire to
stop all forms of exploitation of animals immediately we convey the
impression that unless one gives up milk products one is no better than
those who still eat animal flesh, the result may be that many people are
deterred from doing anything at all, and the exploitation of animals
will continue as before.

These, at least, are some of the answers to problems that are likely to
face nonspeciesists who ask what they should and should not eat. As I
said at the beginning of this section, my remarks are intended to be no
more than suggestions. Sincere nonspeciesists may well disagree among
themselves about the details. So long as there is agreement on the
fundamentals this should not disrupt efforts toward a common goal.

Many people are willing to admit that the case for vegetarianism is
strong. Too often, though, there is a gap between intellectual
conviction and the action needed to break a lifetime habit. There is no
way in which books can bridge this gap; ultimately it is up to each one
of us to put our convictions into practice. But I can try, in the next
few pages, to narrow the gap. My aim is to make the transition from an
omnivorous diet to a vegetarian one much easier and more attractive, so
that instead of seeing the change of diet as an unpleasant duty the
reader looks forward to a new and interesting cuisine, full of fresh
foods as well as unusual meatless dishes from Europe, China, and the
Middle East, dishes so varied as to make the habitual meat, meat, and
more meat of most Western diets stale and repetitive by comparison. The
enjoyment of such a cuisine is enhanced by the knowledge that its good
taste and nourishing qualities were provided directly by the earth,
neither wasting what the earth produces, nor requiring the suffering and
death of any sentient being.

Vegetarianism brings with it a new relationship to food, plants, and
nature. Flesh taints our meals. Disguise it as we may, the fact remains
that the centerpiece of our dinner has come to us from the
slaughterhouse, dripping blood. Untreated and unrefrigerated, it soon
begins to putrefy and stink. When we eat it, it sits heavily in our
stomachs, blocking our digestive processes until, days later, we
struggle to excrete it.²⁸ When we eat plants, food takes on a different
quality. We take from the earth food that is ready for us and does not
fight against us as we take it. Without meat to deaden the palate we
experience an extra delight in fresh vegetables taken straight from the
ground. Personally, I found the idea of picking my own dinner so
satisfying that shortly after becoming a vegetarian I began digging up
part of our backyard and growing some of my own vegetables—something
that I had never thought of doing previously, but that several of my
vegetarian friends were also doing. In this way dropping flesh-meat from
my diet brought me into closer contact with plants, the soil, and the
seasons.

Cooking, too, was something I became interested in only after I became a
vegetarian. For those brought up on the usual Anglo-Saxon menus, in
which the main dish consists of meat supplemented by two overcooked
vegetables, the elimination of meat poses an interesting challenge to
the imagination. When I speak in public about the issues discussed in
this book, I am often asked about what one can eat instead of meat, and
it is clear from the way the question is phrased that the questioner has
mentally subtracted the chop or hamburger from his or her plate, leaving
the mashed potatoes and boiled cabbage, and is wondering what to put in
place of the meat. A heap of soybeans perhaps?

There may be those who would enjoy such a meal, but for most tastes the
answer is to rethink the entire idea of the main course, so that it
consists of a combination of ingredients, perhaps with a salad on the
side, instead of detached items. Good Chinese dishes, for instance, are
superb combinations of one or more high-protein ingredients—in
vegetarian Chinese cooking, they may include tofu, nuts, bean sprouts,
mushrooms, or wheat gluten, with fresh, lightly cooked vegetables and
rice. An Indian curry using lentils for protein, served over brown rice
with some fresh sliced cucumber for light relief, makes an equally
satisfying meal, as does an Italian vegetarian lasagna with salad. You
can even make “tofu meatballs” to put on top of your spaghetti. A
simpler meal might consist of whole grains and vegetables. Most
Westerners eat very little millet, whole wheat, or buckwheat, but these
grains can form the basis of a dish that is a refreshing change. In the
first edition of this book I provided some recipes and hints on
vegetarian cooking to help readers make the transition to what was,
then, still an unusual diet; but in the intervening years so many
excellent vegetarian cookbooks have been published that the assistance I
was able to provide seems quite unnecessary now. (I’ve recommended a few
cookbooks in Appendix 2.) Some people find it hard, at first, to change
their attitude to a meal. Getting used to meals without a central piece
of animal flesh may take time, but once it has happened you will have so
many interesting new dishes to choose from that you will wonder why you
ever thought it would be difficult to do without flesh foods.

Apart from the tastiness of their meals, people contemplating
vegetarianism are most likely to worry about whether they will be
adequately nourished. These worries are entirely groundless. Many parts
of the world have vegetarian cultures whose members have been as
healthy, and often healthier, than nonvegetarians living in similar
areas. Strict Hindus have been vegetarians for more than two thousand
years. Gandhi, a lifelong vegetarian, was close to eighty when an
assassin’s bullet ended his active life. In Britain, where there has now
been an official vegetarian movement for more than 140 years, there are
third- and fourth-generation vegetarians. Many prominent vegetarians,
such as Leonardo da Vinci, Leo Tolstoy, and George Bernard Shaw, have
lived long, immensely creative lives. Indeed, most people who have
reached exceptional old age have eaten little or no meat. The
inhabitants of the Vilcabamba valley in Ecuador frequently live to be
more than one hundred years old, and men as old as 123 and 142 years
have been found by scientists; these people eat less than one ounce of
meat a week. A study of all living centenarians in Hungary found that
they were largely vegetarian.²⁹ That meat is unnecessary for physical
endurance is shown by a long list of successful athletes who do not eat
it, a list that includes Olympic long-distance swimming champion Murray
Rose, the famous Finnish distance runner Paavo Nurmi, basketball star
Bill Walton, the “ironman” triathlete Dave Scott, and 400-meter Olympic
hurdle champion Edwin Moses.

Many vegetarians claim that they feel fitter, healthier, and more
zestful than when they ate meat. A great deal of new evidence now
supports them. The 1988 United States Surgeon General’s Report on
Nutrition and Health cites a major study indicating that the death rate
for heart attacks of vegetarians between the ages of thirty-five and
sixty-four is only 28 percent of the rate for Americans in general in
that age group. For older vegetarians the rate of death from heart
attacks was still less than half that of nonvegetarians. The same study
showed that vegetarians who ate eggs and dairy products had cholesterol
levels 16 percent lower than those of meat eaters, and vegans had
cholesterol levels 29 percent lower. The report’s main recommendations
were to reduce consumption of cholesterol and fat (especially saturated
fat), and increase consumption of whole grain foods and cereal products,
vegetables (including dried beans and peas) and fruits. A recommendation
to reduce cholesterol and saturated fat is, in effect, a recommendation
to avoid meat (except perhaps chicken from which the skin has been
removed), and cream, butter, and all except low-fat dairy products.³⁰
The report was widely criticized for failing to be more specific in
saying this—a vagueness due, apparently, to successful lobbying by
groups like the National Cattlemen’s Association and the Dairy Board.³¹
Whatever lobbying took place failed however, to prevent the section on
cancer from reporting that studies have found an association between
breast cancer and meat intake, and also between eating meat, especially
beef, and cancer of the large bowel. The American Heart Association has
also been recommending, for many years, that Americans reduce their meat
intake.³² Diets designed for health and longevity like the Pritikin plan
and the McDougall plan are either largely or entirely vegetarian.³³

Nutritional experts no longer dispute about whether animal flesh is
essential; they now agree that it is not. If ordinary people still have
misgivings about doing without it, these misgivings are based on
ignorance. Most often this ignorance is about the nature of protein. We
are frequently told that protein is an important element in a sound
diet, and that meat is high in protein. Both these statements are true,
but there are two other things that we are told less often. The first is
that the average American eats too much protein. The protein intake of
the average American exceeds the generous level recommended by the
National Academy of Sciences by 45 percent. Other estimates say that
most Americans consume between two and four times as much meat as the
body can use. Excess protein cannot be stored. Some of it is excreted,
and some may be converted by the body to carbohydrate, which is an
expensive way to increase one’s carbohydrate intake.³⁴

The second thing to know about protein is that meat is only one among a
great variety of foods containing protein, its chief distinction being
that it is the most expensive. It was once thought that meat protein was
of superior quality, but as long ago as 1950 the British Medical
Association’s Committee on Nutrition stated:

It is generally accepted that it is immaterial whether the essential
protein units are derived from plant or animal foods, provided that they
supply an appropriate mixture of the units in assimilable form.³⁵

More recent research has provided further confirmation of this
conclusion. We now know that the nutritional value of protein consists
in the essential amino acids it contains, since these determine how much
of the protein the body can use. While it is true that animal foods,
especially eggs and milk, have a very well-balanced amino acid
composition, plant foods like soybeans and nuts also contain a broad
range of these nutrients. Moreover by eating different kinds of plant
proteins at the same time it is easy to put together a meal that
provides protein entirely equivalent to that of animal protein. This
principle is called “protein complementarity,” but you do not need to
know much about nutrition to apply it. The peasant who eats his beans or
lentils with rice or corn is practicing protein complementarity. So is
the mother who gives her child a peanut butter sandwich on whole wheat
bread—a combination of peanuts and wheat, both of which contain protein.
The different forms of protein in the different foods combine with each
other in such a way that the body absorbs more protein if they are eaten
together than if they were eaten separately. Even without the
complementary effect of combining different proteins, however, most of
the plant foods we eat—not just nuts, peas, and beans, but even wheat,
rice, and potatoes—contain enough protein in themselves to provide our
bodies with the protein we need. If we avoid junk foods that are high in
sugar or fats and nothing else, about the only way we can fail to get
enough protein is if we are on a diet that is insufficient in
calories.³⁶

Protein is not the only nutrient in meat, but the others can all easily
be obtained from a vegetarian diet without special care. Only vegans,
who take no animal products at all, need to be especially careful about
their diet. There appears to be one, and only one, necessary nutrient
that is not normally available from plant sources, and this is vitamin
B12, which is present in eggs and milk, but not in a readily assimilable
form in plant foods. It can, however, be obtained from seaweeds such as
kelp, from a soy sauce made by the traditional Japanese fermentation
method, or from tempeh, a fermented soybean product eaten in parts of
Asia, and often now available in health food stores in the West. It is
also possible that it is produced by microorganisms in our own
intestines. Studies of vegans who have not taken any apparent source of
B12 for many years have shown their blood levels of this vitamin still
to be within the normal range. Nevetheless to make sure of avoiding a
deficiency, it is simple and inexpensive to take vitamin tablets
containing B12. The B12 in these tablets is obtained from bacteria grown
on plant foods. Studies of children in vegan families have shown that
they develop normally on diets that contain a B12 supplement but no
animal food after weaning.³⁷

I have tried in this chapter to answer the doubts about becoming a
vegetarian that can easily be articulated and expressed. But some people
have a deeper resistance that makes them hesitate. Perhaps the reason
for hesitation is a fear of being thought a crank by one’s friends. When
my wife and I began to think about becoming vegetarians we talked about
this. We worried that we would be cutting ourselves off from our
nonvegetarian friends and at that time none of our long-established
friends was vegetarian. The fact that we became vegetarians together
certainly made the decision easier for both of us, but as things turned
out we need not have worried. We explained our decision to our friends
and they saw that we had good reasons for it. They did not all become
vegetarians, but they did not cease to be our friends either; in fact I
think they rather enjoyed inviting us to dinner and showing us how well
they could cook without meat. Of course, it is possible that you will
encounter people who consider you a crank. This is much less likely now
than it was a few years ago, because there are so many more vegetarians.
But if it should happen, remember that you are in good company. All the
best reformers—those who first opposed the slave trade, nationalistic
wars, and the exploitation of children working a fourteenhour day in the
factories of the Industrial Revolution—were at first derided as cranks
by those who had an interest in the abuses they were opposing.

_Chapter 5_

Man’s Dominion …

_a short history of speciesism_

To end tyranny we must first understand it. As a practical matter, the
rule of the human animal over other animals expresses itself in the
manner we have seen in Chapters 2 and 3, and in related practices like
the slaughter of wild animals for sport or for their furs. These
practices should not be seen as isolated aberrations. They can be
properly understood only as the manifestations of the ideology of our
species—that is, the attitudes which we, as the dominant animal, have
toward the other animals.

In this chapter we shall see how, at different periods, outstanding
Western thinkers formulated and defended the attitudes to animals that
we have inherited. I concentrate on the “West” not because other
cultures are inferior—the reverse is true, so far as attitudes to
animals are concerned—but because Western ideas have, over the past two
or three centuries, spread out from Europe until today they set the mode
of thought for most human societies, whether capitalist or communist.

Though the material that follows is historical, my aim in presenting it
is not. When an attitude is so deeply ingrained in our thought that we
take it as an unquestioned truth, a serious and consistent challenge to
that attitude runs the risk of ridicule. It may be possible to shatter
the complacency with which the attitude is held by a frontal attack.
This is what I have tried to do in the preceding chapters. An
alternative strategy is to attempt to undermine the plausibility of the
prevailing attitude by revealing its historical origins.

The attitudes toward animals of previous generations are no longer
convincing because they draw on presuppositions—religious, moral,
metaphysical—that are now obsolete. Because we do not defend our
attitudes to animals in the way that Saint Thomas Aquinas, for example,
defended his attitudes to animals, we may be ready to accept that
Aquinas used the religious, moral, and metaphysical ideas of his time to
mask the naked self-interest of human dealings with other animals. If we
can see that past generations accepted as right and natural attitudes
that we recognize as ideological camouflages for self-serving
practices—and if, at the same time, it cannot be denied that we continue
to use animals to further our own minor interests in violation of their
major interests—we may be persuaded to take a more skeptical view of
those justifications of our own practices that we ourselves have taken
to be right and natural.

Western attitudes to animals have roots in two traditions: Judaism and
Greek antiquity. These roots unite in Christianity, and it is through
Christianity that they came to prevail in Europe. A more enlightened
view of our relations with animals emerges only gradually, as thinkers
begin to take positions that are relatively independent of the church;
and in fundamental respects we still have not broken free of the
attitudes that were unquestioningly accepted in Europe until the
eighteenth century. We may divide our historical discussion, therefore,
into three parts: pre-Christian, Christian, and the Enlightenment and
after.

_Pre-Christian Thought_

The creation of the universe seems a fit starting point. The biblical
story of the creation sets out very clearly the nature of the
relationship between man and animal as the Hebrew people conceived it to
be. It is a superb example of myth echoing reality:

And God said, Let the earth bring forth the living creature after his
kind, cattle and creeping thing, and beast of the earth after his kind:
and it was so.

And God made the beast of the earth after his kind, and cattle after
their kind, and every thing that creepeth upon the earth after his kind:
and God saw that it was good.

And God said, Let us make man in our image, after our likeness: and let
them have dominion over the fish of the sea, and over the fowl of the
air, and over the earth, and over every creeping thing that creepeth
upon the earth.

So God created man in his own image, in the image of God created he him;
male and female created he them.

And God blessed them, and God said unto them, Be fruitful, and multiply,
and replenish the earth, and subdue it; and have dominion over the fish
of the sea, and over the fowl of the air, and over every living thing
that moveth upon the earth.¹

The Bible tells us that God made man in His own image. We may regard
this as man making God in his own image. Either way, it allots human
beings a special position in the universe, as beings that, alone of all
living things, are God-like. Moreover, God is explicitly said to have
given man dominion over every living thing. It is true that, in the
Garden of Eden, this dominion may not have involved killing other
animals for food. Genesis 1:29 suggests that at first human beings lived
off the herbs and fruits of the trees, and Eden has often been pictured
as a scene of perfect peace, in which killing of any kind would have
been out of place. Man ruled, but in this earthly paradise his was a
benevolent despotism.

After the fall of man (for which the Bible holds a woman and an animal
responsible), killing animals clearly was permissible. God himself
clothed Adam and Eve in animal skins before driving them out of the
Garden of Eden. Their son Abel was a keeper of sheep and made offerings
of his flock to the Lord. Then came the flood, when the rest of creation
was nearly wiped out to punish man for his wickedness. When the waters
subsided Noah thanked God by making burnt offerings “of every clean
beast, and of every clean fowl.” In return, God blessed Noah and gave
the final seal to man’s dominion:

And God blessed Noah and his sons, and said unto them, Be fruitful, and
multiply, and replenish the earth.

And the fear of you and the dread of you shall be upon every beast of
the earth, and upon every fowl of the air, upon all that moveth upon the
earth, and upon all the fishes of the sea; into your hands are they
delivered.

Every moving thing that liveth shall be meat for you; even as the green
herb have I given you all things.²

This is the basic position of the ancient Hebrew writings toward
nonhumans. There is again an intriguing hint that in the original state
of innocence we were vegetarian, eating only “the green herb,” but that
after the fall, the wickedness that followed it, and the flood, we were
given permission to add animals to our diet. Beneath the assumption of
human dominion that this permission implies, a more compassionate vein
of thought still occasionally emerges. The prophet Isaiah condemned
animal sacrifices, and the book of Isaiah contains a lovely vision of
the time when the wolf will dwell with the lamb, the lion will eat straw
like the ox, and “they shall not hurt nor destroy in all my holy
mountain.” This, however, is a utopian vision, not a command to be
followed immediately. Other scattered passages in the Old Testament
encourage some degree of kindliness toward animals, so that it is
possible to argue that wanton cruelty was prohibited, and that
“dominion” is really more like a “stewardship,” in which we are
responsible to God for the care and well-being of those placed under our
rule. Nevertheless there is no serious challenge to the overall view,
laid down in Genesis, that the human species is the pinnacle of creation
and has God’s permission to kill and eat other animals.

The second ancient tradition of Western thought is that of Greece. Here
we find, at first, conflicting tendencies. Greek thought was not
uniform, but divided into rival schools, each taking its basic doctrines
from some great founder. One of these, Pythagoras, was a vegetarian and
encouraged his followers to treat animals with respect, apparently
because he believed that the souls of dead men migrated to animals. But
the most important school was that of Plato and his pupil, Aristotle.

Aristotle’s support for slavery is well known; he thought that some men
are slaves by nature and that slavery is both right and expedient for
them. I mention this not in order to discredit Aristotle, but because it
is essential for understanding his attitude to animals. Aristotle holds
that animals exist to serve the purposes of human beings, although,
unlike the author of Genesis, he does not drive any deep gulf between
human beings and the rest of the animal world.

Aristotle does not deny that man is an animal; in fact he defines man as
a rational animal. Sharing a common animal nature however, is not enough
to justify equal consideration. For Aristotle the man who is by nature a
slave is undoubtedly a human being, and is as capable of feeling
pleasure and pain as any other human being; yet because he is supposed
to be inferior to the free man in his reasoning powers, Aristotle
regards him as a “living instrument.” Quite openly, Aristotle juxtaposes
the two elements in a single sentence: the slave is one who “though
remaining a human being, is also an article of property.”³

If the difference in reasoning powers between human beings is enough to
make some masters and others their property, Aristotle must have thought
the rights of human beings to rule over other animals too obvious to
require much argument. Nature, he held, is essentially a hierarchy in
which those with less reasoning ability exist for the sake of those with
more:

Plants exist for the sake of animals, and brute beasts for the sake of
man—domestic animals for his use and food, wild ones (or at any rate
most of them) for food and other accessories of life, such as clothing
and various tools.

Since nature makes nothing purposeless or in vain, it is undeniably true
that she has made all animals for the sake of man.⁴

It was the views of Aristotle, rather than those of Pythagoras, that
were to become part of the later Western tradition.

_Christian Thought_

Christianity was in time to unite Jewish and Greek ideas about animals.
But Christianity was founded and became powerful under the Roman Empire,
and we can see its initial effect best if we compare Christian attitudes
with those they replaced.

The Roman Empire was built by wars of conquest, and needed to devote
much of its energy and revenue to the military forces that defended and
extended its vast territory. These conditions did not foster sentiments
of sympathy for the weak. The martial virtues set the tone of the
society. Within Rome itself, far from the fighting on the frontiers, the
character of Roman citizens was supposedly toughened by the so-called
games. Although every schoolboy knows how Christians were thrown to the
lions in the Colosseum, the significance of the games as an indication
of the possible limits of sympathy and compassion of apparently—and in
other respects genuinely—civilized people is rarely appreciated. Men and
women looked upon the slaughter of both human beings and other animals
as a normal source of entertainment; and this continued for centuries
with scarcely a protest.

The nineteenth-century historian W. E. H. Lecky gives the following
account of the development of the Roman games from their beginning as a
combat between two gladiators:

The simple combat became at last insipid, and every variety of atrocity
was devised to stimulate the flagging interest. At one time a bear and a
bull, chained together, rolled in fierce combat across the sand; at
another, criminals dressed in the skins of wild beasts were thrown to
bulls, which were maddened by red-hot irons, or by darts tipped with
burning pitch. Four hundred bears were killed on a single day under
Caligula.… Under Nero, four hundred tigers fought with bulls and
elephants. In a single day, at the dedication of the Colosseum by Titus,
five thousand animals perished. Under Trajan, the games continued for
one hundred and twenty-three successive days. Lions, tigers, elephants,
rhinoceroses, hippopotami, giraffes, bulls, stags, even crocodiles and
serpents were employed to give novelty to the spectacle. Nor was any
form of human suffering wanting.… Ten thousand men fought during the
games of Trajan. Nero illumined his gardens during the night by
Christians burning in their pitchy shirts. Under Domitian, an army of
feeble dwarfs was compelled to fight.… So intense was the craving for
blood, that a prince was less unpopular if he neglected the distribution
of corn than if he neglected the games.⁵

The Romans were not without any moral feelings. They showed a high
regard for justice, public duty, and even kindness to others. What the
games show, with hideous clarity, is that there was a sharp limit to
these moral feelings. If a being came within this limit, activities
comparable to what occurred at the games would have been an intolerable
outrage; when a being was outside the sphere of moral concern, however,
the infliction of suffering was merely entertaining. Some human
beings—criminals and military captives especially—and all animals fell
outside this sphere.

It is against this background that the impact of Christianity must be
assessed. Christianity brought into the Roman world the idea of the
uniqueness of the human species, which it inherited from the Jewish
tradition but insisted upon with still greater emphasis because of the
importance it placed on the human being’s immortal soul. Human beings,
alone of all beings living on earth, were destined for life after bodily
death. With this came the distinctively Christian idea of the sanctity
of all human life.

There have been religions, especially in the East, which have taught
that all life is sacred; and there have been many others that have held
it gravely wrong to kill members of one’s own social, religious, or
ethnic group; but Christianity spread the idea that every human life—and
only human life—is sacred. Even the newborn infant and the fetus in the
womb have immortal souls, and so their lives are as sacred as those of
adults.

In its application to human beings, the new doctrine was in many ways
progressive, and led to an enormous expansion of the limited moral
sphere of the Romans; so far as other species are concerned, however,
this same doctrine served to confirm and further depress the lowly
position nonhumans had in the Old Testament. While it asserted human
dominion over other species, the Old Testament did at least show
flickers of concern for their sufferings. The New Testament is
completely lacking in any injunction against cruelty to animals, or any
recommendation to consider their interests. Jesus himself is described
as showing apparent indifference to the fate of nonhumans when he
induced two thousand swine to hurl themselves into the sea—an act which
was apparently quite unnecessary, since Jesus was well able to cast out
devils without inflicting them upon any other creature.⁶ Saint Paul
insisted on reinterpreting the old Mosaic law that forbade muzzling the
ox that trod out the corn: “Doth God care for oxen?” Paul asks
scornfully. No, he answered, the law was intended “altogether for our
sakes.”⁷

The example given by Jesus was not lost on later Christians. Referring
to the incident of the swine and the episode in which Jesus cursed a fig
tree, Saint Augustine wrote:

Christ himself shows that to refrain from the killing of animals and the
destroying of plants is the height of superstition, for judging that
there are no common rights between us and the beasts and trees, he sent
the devils into a herd of swine and with a curse withered the tree on
which he found no fruit.… Surely the swine had not sinned, nor had the
tree.

Jesus was, according to Augustine, trying to show us that we need not
govern our behavior toward animals by the moral rules that govern our
behavior toward humans. That is why he transferred the devils to swine
instead of destroying them as he could easily have done.⁸

On this basis the outcome of the interaction of Christian and Roman
attitudes is not difficult to guess. It can be seen most clearly by
looking at what happened to the Roman games after the conversion of the
empire to Christianity. Christian teaching was implacably opposed to
gladiatorial combats. The gladiator who survived by killing his opponent
was regarded as a murderer. Mere attendance at these combats made the
Christian liable to excommunication, and by the end of the fourth
century combats between human beings had been suppressed altogether. On
the other hand, the moral status of killing or torturing any nonhuman
remained unchanged. Combats with wild animals continued into the
Christian era, and apparently declined only because the declining wealth
and extent of the empire made wild animals more difficult to obtain.
Indeed, these combats may still be seen, in the modern form of the
bullfight, in Spain and Latin America.

What is true of the Roman games is also true more generally.
Christianity left nonhumans as decidedly outside the pale of sympathy as
they ever were in Roman times. Consequently, while attitudes to human
beings were softened and improved beyond recognition, attitudes to other
animals remained as callous and brutal as they were in Roman times.
Indeed, not only did Christianity fail to temper the worst of Roman
attitudes toward other animals; it unfortunately succeeded in
extinguishing for a long, long time the spark of a wider compassion that
had been kept alight by a tiny number of more gentle people.

There had been just a few Romans who had shown compassion for suffering,
whatever the being who suffered, and repulsion at the use of sentient
creatures for human pleasure, whether at the gourmet’s table or in the
arena. Ovid, Seneca, Porphyry, and Plutarch all wrote along these lines,
Plutarch having the honor, according to Lecky, of being the first to
advocate strongly the kind treatment of animals on the ground of
universal benevolence, independently of any belief in the transmigration
of souls.⁹ We have to wait nearly sixteen hundred years, however, before
any Christian writer attacks cruelty to animals with similar emphasis
and detail on any ground other than that it may encourage a tendency
toward cruelty to humans.

A few Christians expressed some concern for animals. There is a prayer
written by Saint Basil that urges kindness to animals, a remark by Saint
John Chrysostom to the same effect, and a teaching of Saint Isaac the
Syrian. There were even some saints who, like Saint Neot, sabotaged
hunts by rescuing stags and hares from the hunters.¹⁰ But these figures
failed to divert mainstream Christian thinking from its exclusively
speciesist preoccupation. To demonstrate this lack of influence, instead
of tracing the development of Christian views on animals through the
early Church Fathers to the medieval scholastics—a tedious process,
since there is more repetition than development—it will be better to
consider in more detail than would otherwise be possible the position of
Saint Thomas Aquinas.

Aquinas’s enormous _Summa Theologica_ was an attempt to grasp the sum of
theological knowledge and reconcile it with the worldly wisdom of the
philosophers, though for Aquinas, Aristotle was so preeminent in his
field that he is referred to simply as “the Philosopher.” If any single
writer may be taken as representative of Christian philosophy prior to
the Reformation, and of Roman Catholic philosophy to this day, it is
Aquinas.

We may begin by asking whether, according to Aquinas, the Christian
prohibition on killing applies to creatures other than humans, and if
not, why not. Aquinas answers:

There is no sin in using a thing for the purpose for which it is. Now
the order of things is such that the imperfect are for the perfect.…
Things, like plants which merely have life, are all alike for animals,
and all animals are for man. Wherefore it is not unlawful if men use
plants for the good of animals, and animals for the good of man, as the
Philosopher states (_Politics_ I, 3).

Now the most necessary use would seem to consist in the fact that
animals use plants, and men use animals, for food, and this cannot be
done unless these be deprived of life, wherefore it is lawful both to
take life from plants for the use of animals, and from animals for the
use of men. In fact this is in keeping with the commandment of God
himself (_Genesis_ i, 29, 30 and _Genesis_ ix, 3).¹¹

For Aquinas the point is not that killing for food is in itself
necessary and therefore justifiable (since Aquinas knew of sects like
the Manichees in which the killing of animals was forbidden, he could
not have been entirely ignorant of the fact that human beings can live
without killing animals, but we shall overlook this for the moment); it
is only the “more perfect” who are entitled to kill for this reason.
Animals that kill human beings for food are in a quite different
category:

Savagery and brutality take their names from a likeness to wild beasts.
For animals of this kind attack man that they may feed on his body, and
not for some motive of justice, the consideration of which belongs to
reason alone.¹²

Human beings, of course, would not kill for food unless they had first
considered the justice of so doing!

So human beings may kill other animals and use them for food; but are
there perhaps other things that we may not do to them? Is the suffering
of other creatures in itself an evil? If so would it not for that reason
be wrong to make them suffer, or at least to make them suffer
unnecessarily?

Aquinas does not say that cruelty to “irrational animals” is wrong in
itself. He has no room for wrongs of this kind in his moral schema, for
he divides sins into those against God, those against oneself, and those
against one’s neighbor. So the limits of morality once again exclude
nonhumans. There is no category for sins against them.¹³

Perhaps although it is not a sin to be cruel to nonhumans, it is
charitable to be kind to them? No, Aquinas explicitly excludes this
possibility as well. Charity, he says, does not extend to irrational
creatures for three reasons: they are “not competent, properly speaking,
to possess good, this being proper to rational creatures”; we have no
fellow-feeling with them; and, finally, “charity is based on the
fellowship of everlasting happiness, to which the irrational creature
cannot attain.” It is only possible to love these creatures, we are
told, “if we regard them as the good things that we desire for others,”
that is, “to God’s honor and man’s use.” In other words, we cannot
lovingly give food to turkeys because they are hungry, but only if we
think of them as someone’s Christmas dinner.¹⁴

All this might lead us to suspect that Aquinas simply doesn’t believe
that animals other than human beings are capable of suffering at all.
This view has been held by other philosophers and, for all its apparent
absurdity, to attribute it to Aquinas would at least excuse him of the
charge of indifference to suffering. This interpretation, however, is
ruled out by his own words. In the course of a discussion of some of the
mild injunctions against cruelty to animals in the Old Testament,
Aquinas proposes that we distinguish reason and passion. So far as
reason is concerned, he tells us:

It matters not how man behaves to animals, because God has subjected all
things to man’s power and it is in this sense that the Apostle says that
God has no care for oxen, because God does not ask of man what he does
with oxen or other animals.

On the other hand, where passion is concerned, our pity is aroused by
animals, because “even irrational animals are sensible to pain”;
nevertheless, Aquinas regards the pain that animals suffer as
insufficient reason to justify the Old Testament injunctions, and
therefore adds:

Now it is evident that if a man practice a pitiable affection for
animals, he is all the more disposed to take pity on his fellow-men,
wherefore it is written (_Proverbs_ xii, 10) “The just regardeth the
life of his beast.”¹⁵

So Aquinas arrives at the often to be repeated view that the only reason
against cruelty to animals is that it may lead to cruelty to human
beings. No argument could reveal the essence of speciesism more clearly.

Aquinas’s influence has lasted. As late as the middle of the nineteenth
century, Pope Pius IX refused to allow a Society for the Prevention of
Cruelty to Animals to be established in Rome, on the grounds that to do
so would imply that human beings have duties toward animals.¹⁶ And we
can bring this account right up to the second half of the twentieth
century without finding significant modifications in the official
position of the Roman Catholic Church. The following passage, from an
American Roman Catholic text, makes an instructive comparison with the
passage written seven hundred years ago, and quoted above, from Aquinas:

In the order of nature, the imperfect is for the sake of the perfect,
the irrational is to serve the rational. Man, as a rational animal, is
permitted to use things below him in this order of nature for his proper
needs. He needs to eat plants and animals to maintain his life and
strength. To eat plants and animals, they must be killed. So killing is
not, of itself, an immoral or unjust act.¹⁷

The point to notice about this text is that the author sticks so closely
to Aquinas that he even repeats the assertion that it is necessary for
human beings to eat plants _and_ animals. The ignorance of Aquinas in
this respect was surprising, but excusable given the state of scientific
knowledge in his time; that a modern author, who would only need to look
up a standard work on nutrition or take note of the existence of healthy
vegetarians, should carry on the same error is incredible.

It was only in 1988 that an authoritative statement from the Roman
Catholic Church indicated that the environmental movement is beginning
to affect Catholic teachings. In his encyclical _Solicitudo Rei
Socialis_ (“On Social Concerns”), Pope John Paul II urged that human
development should include “respect for the beings which constitute the
natural world” and added:

The dominion granted to man by the Creator is not an absolute power, nor
can one speak of a freedom to “use and misuse,” or to dispose of things
as one pleases.… When it comes to the natural world, we are subject not
only to biological laws, but also to moral ones, which cannot be
violated with impunity.¹⁸

That a Pope should so clearly reject the absolute dominion view is very
promising, but it is too early to say if it signals a historic and
much-needed change of direction in Catholic teaching about animals and
the environment.

There have, of course, been many humane Catholics who have done their
best to ameliorate the position of their church with regard to animals,
and they have had occasional successes. By stressing the degrading
tendency of cruelty, some Catholic writers have felt themselves able to
condemn the worst of human practices toward other animals. Yet most
remain limited by the basic outlook of their religion. The case of Saint
Francis of Assisi illustrates this.

Saint Francis is the outstanding exception to the rule that Catholicism
discourages concern for the welfare of nonhuman beings. “If I could only
be presented to the emperor,” he is reported as saying, “I would pray
him, for the love of God, and of me, to issue an edict prohibiting
anyone from catching or imprisoning my sisters the larks, and ordering
that all who have oxen or asses should at Christmas feed them
particularly well.” Many legends tell of his compassion, and the story
of how he preached to the birds certainly seems to imply that the gap
between them and humans was less than other Christians supposed.

But a misleading impression of the views of Saint Francis may be gained
if one looks only at his attitude to larks and the other animals. It was
not only sentient creatures whom Saint Francis addressed as his sisters:
the sun, the moon, wind, fire, all were brothers and sisters to him. His
contemporaries described him as taking “inward and outward delight in
almost every creature, and when he handled or looked at them his spirit
seemed to be in heaven rather than on earth.” This delight extended to
water, rocks, flowers, and trees. This is a description of a person in a
state of religious ecstasy, deeply moved by a feeling of oneness with
all of nature. People from a variety of religious and mystical
traditions appear to have had such experiences, and have expressed
similar feelings of universal love. Seeing Francis in this light makes
the breadth of his love and compassion more readily comprehensible. It
also enables us to see how his love for all creatures could coexist with
a theological position that was quite orthodox in its speciesism. Saint
Francis affirmed that “every creature proclaims: ‘God made me for your
sake, O man!’” The sun itself, he thought, shines for man. These beliefs
were part of a cosmology that he never questioned; the force of his love
for all creation, however, was not to be bound by such considerations.

While this kind of ecstatic universal love can be a wonderful source of
compassion and goodness, the lack of rational reflection can also do
much to counteract its beneficial consequences. If we love rocks, trees,
plants, larks, and oxen equally, we may lose sight of the essential
differences between them, most importantly, the differences in degree of
sentience. We may then think that since we have to eat to survive, and
since we cannot eat without killing something we love, it does not
matter which we kill. Possibly it was for this reason that Saint
Francis’s love for birds and oxen appears not to have led him to cease
eating them; and when he drew up the rules for the conduct of the friars
in the order he founded, he gave no instruction that they were to
abstain from meat, except on certain fast days.¹⁹

It may seem that the period of the Renaissance, with the rise of
humanist thought in opposition to medieval scholasticism, would have
shattered the medieval picture of the universe and brought down with it
earlier ideas about the status of humans vis-à-vis the other animals.
But Renaissance humanism was, after all, _humanism_; and the meaning of
this term has nothing to do with humanitarianism, the tendency to act
humanely.

The central feature of Renaissance humanism is its insistence on the
value and dignity of human beings, and on the central place of human
beings in the universe. “Man is the measure of all things,” a phrase
revived in Renaissance times from the ancient Greeks, is the theme of
the period. Instead of a somewhat depressing concentration on original
sin and the weakness of human beings in comparison to the infinite power
of God, the Renaissance humanists emphasized the uniqueness of human
beings, their free will, their potential, and their dignity; and they
contrasted all this with the limited nature of the “lower animals.” Like
the original Christian insistence on the sanctity of human life, this
was in some ways a valuable advance in attitudes to human beings, but it
left nonhumans as far below humans as they had ever been.

So the Renaissance writers wrote self-indulgent essays in which they
said that “nothing in the world can be found that is more worthy of
admiration than man”²⁰ and described humans as “the center of nature,
the middle of the universe, the chain of the world.”²¹ If the
Renaissance marks in some respect the beginning of modern thought, so
far as attitudes to animals were concerned earlier modes of thought
still maintained their hold.

Around this time, however, we may notice the first genuine dissenters:
Leonardo da Vinci was teased by his friends for being so concerned about
the sufferings of animals that he became a vegetarian;²² and Giordano
Bruno, influenced by the new Copernican astronomy, which allowed for the
possibility of other planets, some of which could be inhabited, ventured
to assert that “man is no more than an ant in the presence of the
infinite.” Bruno was burned at the stake in 1600 for refusing to recant
his heresies.

Michel de Montaigne’s favorite author was Plutarch, and his attack on
the humanist assumptions of his age would have met with the approval of
that gentle Roman:

Presumption is our natural and original disease.… ’Tis by the same
vanity of imagination that [man] equals himself to God, attributes to
himself divine qualities, and withdraws and separates himself from the
crowd of other creatures.²³

It is surely not a coincidence that the writer who rejects such
self-exaltation should also, in his essay “On Cruelty,” be among the
very few writers since Roman times to assert that cruelty to animals is
wrong in itself, quite apart from its tendency to lead to cruelty to
human beings.

Perhaps, then, from this point in the development of Western thought the
status of nonhumans was bound to improve? The old concept of the
universe, and of the central place of human beings in it, was slowly
giving ground; modern science was about to set forth on its now-famous
rise; and, after all, the status of nonhumans was so low that one might
reasonably think it could only improve.

But the absolute nadir was still to come. The last, most bizarre,
and—for the animals—most painful outcome of Christian doctrines emerged
in the first half of the seventeenth century, in the philosophy of René
Descartes. Descartes was a distinctively modern thinker. He is regarded
as the father of modern philosophy, and also of analytic geometry, in
which a good deal of modern mathematics has its origins. But he was also
a Christian, and his beliefs about animals arose from the combination of
these two aspects of his thought.

Under the influence of the new and exciting science of mechanics,
Descartes held that everything that consisted of matter was governed by
mechanistic principles, like those that governed a clock. An obvious
problem with this view was our own nature. The human body is composed of
matter, and is part of the physical universe. So it would seem that
human beings must also be machines, whose behavior is determined by the
laws of science.

Descartes was able to escape the unpalatable and heretical view that
humans are machines by bringing in the idea of the soul. There are,
Descartes said, not one but two kinds of things in the universe, things
of the spirit or soul as well as things of a physical or material
nature. Human beings are conscious, and consciousness cannot have its
origin in matter. Descartes identified consciousness with the immortal
soul, which survives the decomposition of the physical body, and
asserted that the soul was specially created by God. Of all material
beings, Descartes said, only human beings have a soul. (Angels and other
immaterial beings have consciousness and nothing else.)

Thus in the philosophy of Descartes the Christian doctrine that animals
do not have immortal souls has the extraordinary consequence that they
do not have consciousness either. They are, he said, mere machines,
automata. They experience neither pleasure nor pain, nor anything else.
Although they may squeal when cut with a knife, or writhe in their
efforts to escape contact with a hot iron, this does not, Descartes
said, mean that they feel pain in these situations. They are governed by
the same principles as a clock, and if their actions are more complex
than those of a clock, it is because the clock is a machine made by
humans, while animals are infinitely more complex machines, made by
God.²⁴

This “solution” of the problem of locating consciousness in a
materialistic world seems paradoxical to us, as it did to many of
Descartes’s contemporaries, but at the time it was also thought to have
important advantages. It provided a reason for believing in a life after
death, something which Descartes thought “of great importance” since
“the idea that the souls of animals are of the same nature as our own,
and that we have no more to fear or to hope for after this life than
have the flies and ants” was an error that was apt to lead to immoral
conduct. It also eliminated the ancient and vexing theological puzzle of
why a just God would allow animals—who neither inherited Adam’s sin, nor
are recompensed in an afterlife—to suffer.²⁵

Descartes was also aware of more practical advantages:

My opinion is not so much cruel to animals as indulgent to men—at least
to those who are not given to the superstitions of Pythagoras—since it
absolves them from the suspicion of crime when they eat or kill
animals.²⁶

For Descartes the scientist the doctrine had still another fortunate
result. It was at this time that the practice of experimenting on live
animals became widespread in Europe. Since there were no anesthetics
then, these experiments must have caused the animals to behave in a way
that would indicate, to most of us, that they were suffering extreme
pain. Descartes’s theory allowed the experimenters to dismiss any qualms
they might feel under these circumstances. Descartes himself dissected
living animals in order to advance his knowledge of anatomy, and many of
the leading physiologists of the period declared themselves Cartesians
and mechanists. The following eyewitness account of some of these
experimenters, working at the Jansenist seminary of Port-Royal in the
late seventeenth century, makes clear the convenience of Descartes’s
theory:

They administered beatings to dogs with perfect indifference, and made
fun of those who pitied the creatures as if they felt pain. They said
the animals were clocks; that the cries they emitted when struck were
only the noise of a little spring that had been touched, but that the
whole body was without feeling. They nailed poor animals up on boards by
their four paws to vivisect them and see the circulation of the blood
which was a great subject of conversation.²⁷

From this point, it really was true that the status of animals could
only improve.

_The Enlightenment and After_

The new vogue for experimenting on animals may itself have been partly
responsible for a change in attitudes toward animals, for the
experiments revealed a remarkable similarity between the physiology of
human beings and other animals. Strictly, this was not inconsistent with
what Descartes had said, but it made his views less plausible. Voltaire
put it well:

There are barbarians who seize this dog, who so greatly surpasses man in
fidelity and friendship, and nail him down to a table and dissect him
alive, to show you the mesaraic veins! You discover in him _all the same
organs of feeling as in yourself_. Answer me, mechanist, has Nature
arranged all the springs of feeling in this animal _to the end that he
might not feel_?²⁸

Although no radical change took place, a variety of influences combined
to improve attitudes to animals. There was a gradual recognition that
other animals do suffer and are entitled to some consideration. It was
not thought that they had any rights, and their interests were
overridden by human interests; nevertheless the Scottish philosopher
David Hume was expressing a common enough sentiment when he said that we
are “bound by the laws of humanity to give gentle usage to these
creatures.”²⁹

“Gentle usage” is, indeed, a phrase that nicely sums up the attitude
that began to spread in this period: we were entitled to use animals,
but we ought to do so gently. The tendency of the age was for greater
refinement and civility, more benevolence and less brutality, and
animals benefited from this tendency along with humans.

The eighteenth century was also the period in which we rediscovered
“Nature”: Jean-Jacques Rousseau’s noble savage, strolling naked through
the woods, picking fruits and nuts as he went, was the culmination of
this idealization of nature. By seeing ourselves as part of nature, we
regained a sense of kinship with “the beasts.” This kinship, however,
was in no sense egalitarian. At best, man was seen in the role of
benevolent father of the family of animals.

Religious ideas of the special status of human beings did not disappear.
They were interwoven with the newer, more benevolent attitude. Alexander
Pope, for example, opposed the practice of cutting open fully conscious
dogs by arguing that although “the inferior creation” has been
“submitted to our power” we are answerable for the “mismanagement” of
it.³⁰

Finally, and especially in France, the growth of anticlerical feeling
was favorable to the status of animals. Voltaire, who delighted in
fighting dogmas of all kinds, compared Christian practices unfavorably
with those of the Hindu. He went further than the contemporary English
advocates of kind treatment when he referred to the barbarous custom of
supporting ourselves upon the flesh and blood of beings like ourselves,”
although apparently he continued to practice this custom himself.³¹
Rousseau, too, seems to have recognized the strength of the arguments
for vegetarianism without actually adopting the practice; his treatise
on education, _Emile_, contains a long and mostly irrelevant passage
from Plutarch that attacks the use of animals for food as unnatural,
unnecessary, bloody murder.³²

The Enlightenment did not affect all thinkers equally in their attitudes
toward animals. Immanuel Kant, in his lectures on ethics, still told his
students:

So far as animals are concerned, we have no direct duties. Animals are
not self-conscious, and are there merely as a means to an end. That end
is man.³³

But in the same year that Kant gave these lectures—1780—Jeremy Bentham
completed his _Introduction to the Principles of Morals and
Legislation_, and in it, in a passage I have already quoted in the first
chapter of this book, he gave the definitive answer to Kant: “The
question is not, Can they _reason_? nor Can they _talk_? but, Can they
_suffer_?” In comparing the position of animals with that of black
slaves, and looking forward to the day “when the rest of the animal
creation may acquire those rights which never could have been withholden
from them but by the hand of tyranny,” Bentham was perhaps the first to
denounce “man’s dominion” as tyranny rather than legitimate government.

The intellectual progress made in the eighteenth century was followed,
in the nineteenth century, by some practical improvements in the
conditions of animals. These took the form of laws against wanton
cruelty to animals. The first battles for legal rights for animals were
fought in Britain, and the initial reaction of the British Parliament
indicates that Bentham’s ideas had had little impact on his countrymen.

The first proposal for a law to prevent abuse of animals was a bill to
prohibit the “sport” of bull-baiting. It was introduced into the House
of Commons in 1800. George Canning, the foreign secretary, described it
as “absurd” and asked rhetorically: “What could be more innocent than
bull-baiting, boxing, or dancing?” Since no attempt was being made to
prohibit boxing or dancing, it appears that this astute statesman had
missed the point of the bill he was opposing—he thought it an attempt to
outlaw gatherings of “the rabble” that might lead to immoral conduct.³⁴
The presupposition that made this mistake possible was that conduct that
injures only an animal cannot possibly be worth legislating about—a
presupposition shared by _The Times_, which devoted an editorial to the
principle that “whatever meddles with the private personal disposition
of man’s time or property is tyranny. Till another person is injured
there is no room for power to interpose.” The bill was defeated.

In 1821 Richard Martin, an Irish gentleman-landowner and a member of
Parliament for Galway, proposed a law to prevent the ill-treatment of
horses. The following account conveys the tone of the ensuing debate:

When Alderman C. Smith suggested that protection should be given to
asses, there were such howls of laughter that _The Times_ reporter could
hear little of what was said. When the Chairman repeated this proposal,
the laughter was intensified. Another member said Martin would be
legislating for dogs next, which caused a further roar of mirth, and a
cry “And cats!” sent the House into convulsions.³⁵

This bill failed too, but in the following year Martin succeeded with a
bill that made it an offense “wantonly” to mistreat certain domestic
animals, “the property of any other person or persons.” For the first
time, cruelty to animals was a punishable offense. Despite the mirth of
the previous year, asses were included; dogs and cats, however, were
still beyond the pale. More significantly, Martin had had to frame his
bill so that it resembled a measure to protect items of private
property, for the benefit of the owner, rather than for the sake of the
animals themselves.³⁶

The bill was now law, but it still had to be enforced. Since the victims
could not make a complaint, Martin and a number of other notable
humanitarians formed a society to gather evidence and bring
prosecutions. So began the first animal welfare organization, later to
become the Royal Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals.

A few years after the passage of this first, modest statutory
prohibition of cruelty to animals, Charles Darwin wrote in his diary:
“Man in his arrogance thinks himself a great work, worthy of the
interposition of a deity. More humble and, I believe, true, to consider
him created from animals.”³⁷ Another twenty years were to pass before,
in 1859, Darwin considered that he had accumulated enough evidence in
support of his theory to make it public. Even then, in _The Orgin of
Species_, Darwin carefully avoided any discussion of the extent to which
his theory of the evolution of one species from another could be applied
to humans, saying only that the work would illuminate “the origin of man
and his history.” In fact, Darwin already had extensive notes on the
theory that Homo sapiens had descended from other animals, but he
decided that publishing this material would “only add to the prejudices
against my views.”³⁸ Only in 1871, when many scientists had accepted the
general theory of evolution, did Darwin publish _The Descent of Man_,
thus making explicit what had been concealed in a single sentence of his
earlier work.

So began a revolution in human understanding of the relationship between
ourselves and the nonhuman animals … or did it? One would expect the
intellectual upheaval sparked by the publication of the theory of
evolution to have made a marked difference in human attitudes to
animals. Once the weight of scientific evidence in favor of the theory
became apparent, practically every earlier justification of our supreme
place in creation and our dominion over the animals had to be
reconsidered. Intellectually the Darwinian revolution was genuinely
revolutionary. Human beings now knew that they were not the special
creation of God, made in the divine image and set apart from the
animals; on the contrary, human beings came to realize that they were
animals themselves. Moreover, in support of his theory of evolution,
Darwin pointed out that the differences between human beings and animals
were not so great as was generally supposed. Chapter 3 of _The Descent
of Man_ is devoted to a comparison of the mental powers of humans and
the “lower animals,” and Darwin summarizes the results of this
comparison as follows:

We have seen that the senses and intuitions, the various emotions and
faculties, such as love, memory, attention and curiosity, imitation,
reason etc., of which man boasts, may he found in an incipient, or even
sometimes in a well-developed condition, in the lower animals.³⁹

The fourth chapter of the same work goes still further, affirming that
the human moral sense can also be traced back to social instincts in
animals that lead them to take pleasure in each other’s company, feel
sympathy for each other, and perform services of mutual assistance. And
in a subsequent work, _The Expression of the Emotions in Man and
Animals_, Darwin provided additional evidence of extensive parallels
between the emotional life of human beings and that of other animals.

The storm of resistance that met the theory of evolution and of the
descent of the human species from animals—a story too well known to need
retelling here—is an indication of the extent to which speciesist ideas
had come to dominate Western thought. The idea that we are the product
of a special act of creation, and that the other animals were created to
serve us, was not to be given up without resistance. The scientific
evidence for a common origin of the human and other species was,
however, overwhelming.

With the eventual acceptance of Darwin’s theory we reach a modern
understanding of nature, one which has since then changed in detail
rather than in fundamentals. Only those who prefer religious faith to
beliefs based on reasoning and evidence can still maintain that the
human species is the special darling of the entire universe, or that
other animals were created to provide us with food, or that we have
divine authority over them, and divine permission to kill them.

When we add this intellectual revolution to the growth of humanitarian
feeling that preceded it, we might think that all will now be well. Yet,
as I hope the preceding chapters have made plain, the human “hand of
tyranny” is still clamped down on other species, and we probably inflict
more pain on animals now than at any other time in history. What went
wrong?

If we look at what relatively advanced thinkers wrote about animals from
the time when, toward the end of the eighteenth century, the right of
animals to some degree of consideration was beginning to be accepted, we
may notice an interesting fact. With very rare exceptions these writers,
even the best of them, stop short of the point at which their arguments
would lead them to face the choice between breaking the deeply ingrained
habit of eating the flesh of other animals or admitting that they do not
live up to the conclusions of their own moral arguments. This is an
often-repeated pattern. When reading among sources from the late
eighteenth century onward, one frequently comes across passages in which
the author urges the wrongness of our treatment of other animals in such
strong terms that one feels sure that here, at last, is someone who has
freed himself altogether from speciesist ideas—and hence, has freed
himself too from the most widespread of all speciesist practices, the
practice of eating other animals. With one or two notable exceptions (in
the nineteenth century Lewis Gompertz and Henry Salt),⁴⁰ one is always
disappointed. Suddenly a qualification is made, or some new
consideration introduced, and the author spares himself the qualms over
his diet that his argument seemed sure to create. When the history of
the Animal Liberation movement comes to be written, the era that began
with Bentham will be known as the era of excuses.

The excuses used vary, and some of them show a certain ingenuity. It is
worthwhile examining specimens of the main types, for they are still
encountered today.

First, and this should come as no surprise, there is the Divine Excuse.
It may be illustrated by the following passage from William Paley’s
_Principles of Moral and Political Philosophy_ (1785). In setting out
“the General Rights of Mankind” Paley asks whether we have a right to
the flesh of animals:

Some excuse seems necessary for the pain and loss which we occasion to
brutes, by restraining them of their liberty, mutilating their bodies,
and at last, putting an end to their lives (which we suppose to be the
whole of their existence) for our pleasure or convenience.

[It is] alleged in vindication of this practice … that the several
species of brutes being created to prey upon one another affords a kind
of analogy to prove that the human species were intended to feed upon
them … [but] the analogy contended for is extremely lame; since brutes
have no power to support life by any other means, and since we have; for
the whole human species might subsist entirely upon fruits, pulse, herbs
and roots, as many tribes of Hindoos actually do.…

It seems to me that it would be difficult to defend this right by any
arguments which the light and order of nature afford; and that we are
beholden for it to the permission recorded in Scripture, _Genesis_ ix,
1, 2, 3.⁴¹

Paley is only one of many who have appealed to revelation when they
found themselves unable to give a rational justification of a diet
consisting of other animals. Henry Salt in his autobiography _Seventy
Years Amongst Savages_ (an account of his life in England) records a
conversation he had when he was a master at Eton College. He had
recently become a vegetarian; now for the first time he was to discuss
his practice with a colleague, a distinguished science teacher. With
some trepidation he awaited the verdict of the scientific mind on his
new beliefs; when it came, it was: “But don’t you think that animals
were _sent_ to us for food?”⁴²

Another writer, Lord Chesterfield, appealed to nature, instead of God:

My scruples remained unreconciled to the committing of so horrid a meal,
till upon serious reflection I became convinced of its legality from the
general order of nature, which has instituted the universal preying upon
the weaker as one of her first principles.⁴³

Whether Lord Chesterfield thought this justified cannibalism is not
recorded.

Benjamin Franklin used the same argument—the weakness of which Paley
exposed—as a justification for returning to a flesh diet after some
years as a vegetarian. In his _Autobiography_ he recounts how he was
watching some friends fishing, and noticed that some of the fish they
caught had eaten other fish. He therefore concluded, “If you eat one
another, I don’t see why we may not eat you.” Franklin, however, was at
least more honest than some who use this argument, for he admits that he
reached this conclusion only after the fish was in the frying-pan and
had begun to smell “admirably well”; and he adds that one of the
advantages of being a “reasonable creature” is that one can find a
reason for whatever one wants to do.⁴⁴

It is also possible for a deep thinker to avoid confronting the
troublesome issue of diet by regarding it as altogether too profound for
the human mind to comprehend. As Dr. Thomas Arnold of Rugby wrote:

The whole subject of the brute creation is to me one of such painful
mystery that I dare not approach it.⁴⁵

This attitude was shared by the French historian Michelet; being French,
he expressed it less prosaically:

Animal Life, somber mystery! Immense world of thoughts and of dumb
sufferings. All nature protests against the barbarity of man, who
misapprehends, who humiliates, who tortures his inferior brethren. Life,
death! The daily murder which feeding upon animals implies—those hard
and bitter problems sternly placed themselves before my mind. Miserable
contradiction. Let us hope that there may be another sphere in which the
base, the cruel fatalities of this may be spared to us.⁴⁶

Michelet seems to have believed that we cannot live without killing; if
so, his anguish at this “miserable contradiction” must have been in
inverse proportion to the amount of time he gave to examining it.

Another to accept the comfortable error that we must kill to live was
Arthur Schopenhauer. Schopenhauer was influential in introducing Eastern
ideas to the West, and in several passages he contrasted the
“revoltingly crude” attitudes to animals prevalent in Western philosophy
and religion with those of Buddhists and Hindus. His prose is sharp and
scornful, and many of his acute criticisms of Western attitudes are
still appropriate today. After one particularly biting passage, however,
Schopenhauer briefly considers the question of killing for food. He can
hardly deny that human beings can live without killing—he knows too much
about the Hindus for that—but he claims that “without animal food the
human race could not even exist _in the North_.” Schopenhauer gives no
basis for this geographical distinction, although he does add that the
death of the animal should be made “even easier” by means of
chloroform.⁴⁷

Even Bentham, who stated so clearly the need to extend rights to
nonhumans, flinched at this point:

There is very good reason why we should be suffered to eat such of them
as we like to eat; we are the better for it, and they are never the
worse. They have none of those long-protracted anticipations of future
misery which we have. The death they suffer in our hands commonly is,
and always may be, a speedier, and by that means a less painful one,
than that which would await them in the inevitable course of nature.

One cannot help feeling that in these passages Schopenhauer and Bentham
lowered their normal standards of argument. Quite apart from the
question of the morality of painless killing, neither Schopenhauer nor
Bentham considers the suffering necessarily involved in rearing and
slaughtering animals on a commercial basis. Whatever the purely
theoretical possibilities of painless killing may be, the large-scale
killing of animals for food is not and never has been painless. When
Schopenhauer and Bentham wrote, slaughter was an even more horrific
affair than it is today. The animals were forced to cover long distances
on foot, driven to slaughter by drovers who had no concern but to
complete the journey as quickly as possible; they might then spend two
or three days in the slaughteryards, without food, perhaps without
water; they were then slaughtered by barbaric methods, without any form
of prior stunning.⁴⁸ Despite what Bentham says, they did have some form
of anticipation of what was in store for them, at least from the time
they entered the slaughteryard and smelled the blood of their fellows.
Bentham and Schopenhauer would not, of course, have approved of this,
yet they continued to support the process by consuming its products, and
justifying the general practice of which it was part. In this respect
Paley seems to have had a more accurate conception of what was involved
in eating flesh. He, however, could safely look the facts in the face,
because he had divine permission to fall back upon; Schopenhauer and
Bentham could not have availed themselves of this excuse, and so had to
turn their gaze away from the ugly reality.

As for Darwin himself, he too retained the moral attitudes to animals of
earlier generations, though he had demolished the intellectual
foundations of those attitudes. He continued to dine on the flesh of
those beings who, he had said, were capable of love, memory, curiosity,
reason, and sympathy for each other; and he refused to sign a petition
urging the RSPCA to press for legislative control of experiments on
animals.⁴⁹ His followers went out of their way to emphasize that
although we were a part of nature and descended from animals, our status
had not been altered. In reply to the accusation that Darwin’s ideas
undermined the dignity of man, T. H. Huxley, Darwin’s greatest champion,
said:

No-one is more strongly convinced than I am of the vastness of the gulf
between civilized man and the brutes; our reverence for the nobility of
mankind will not be lessened by the knowledge that man is, in substance
and in structure, one with the brutes.⁵⁰

Huxley is a true representative of modern attitudes; he knows perfectly
well that the old reasons for assuming a vast gulf between “man” and
“brute” no longer stand up, but continues to believe in the existence of
such a gulf nevertheless.

Here we see most clearly the ideological nature of our justifications of
the use of animals. It is a distinctive characteristic of an ideology
that it resists refutation. If the foundations of an ideological
position are knocked out from under it, new foundations will be found,
or else the ideological position will just hang there, defying the
logical equivalent of the laws of gravity. In the case of attitudes to
animals, the latter seems to have happened. While the modern view of our
place in the world differs enormously from all the earlier views we
studied, in the practical matter of how we act toward other animals
little has changed. If animals are no longer quite outside the moral
sphere, they are still in a special section near the outer rim. Their
interests are allowed to count only when they do not clash with human
interests. If there is a clash—even a clash between a lifetime of
suffering for a nonhuman animal and the gastronomic preference of a
human being—the interests of the nonhuman are disregarded. The moral
attitudes of the past are too deeply embedded in our thought and our
practices to be upset by a mere change in our knowledge of ourselves and
of other animals.

_Chapter 6_

Speciesism Today …

_defenses, rationalizations_, _and objections to Animal Liberation_ _and
the progress made in overcoming them_

We have seen how, in violation of the fundamental moral principle of
equality of consideration of interests that ought to govern our
relations with all beings, humans inflict suffering on nonhumans for
trivial purposes; and we have seen how generation after generation of
Western thinkers has sought to defend the right of human beings to do
this. In this final chapter I shall look at some of the ways in which
speciesist practices are maintained and promoted today, and at the
various arguments and excuses that are still used in defense of animal
slavery. Some of these defenses have been raised against the position
taken in this book, and so this chapter provides an opportunity to
answer some of the objections most often made to the case for Animal
Liberation; but the chapter is also intended as an extension of the
previous one, revealing the continued existence of the ideology whose
history we have traced back to the Bible and the ancient Greeks. It is
important to expose and criticize this ideology, because although
contemporary attitudes to animals are sufficiently benevolent—on a very
selective basis—to allow some improvements in the conditions of animals
to be made without challenging basic attitudes to animals, these
improvements will always be in danger of erosion unless we alter the
underlying position that sanctions the ruthless exploitation of
nonhumans for human ends. Only by making a radical break with more than
two thousand years of Western thought about animals can we build a solid
foundation for the abolition of this exploitation.

Our attitudes to animals begin to form when we are very young, and they
are dominated by the fact that we begin to eat meat at an early age.
Interestingly enough, many children at first refuse to eat animal flesh,
and only become accustomed to it after strenuous efforts by their
parents, who mistakenly believe that it is necessary for good health.
Whatever the child’s initial reaction, though, the point to notice is
that we eat animal flesh long before we are capable of understanding
that what we are eating is the dead body of an animal. Thus we never
make a conscious, informed decision, free from the bias that accompanies
any long-established habit, reinforced by all the pressures of social
conformity, to eat animal flesh. At the same time children have a
natural love of animals, and our society encourages them to be
affectionate toward animals such as dogs and cats and toward cuddly,
stuffed toy animals. These facts help to explain the most distinctive
characteristic of the attitudes of children in our society to
animals—namely, that rather than having one unified attitude to animals,
the child has two conflicting attitudes that coexist, carefully
segregated so that the inherent contradiction between them rarely causes
trouble.

Not so long ago children were brought up on fairy tales in which
animals, especially wolves, were pictured as cunning enemies of man. A
characteristic happy ending would leave the wolf drowning in a pond,
weighed down by stones which the ingenious hero had sewn into its belly
while it was asleep. And in case children missed the implications of
these stories, they could all join hands and sing a nursery rhyme like:

_Three blind mice. See how they run_.

_They all ran after the farmer’s wife_.

_She cut off their tails with a carving knife_.

_Did you ever see such a sight in your life_

_As three blind mice_?

For children brought up on these stories and rhymes there was no
inconsistency between what they were taught and what they ate. Today,
however, such stories and rhymes have gone out of fashion, and on the
surface all is sweetness and light, so far as children’s attitudes to
animals are concerned. Thereby a problem has arisen: What about the
animals we eat?

One response to this problem is simple evasion. The child’s affection
for animals is directed toward animals that are not eaten: dogs, cats,
and other companion animals. These are the animals that an urban or
suburban child is most likely to see. Cuddly, stuffed toy animals are
more likely to be bears or lions than pigs or cows. When farm animals
are mentioned in picture books, stories, and on children’s television
shows, however, evasion may become a deliberate attempt to mislead
children about the nature of modern farms, and so to screen them from
the reality that we examined in Chapter 3. An example of this is the
popular Hallmark book _Farm Animals_, which presents the child with
pictures of hens, turkeys, cows, and pigs, all surrounded by their
young, with not a cage, shed, or stall in sight. The text tells us that
pigs “enjoy a good meal, then roll in the mud and let out a squeal!”
while “Cows don’t have a thing to do, but switch their tails, eat grass
and moo.”¹ British books, like _The Farm_ in the best-selling Ladybird
series, convey the same impression of rural simplicity, showing the hen
running freely in an orchard with her chicks, and all the other animals
living with their offspring in spacious quarters.² With this kind of
early reading it is not surprising that children grow up believing that
even if animals “must” die to provide human beings with food, they live
happily until that time comes.

Recognizing the importance of the attitudes we form when young, the
feminist movement has succeeded in fostering the growth of a new
children’s literature, in which brave princesses occasionally rescue
helpless princes, and girls play the central, active roles that used to
be reserved for boys. To alter the stories about animals that we read to
our children will not be so easy, since cruelty is not an ideal subject
for children’s stories. Yet it should be possible to avoid the most
gruesome details, and still give children picture books and stories that
encourage respect for animals as independent beings, and not as cute
little objects that exist for our amusement and table; and as children
grow older, they can be made aware that most animals live under
conditions that are not very pleasant. The difficulty will be that
nonvegetarian parents are going to be reluctant to let their children
learn the full story, for fear that the child’s affection for animals
may disrupt family meals. Even now, one frequently hears that, on
learning that animals are killed to provide meat, a friend’s child has
refused to eat meat. Unfortunately this instinctive rebellion is likely
to meet strong resistance from nonvegetarian parents, and most children
are unable to keep up their refusal in the face of opposition from
parents who provide their meals and tell them that they will not grow up
big and strong without meat. One hopes that as knowledge of nutrition
spreads more parents will realize that on this issue their children may
be wiser than they are.³ It is an indication of the extent to which
people are now isolated from the animals they eat that children brought
up on storybooks that lead them to think of a farm as a place where
animals wander around freely in idyllic conditions might be able to live
out their entire lives without ever being forced to revise this rosy
image. There are no farms in the cities and suburbs where people live,
and while on a drive through the country one now sees many farm
buildings and relatively few animals out in the fields, how many of us
can distinguish a storage barn from a broiler shed?

Nor do the mass media educate the public on this topic. American
television broadcasts programs on animals in the wild (or supposedly in
the wild—sometimes the animals have been captured and released in a more
limited space to make filming easier) almost every night of the week;
but film of intensive farms is limited to the briefest of glimpses as
part of infrequent “specials” on agriculture or food production. The
average viewer must know more about the lives of cheetahs and sharks
than he or she knows about the lives of chickens or veal calves. The
result is that most of the “information” about farm animals to be gained
from watching television is in the form of paid advertising, which
ranges from ridiculous cartoons of pigs who want to be made into
sausages and tuna trying to get themselves canned, to straightforward
lies about the conditions in which broiler chickens are reared. The
newspapers do little better. Their coverage of nonhuman animals is
dominated by “human interest” events like the birth of a baby gorilla at
the zoo, or by threats to endangered species; but developments in
farming techniques that deprive millions of animals of freedom of
movement go unreported.

Before the recent successes of the Animal Liberation movement in
exposing one or two notorious laboratories, what went on in research
with animals was no better known than what goes on down on the farm. The
public, of course, does not have access to laboratories. Although
researchers publish their reports in professional journals, researchers
only release news of their work to the media when they can claim to have
discovered something of special importance. Thus, until the Animal
Liberation movement was able to attract national media attention, the
public had no idea that most experiments performed on animals are never
published at all, and that most of those published are trivial anyway.
Since, as we saw in Chapter 2, no one knows exactly how many experiments
are performed on animals in the United States, it is not surprising that
the public still has not the remotest idea of the extent of animal
experimentation. Research facilities are usually designed so that the
public sees little of the live animals that go in, or the dead ones that
come out. (A standard textbook on the use of animals in experimentation
advises laboratories to install an incinerator, since the sight of
dozens of bodies of dead animals left out as ordinary refuse “will
certainly not enhance the esteem with which the research center or
school is held by the public.”⁴)

Ignorance, then, is the speciesist’s first line of defense. Yet it is
easily breached by anyone with the time and determination to find out
the truth. Ignorance has prevailed so long only because people do not
want to find out the truth. “Don’t tell me, you’ll spoil my dinner” is
the usual reply to an attempt to tell someone just how that dinner was
produced. Even people who are aware that the traditional family farm has
been taken over by big business interests, and that some questionable
experiments go on in laboratories, cling to a vague belief that
conditions cannot be too bad, or else the government or the animal
welfare societies would have done something about it. Some years ago Dr.
Bernhard Grzimek, director of the Frankfurt Zoo and one of West
Germany’s most outspoken opponents of intensive farming, likened the
ignorance of Germans about these farms to the ignorance of an earlier
generation of Germans to another form of atrocity, also hidden away from
most eyes;⁵ and in both cases, no doubt, it is not the inability to find
out what is going on as much as a desire not to know about facts that
may lie heavy on one’s conscience that is responsible for the lack of
awareness—as well as, of course, the comforting thought that, after all,
the victims of whatever it is that goes on in those places are not
members of one’s own group.

The thought that we can rely on the animal welfare societies to see that
animals are not cruelly treated is a reassuring one. Most countries now
have at least one large, well-established animal protection society; in
the United States there are the American Society for the Prevention of
Cruelty to Animals, the American Humane Association, and the Humane
Society of the United States; in Britain the Royal Society for the
Prevention of Cruelty to Animals remains unchallenged as the largest
group. It is reasonable to ask: Why have these associations not been
able to prevent the clear cruelties described in Chapters 2 and 3 of
this book?

There are several reasons for the failure of the animal welfare
establishment to take action against the most important kinds of
cruelty. One is historical. When first founded, the RSPCA and ASPCA were
radical groups, far ahead of the public opinion of their times, and
opposed to all forms of cruelty to animals, including cruelty to farm
animals, who then, as now, were the victims of many of the worst abuses.
Gradually, however, as these organizations grew in wealth, membership,
and respectability, they lost their radical commitment and became part
of the “establishment.” They built up close contacts with members of the
government, and with businessmen and scientists. They tried to use these
contacts to improve the conditions of animals, and some minor
improvements resulted; but at the same time contacts with those whose
basic interests are in the use of animals for food or research purposes
blunted the radical criticism of the exploitation of animals that had
inspired the founders. Again and again the societies compromised their
fundamental principles for the sake of trivial reforms. Better some
progress now than nothing at all, they said; but often the reforms
proved ineffective in improving the conditions of the animals, and
functioned rather to reassure the public that nothing further needed to
be done.⁶

As their wealth increased, another consideration became important. The
animal welfare societies had been set up as registered charities. This
status brought them substantial tax savings; but it is a condition of
being registered as a charity, in both Great Britain and the United
States, that the charitable organization does not engage in political
activities. Political action, unfortunately, is sometimes the only way
to improve the conditions of animals (especially if an organization is
too cautious to call for public boycotts of animal products), but most
of the large groups kept well clear of anything that might endanger
their charitable status. This has led them to emphasize safe activities
like collecting stray dogs and prosecuting individual acts of wanton
cruelty, instead of broad campaigns against systematic cruelty.

Finally, at some point during the last hundred years the major animal
welfare societies lost interest in farm animals. Perhaps this was
because the supporters and officials of the societies came from the
cities and knew more and cared more about dogs and cats than about pigs
and calves. Whatever the reason, for most of the present century, the
literature and publicity of the old established groups made a
significant contribution to the prevailing attitude that dogs and cats
and wild animals need protection, but other animals do not. Thus people
came to think of “animal welfare” as something for kindly ladies who are
dotty about cats, and not as a cause founded on basic principles of
justice and morality.

The last decade has seen a change. First, dozens of new, more radical
Animal Liberation and animal rights groups have sprung up. Together with
some previously existing organizations that had been able to make
relatively little impact until then, these new groups have greatly
increased public awareness of the immense, systematic cruelty that takes
place in intensive animal production, in laboratories, and in circuses,
zoos, and hunting. Secondly, perhaps in response to this new wave of
interest in the conditions of animals, more established groups such as
the RSPCA in Britain and, in America, the ASPCA and Humane Society of
the United States, have taken a much more forceful stand against cruelty
to farm and laboratory animals, even calling for boycotts of products
like intensively produced veal, bacon, and eggs.⁷

Among the factors that make it difficult to arouse public concern about
animals perhaps the hardest to overcome is the assumption that “human
beings come first” and that any problem about animals cannot be
comparable, as a serious moral or political issue, to problems about
humans. A number of things can be said about this assumption. First, it
is in itself an indication of speciesism. How can anyone who has not
made a thorough study of the topic possibly know that the problem is
less serious than problems of human suffering? One can claim to know
this only if one assumes that animals really do not matter, and that
however much they suffer, their suffering is less important than the
suffering of humans. But pain is pain, and the importance of preventing
unnecessary pain and suffering does not diminish because the being that
suffers is not a member of our species. What would we think of someone
who said that “whites come first” and that therefore poverty in Africa
does not pose as serious a problem as poverty in Europe?

It is true that many problems in the world deserve our time and energy.
Famine and poverty, racism, war and the threat of nuclear annihilation,
sexism, unemployment, preservation of our fragile environment—all are
major issues, and who can say which is the most important? Yet once we
put aside speciesist biases we can see that the oppression of nonhumans
by humans ranks somewhere along with these issues. The suffering that we
inflict on nonhuman beings can be extreme, and the numbers involved are
gigantic: more than 100 million pigs, cattle, and sheep go through the
processes described in Chapter 3 each year, in the United States alone;
billions of chickens do the same; and at least 25 million animals are
experimented upon annually. If a thousand human beings were forced to
undergo the kind of tests that animals undergo to test the toxicity of
household products, there would be a national uproar. The use of
millions of animals for this purpose should cause at least as much
concern, especially since this suffering is so unnecessary and could
easily be stopped if we wanted to stop it. Most reasonable people want
to prevent war, racial inequality, poverty, and unemployment; the
problem is that we have been trying to prevent these things for years,
and now we have to admit that, for the most part, we don’t really know
how to do it. By comparison, the reduction of the suffering of nonhuman
animals at the hands of humans will be relatively easy, once human
beings set themselves to do it.

In any case, the idea that “humans come first” is more often used as an
excuse for not doing anything about either human or nonhuman animals
than as a genuine choice between incompatible alternatives. For the
truth is that there is no incompatibility here. Granted, everyone has a
limited amount of time and energy, and time taken in active work for one
cause reduces the time available for another cause; but there is nothing
to stop those who devote their time and energy to human problems from
joining the boycott of the products of agribusiness cruelty. It takes no
more time to be a vegetarian than to eat animal flesh. In fact, as we
saw in Chapter 4, those who claim to care about the well-being of human
beings and the preservation of our environment should become vegetarians
for that reason alone. They would thereby increase the amount of grain
available to feed people elsewhere, reduce pollution, save water and
energy, and cease contributing to the clearing of forests; moreover,
since a vegetarian diet is cheaper than one based on meat dishes, they
would have more money available to devote to famine relief, population
control, or whatever social or political cause they thought most urgent.
I would not question the sincerity of vegetarians who take little
interest in Animal Liberation because they give priority to other
causes; but when nonvegetarians say that “human problems come first” I
cannot help wondering what exactly it is that they are doing for human
beings that compels them to continue to support the wasteful, ruthless
exploitation of farm animals.

At this point a historical digression is appropriate. It is often said,
as a kind of corollary of the idea that “humans come first,” that people
in the animal welfare movement care more about animals than they do
about human beings. No doubt this is true of some people. Historically,
though, the leaders of the animal welfare movement have cared far more
about human beings than have other humans who cared nothing for animals.
Indeed, the overlap between leaders of movements against the oppression
of blacks and women, and leaders of movements against cruelty to
animals, is extensive; so extensive as to provide an unexpected form of
confirmation of the parallel between racism, sexism, and speciesism.
Among the handful of founders of the RSPCA, for example, were William
Wilberforce and Fowell Buxton, two of the leaders in the fight against
Negro slavery in the British Empire.⁸ As for early feminists, Mary
Wollstonecraft wrote, in addition to her _Vindication of the Rights of
Woman_, a collection of children’s stories entitled _Original Stories_,
expressly designed to encourage kinder practices toward animals;⁹ and a
number of the early American feminists, including Lucy Stone, Amelia
Bloomer, Susan B. Anthony, and Elizabeth Cady Stanton, were connected
with the vegetarian movement. Together with Horace Greeley, the
reforming, antislavery editor of _The Tribune_, they would meet to toast
“Women’s Rights and Vegetarianism.”¹⁰

To the animal welfare movement, too, must go the credit for starting the
fight against cruelty to children. In 1874 Henry Bergh, the pioneer of
the American animal welfare societies, was asked to do something about a
little animal who had been cruelly beaten. The little animal turned out
to be a human child; nevertheless Bergh successfully prosecuted the
child’s custodian for cruelty to an animal, under a New York animal
protection statute that he had drafted and bullied the legislature into
passing. Further cases were then brought, and the New York Society for
the Prevention of Cruelty to Children was set up. When the news reached
Britain, the RSPCA set up a British counterpart—the National Society for
the Prevention of Cruelty to Children.¹¹ Lord Shaftesbury was one of the
founders of this group. As a leading social reformer, author of the
Factory Acts that put an end to child labor and fourteen-hour work days,
and a notable campaigner against uncontrolled experimentation and other
forms of cruelty to animals, Shaftesbury, like many other humanitarians,
clearly refutes the idea that those who care about nonhumans do not care
about humans, or that working for one cause makes it impossible to work
for the other.

Our conceptions of the nature of nonhuman animals, and faulty reasoning
about the implications that follow from our conception of nature, also
help to buttress our speciesist attitudes. We have always liked to think
ourselves less savage than the other animals. To say that people are
“humane” is to say that they are kind; to say that they are “beastly,”
“brutal,” or simply that they behave “like animals” is to suggest that
they are cruel and nasty. We rarely stop to consider that the animal who
kills with the least reason to do so is the human animal. We think of
lions and wolves as savage because they kill; but they must kill, or
starve. Humans kill other animals for sport, to satisfy their curiosity,
to beautify their bodies, and to please their palates. Human beings also
kill members of their own species for greed or power. Moreover, human
beings are not content with mere killing. Throughout history they have
shown a tendency to torment and torture both their fellow human beings
and their fellow animals before putting them to death. No other animal
shows much interest in doing this.

While we overlook our own savagery, we exaggerate that of other animals.
The notorious wolf for instance, villain of so many folk tales, has been
shown by the careful investigations of zoologists in the wild to be a
highly social animal, a faithful and affectionate spouse—not just for a
season, but for life—a devoted parent, and a loyal member of the pack.
Wolves almost never kill anything except to eat it. If males should
fight among themselves, the fight ends with a gesture of submission in
which the loser offers to his conqueror the underside of his neck—the
most vulnerable part of his body. With his fangs only an inch away from
the jugular vein of his foe, the victor will be content with submission,
and, unlike a human conqueror, does not kill the vanquished opponent.¹²

In keeping with our picture of the world of animals as a bloody scene of
combat, we ignore the extent to which other species exhibit a complex
social life, recognizing and relating to other members of their species
as individuals. When human beings marry, we attribute their closeness to
each other to love, and we feel keenly for a human being who has lost
his or her spouse. When other animals pair for life, we say that it is
just instinct that makes them do so, and if a hunter or trapper kills or
captures an animal for research or for a zoo, we do not consider that
the animal might have a spouse who will suffer from the sudden absence
of the dead or captured animal. In a similar way we know that to part a
human mother from her child is tragic for both; but neither farmers nor
breeders of companion animals and research animals give any thought to
the feelings of the nonhuman mothers and children whom they routinely
separate as part of their business.¹³

Curiously, while people often dismiss complex aspects of animal behavior
as “mere instinct,” and therefore not worthy of comparison with the
apparently similar behavior of human beings, these same people will also
ignore or overlook the importance of simple instinctive patterns of
behavior when it is convenient for them to do so. Thus it is often said
of laying hens, veal calves, and dogs kept in cages for experimental
purposes that this does not cause them to suffer since they have never
known other conditions. We saw in Chapter 3 that this is a fallacy.
Animals feel a need to exercise, stretch their limbs or wings, groom
themselves, and turn around, whether or not they have ever lived in
conditions that permit this. Herd or flock animals are disturbed when
they are isolated from others of their species, though they may never
have known other conditions, and too large a herd or flock can have the
same effect through the inability of the individual animal to recognize
other individuals. These stresses reveal themselves in “vices” like
cannibalism.

Widespread ignorance of the nature of nonhuman animals allows those who
treat animals in this manner to brush off criticism by saying that,
after all, “they’re not human.” Indeed, they are not; but neither are
they machines for converting fodder into flesh, or tools for research.
Considering how far the knowledge of the general public lags behind the
most recent findings of zoologists and ethologists who have spent months
and sometimes years observing animals with notebook and camera, the
dangers of sentimental anthropomorphism are less serious than the
opposite danger of the convenient and self-serving idea that animals are
lumps of clay whom we can mold in whatever manner we please.

The nature of nonhuman animals serves as a basis for other attempts to
justify our treatment of them. It is often said, as an objection to
vegetarianism, that since other animals kill for food, we may do so too.
This analogy was already old in 1785, when William Paley refuted it by
reference to the fact that while human beings can live without killing,
other animals have no choice but to kill if they are to survive.¹⁴ This
is certainly true in most cases; a few exceptions may be found—animals
who could survive without meat, but eat it occasionally (chimpanzees,
for example)—but they are scarcely the species we usually find on our
dinner tables. In any case, even if other animals who could live on a
vegetarian diet do sometimes kill for food, this would provide no
support for the claim that it is morally defensible for us to do the
same. It is odd how humans, who normally consider themselves so far
above other animals, will, if it seems to support their dietary
preferences, use an argument that implies that we ought to look to other
animals for moral inspiration and guidance. The point, of course, is
that nonhuman animals are not capable of considering the alternatives,
or of reflecting morally on the rights and wrongs of killing for food;
they just do it. We may regret that this is the way the world is, but it
makes no sense to hold nonhuman animals morally responsible or culpable
for what they do. Every reader of this book, on the other hand, is
capable of making a moral choice on this matter. We cannot evade our
responsibility for our choice by imitating the actions of beings who are
incapable of making this kind of choice.

(Now, someone is sure to say, I have admitted that there is a
significant difference between humans and other animals, and thus I have
revealed the flaw in my case for the equality of all animals. Anyone to
whom this criticism has occurred should read Chapter 1 more carefully.
You will then find that you have misunderstood the nature of the case
for equality I made there. I have never made the absurd claim that there
are no significant differences between normal adult humans and other
animals. My point is not that animals are capable of acting morally, but
that the moral principle of equal consideration of interests applies to
them as it applies to humans. That it is often right to include within
the sphere of equal consideration beings who are not themselves capable
of making moral choices is implied by our treatment of young children
and other humans who, for one reason or another, do not have the mental
capacity to understand the nature of moral choice. As Bentham might have
said, the point is not whether they can choose, but whether they can
suffer.)

Perhaps the claim is a different one. As we saw in the previous chapter,
Lord Chesterfield used the fact that animals eat other animals as a way
of arguing that to do so is part of “the general order of nature.”¹⁵ He
did not indicate why we should imagine that our nature is more like that
of the carnivorous tiger than the vegetarian gorilla, or the virtually
vegetarian chimpanzee. But quite apart from this objection, we should be
wary of appeals to “nature” in ethical argument. Nature may often “know
best,” but we must use our own judgment in deciding when to follow
nature. For all I know, war is “natural” to human beings—it certainly
seems to have been a preoccupation for many societies, in very different
circumstances, over a long period of history—but I have no intention of
going to war to make sure that I act in accordance with nature. We have
the capacity to reason about what it is best to do. We should use this
capacity (and if you are really keen on appeals to “nature,” you can say
that it is natural for us to do so).

It must be admitted that the existence of carnivorous animals does pose
one problem for the ethics of Animal Liberation, and that is whether we
should do anything about it. Assuming that human beings could eliminate
carnivorous species from the earth, and that the total amount of
suffering among animals in the world would thereby be reduced, should we
do it?

The short and simple answer is that once we give up our claim to
“dominion” over the other species we should stop interfering with them
at all. We should leave them alone as much as we possibly can. Having
given up the role of tyrant, we should not try to play God either.

Though it contains part of the truth, this answer is too short and
simple. Like it or not, human beings do know more than other animals
about what may happen in the future, and this knowledge may put us in a
situation in which it would be callous not to interfere. In October
1988, television viewers throughout the world applauded the success of
American and Russian efforts to release two California gray whales
trapped in the Alaskan ice. Some critics noticed the irony in making
such extensive efforts to save two whales, while about two thousand
whales are still being killed by human hunters each year, not to mention
the estimated 125,000 dolphins who drown annually in the nets of the
tuna industry.¹⁶ Nevertheless, it would be a callous person who could
assert that the rescue was a bad thing.

So it is conceivable that human interference will improve the conditions
of animals, and so be justifiable. But when we consider a scheme like
the elimination of carnivorous species, we are considering an entirely
different matter. Judging by our past record, any attempt to change
ecological systems on a large scale is going to do far more harm than
good. For that reason, if for no other, it is true to say that, except
in a few very limited cases, we cannot and should not try to police all
of nature. We do enough if we eliminate our own unnecessary killing and
cruelty toward other animals.¹⁷

Yet another purported justification of our treatment of animals relies
on the fact that in their natural state some animals kill other animals.
People often say that, bad as modern farm conditions are, they are no
worse than conditions in the wild, where animals are exposed to cold,
hunger, and predators; and the implication is that therefore we should
not object to modern farm conditions.

Interestingly, defenders of slavery imposed on black Africans often made
a similar point. One of them wrote:

On the whole, since it is evident beyond all controversy that the
removal of the Africans, from the state of brutality, wretchedness and
misery, in which they are at home so deeply involved, to this land of
light, humanity and Christian knowledge, is to them so great a blessing;
however faulty any individuals may have been in point of unnecessary
cruelty, practised in this business; that, whether the general state of
subordination here, which is a necessary consequence of their removal,
be agreeable to the law of nature, can by no means longer remain a
question.¹⁸

Now it is difficult to compare two sets of conditions as diverse as
those in the wild and those on a factory farm (or those of free Africans
and slaves on a plantation); but if the comparison has to be made surely
the life of freedom is to be preferred. Factory farm animals cannot
walk, run, stretch freely, or be part of a family or herd. True, many
wild animals die from adverse conditions or are killed by predators; but
animals kept in farms do not live for more than a fraction of their
normal life span either. The steady supply of food on a farm is not an
unmitigated blessing, since it deprives animals of their most basic
natural activity, the search for food. The result is a life of utter
boredom, with nothing at all to do but lie in a stall and eat.

In any case, the comparison between factory farm conditions and natural
conditions is really irrelevant to the justifiability of factory farms,
since this is not the choice that we face. Abolishing factory farms
would not mean returning the animals inside them to the wild. Animals in
factory farms today were bred by human beings to be raised in these
farms and sold for food. If the boycott of factory farm produce
advocated in this book is effective, it will reduce the amount of
factory farm products that are bought. This does not mean that overnight
we will go from the present situation to one in which no one buys these
products. (I am optimistic about Animal Liberation, but not totally
deluded.) The reduction will be gradual. It will make animal raising
less profitable. Farmers will turn to other types of farming, and the
giant corporations will invest their capital elsewhere. The result will
be that fewer animals will be bred. The number of animals in factory
farms will decline because those killed will not be replaced, and not
because animals are being sent “back” to the wild. Eventually, perhaps
(and now I am allowing my optimism free rein), the only herds of cattle
and pigs to be found will be on large reservations, rather like our
wildlife refuges. The choice, therefore, is not between life on a
factory farm and life in the wild, but whether animals destined to live
on factory farms and then killed for food should be born at all.

At this point a further objection may be raised. Noting that if we were
all vegetarians there would be far fewer pigs, cattle, chickens, and
sheep, a few meat-eaters have claimed that they are actually doing the
animals they eat a favor, since but for their desire to eat meat, those
animals would never have come into existence at all!¹⁹

In the first edition of this book, I rejected this view on the grounds
that it requires us to think that bringing a being into existence
confers a benefit on that being—and to hold this, we must believe that
it is possible to benefit a nonexistent being. This, I thought, was
nonsense. But now I am not so sure. (My unequivocal rejection of this
view is, in fact, the only philosophical point made in the earlier
edition on which I have changed my mind.) After all, most of us would
agree that it would be wrong to bring a child into the world if we knew,
before the child was conceived, that it would have a genetic defect that
would make its life brief and miserable. To conceive such a child is to
cause it harm. So can we really deny that to bring into the world a
being who will have a pleasant life is to confer on that being a
benefit? To deny this, we would need to explain why the two cases are
different, and I cannot find a satisfactory way of doing that.²⁰

The argument we are now considering raises the issue of the wrongness of
killing—an issue which, because it is so much more complicated than the
wrongness of inflicting suffering, I have kept in the background up to
this point. Our brief discussion near the close of the first chapter,
however, was enough to show that for a being capable of having desires
for the future there may be something particularly bad about being
killed, something that is not equaled by the creation of another being.
The real difficulty arises when we consider beings not capable of having
desires for the future—beings who can be thought of as living moment by
moment rather than having a continuous mental existence. Granted, even
here, killing still seems repugnant. An animal may struggle against a
threat to its life, even if it cannot grasp that it has “a life” in the
sense that requires an understanding of what it is to exist over a
period of time. But in the absence of some form of mental continuity it
is not easy to explain why the loss to the animal killed is not, from an
impartial point of view, made good by the creation of a new animal who
will lead an equally pleasant life.²¹

I still have doubts about this issue. The proposition that the creation
of one being should somehow compensate for the death of another does
have an air of peculiarity. Of course, if we had a clear basis for
saying that all sentient creatures have a right to life (even those not
capable of having desires about the future) then it would be easy to say
why killing a sentient creature is a kind of wrong that cannot be made
good by creating a new creature. But such a position has its own deep
philosophical and practical difficulties, as I and others have indicated
elsewhere.²²

On a purely practical level, one can say this: killing animals for food
(except when necessary for sheer survival) makes us think of them as
objects we can use casually for our own nonessential purposes. Given
what we know about human nature, as long as we continue to think of
animals in this way we will not succeed in changing the attitudes that,
when put into practice by ordinary human beings, lead to disrespect—and
hence mistreatment—for the animals. So it might be best to make it a
simple general principle to avoid killing animals for food except when
it is necessary for survival.

This argument against killing for food relies on a prediction about the
consequences of holding an attitude. It is impossible to prove the
prediction correct; that is something on which we can only make a
judgment on the basis of our knowledge of our fellow human beings. If
this prediction is not persuasive, though, the argument we are
considering still remains very limited in its application. It certainly
does not justify eating meat from factory-produced animals, for they
suffer lives of boredom and deprivation, unable to satisfy their basic
needs to turn around, groom, stretch, exercise, or take part in the
social interactions normal for their species. To bring them into
existence for a life of that kind is no benefit to them, but rather a
great harm. At the most, the argument from the benefit of bringing a
being into existence could justify continuing to eat free-range animals
(of a species incapable of having desires for the future), who have a
pleasant existence in a social group suited to their behavioral needs,
and are then killed quickly and without pain. I can respect
conscientious people who take care to eat only meat that comes from such
animals—but I suspect that unless they live on a farm where they can
look after their own animals, they will, in practice, be very nearly
vegetarian anyway.²³

One final point on the argument that the loss of an animal is
compensated for by the creation of a new one. Those who use this
ingenious defense of their desire to eat pork or beef rarely follow out
its implications. If it were good to bring beings into existence then
presumably, other things being equal, we ought to bring as many humans
as possible into existence too; and if to this we add the view that
human lives are more important than the lives of animals—a view the
flesh-eater seems sure to accept—then the argument may be turned on its
head, to the discomfort of its original proponent. Since more humans may
be fed if we do not feed our grain to livestock, the upshot of the
argument is, after all, that we ought to become vegetarians!

Speciesism is so pervasive and widespread an attitude that those who
attack one or two of its manifestations—like the slaughter of wild
animals by hunters, or cruel experimentation, or bullfighting—often
participate in other speciesist practices themselves. This allows those
attacked to accuse their opponents of inconsistency. “You say we are
cruel because we shoot deer,” the hunters say, “but you eat meat. What
is the difference, except that you pay someone else to do the killing
for you?” “You object to killing animals to clothe ourselves in their
skins,” say the furriers, “but you are wearing leather shoes.” The
experimenters plausibly ask why, if people accept the killing of animals
to please their palates, they should object to the killing of animals to
advance knowledge; and if the objection is just to suffering, they can
point out that animals killed for food do not live without suffering
either. Even the bullfight enthusiast can argue that the death of the
bull in the ring gives pleasure to thousands of spectators, while the
death of the steer in a slaughterhouse gives pleasure only to the few
people who eat some part of it; and while in the end the bull may suffer
more acute pain than the steer, for most of his life it is the bull who
is better treated.

The charge of inconsistency really gives no logical support to the
defenders of cruel practices. As Brigid Brophy has put it, it remains
true that it is cruel to break people’s legs, even if the statement is
made by someone in the habit of breaking people’s arms.²⁴ Yet people
whose conduct is inconsistent with their professed beliefs will find it
difficult to persuade others that their beliefs are right; and they will
find it even more difficult to persuade others to act on those beliefs.
Of course, it is always possible to find some reason for distinguishing
between, say, wearing furs and wearing leather: many fur-bearing animals
die only after hours or even days spent with a leg caught in a
steel-toothed trap, while the animals from whose skins leather is made
are spared this agony.²⁵ There is a tendency, however, for these fine
distinctions to blunt the force of the original criticism; and in some
cases I do not think distinctions can validly be drawn at all. Why, for
instance, is the hunter who shoots a deer for venison subject to more
criticism than the person who buys a ham at the supermarket? Overall, it
is probably the intensively reared pig who has suffered more.

The first chapter of this book sets out a clear ethical principle—of
equal consideration of the interests of all animals—by which we can
determine which of our practices affecting nonhuman animals are
justifiable and which are not. By applying this principle to our own
lives we can make our actions fully consistent. Thus we can deny to
those who ignore the interests of animals the opportunity to charge us
with inconsistency.

For all practical purposes as far as urban and suburban inhabitants of
the industrialized nations are concerned, following the principle of
equal consideration of interests requires us to be vegetarians. This is
the most important step, and the one to which I have given most
attention; but we should also, to be consistent, stop using other animal
products for which animals have been killed or made to suffer. We should
not wear furs. We should not buy leather products either, since the sale
of hides for leather plays a significant role in the profitability of
the meat industry.

For the pioneer vegetarians of the nineteenth century, giving up leather
meant a real sacrifice, since shoes and boots made of other materials
were scarce. Lewis Gompertz, the second secretary of the RSPCA and a
strict vegetarian who refused to ride in horse-drawn vehicles, suggested
that animals should be reared in pastures and allowed to grow old and
die a natural death, after which their skins would be used for
leather.²⁶ The idea is a tribute to Gompertz’s humanity rather than his
economics, but today the economics are on the other foot. Shoes and
boots made of synthetic materials are now available in many cheaper
stores, at prices considerably lower than those for leather shoes; and
sneakers made of canvas and rubber are now the standard footwear for
American youth. Belts, bags, and other goods once made of leather are
now easily found in other materials.

Other problems that used to daunt the most advanced opponents of the
exploitation of animals have also disappeared. Candles, once made only
of tallow, are no longer indispensable, and can, for those who still
want them, be obtained in nonanimal materials. Soaps made from vegetable
oils rather than animal fats are obtainable from health food stores. We
can do without wool, and although sheep generally roam freely, there is
a strong case for doing so in view of the many cruelties to which these
gentle animals are subjected.²⁷ Cosmetics and perfumes, often made from
wild animals like the musk deer and the Ethiopian civet cat, are hardly
essential items anyway, but those who wish to wear them can obtain
cruelty-free cosmetics, which do not contain animal products and have
not been tested on animals either, from a number of shops and
organizations.²⁸

Although I mention these alternatives to animal products to show that it
is not difficult to refuse to participate in the major kinds of
exploitation of animals, I do not believe that consistency is the same
as, or implies, a rigid insistence on standards of absolute purity in
all that one consumes or wears. The point of altering one’s buying
habits is not to keep oneself untouched by evil, but to reduce the
economic support for the exploitation of animals, and to persuade others
to do the same. So it is not a sin to continue to wear leather shoes you
bought before you began to think about Animal Liberation. When your
leather shoes wear out, buy nonleather ones; but you will not reduce the
profitability of killing animals by throwing out your present ones. With
diet, too, it is more important to remember the major aims than to worry
about such details as whether the cake you are offered at a party was
made with a factory farm egg.

We are still a long way from the point at which it is possible to put
pressure on restaurants and food manufacturers to eliminate animal
products altogether. That point will come when a significant section of
the population is boycotting meat and other factory farm products. Until
then consistency demands only that we do not contribute significantly to
the demand for animal products. Thus we can demonstrate that we have no
need of animal products. We are more likely to persuade others to share
our attitude if we temper our ideals with common sense than if we strive
for the kind of purity that is more appropriate to a religious dietary
law than to an ethical and political movement.

Usually it is not too difficult to be consistent in one’s attitudes to
animals. We do not have to sacrifice anything essential, because in our
normal life there is no serious clash of interests between human and
nonhuman animals. It must be admitted, though, that it is possible to
think of more unusual cases in which there is a genuine clash of
interests. For instance, we need to grow crops of vegetables and grain
to feed ourselves; but these crops may be threatened by rabbits, mice,
or other “pests.” Here we have a clear conflict of interest between
humans and nonhumans. What would be done about it, if we were to act in
accordance with the principle of equal consideration of interests?

First let us note what is done about this situation now. The farmer will
seek to kill off the “pests” by the cheapest method available. This is
likely to be poison. The animals will eat poisoned baits, and die a
slow, painful death. No consideration at all is given to the interests
of the “pests”—the very word “pest” seems to exclude any concern for the
animals themselves.²⁹ But the classification “pest” is our own, and a
rabbit that is a pest is as capable of suffering, and as deserving of
consideration, as a white rabbit who is a beloved companion animal. The
problem is how to defend our own essential food supplies while
respecting the interests of these animals to the greatest extent
possible. It should not be beyond our technological abilities to find a
solution to this problem which, if not totally satisfactory to all
concerned, at least causes far less suffering than the present
“solution.” The use of baits that cause sterility, instead of a
lingering death, would be an obvious improvement.

When we have to defend our food supplies against rabbits, or our houses
and our health against mice and rats, it is as natural for us to lash
out violently at the animals that invade our property as it is for the
animals themselves to seek food where they can find it. At the present
stage of our attitudes to animals, it would be absurd to expect people
to change their conduct in this respect. Perhaps in time, however, when
more major abuses have been remedied, and attitudes to animals have
changed, people will come to see that even animals who are in some sense
“threatening” our welfare do not deserve the cruel deaths we inflict
upon them; and so we may eventually develop more humane methods of
limiting the numbers of those animals whose interests are genuinely
incompatible with our own.

A similar reply may be given to those hunters and controllers of what
are misleadingly called “wildlife refuges” who claim that to prevent
overpopulation by deer, seals, or whatever the animal in question may
be, hunters must periodically be allowed to “harvest” the excess
population—this allegedly being in the interests of the animals
themselves. The use of the term “harvest”—often found in the
publications of the hunters’ organizations—gives the lie to the claim
that this slaughter is motivated by concern for the animals. The term
indicates that the hunter thinks of deer or seals as if they were corn
or coal, objects of value only in so far as they serve human interests.
This attitude, which is shared to a large extent by the U.S. Fish and
Wildlife Service, overlooks the vital fact that deer and other hunted
animals are capable of feeling pleasure and pain. They are therefore not
means to our ends, but beings with interests of their own. If it is true
that in special circumstances their population grows to such an extent
that they damage their own environment and the prospects of their own
survival, or that of other animals who share their habitat, then it may
be right for humans to take some supervisory action; but obviously if we
consider the interests of the animals, this action will not be to allow
hunters to kill some animals, inevitably wounding others in the process,
but rather to reduce the fertility of the animals. If we made an effort
to develop more humane methods of population control for wild animals in
reserves, it would not be difficult to come up with something better
than what is done now. The trouble is that the authorities responsible
for wildlife have a “harvest” mentality, and are not interested in
finding techniques of population control that would reduce the number of
animals to be “harvested” by hunters.³⁰

I have said that the difference between animals like deer—or pigs and
chickens, for that matter—whom we ought not to think of “harvesting,”
and crops like corn, which we may harvest, is that the animals are
capable of feeling pleasure and pain, while the plants are not. At this
point someone is bound to ask: “How do we know that plants do not
suffer?”

This objection may arise from a genuine concern for plants; but more
often those raising it do not seriously contemplate extending
consideration to plants if it should be shown that they suffer; instead
they hope to show that if we were to act on the principle I have
advocated we would have to stop eating plants as well as animals, and so
would starve to death. The conclusion they draw is that if it is
impossible to live without violating the principle of equal
consideration, we need not bother about it at all, but may go on as we
have always done, eating plants and animals.

The objection is weak in both fact and logic. There is no reliable
evidence that plants are capable of feeling pleasure or pain. Some years
ago a popular book, _The Secret Life of Plants_, claimed that plants
have all sorts of remarkable abilities, including the ability to read
people’s minds. The most striking experiments cited in the book were not
carried out at serious research institutions, and attempts by
researchers in major universities to repeat the experiments have failed
to obtain any positive results. The book’s claims have now been
completely discredited.³¹

In the first chapter of this book I gave three distinct grounds for
believing that nonhuman animals can feel pain: behavior, the nature of
their nervous systems, and the evolutionary usefulness of pain. None of
these gives us any reason to believe that plants feel pain. In the
absence of scientifically credible experimental findings, there is no
observable behavior that suggests pain; nothing resembling a central
nervous system has been found in plants; and it is difficult to imagine
why species that are incapable of moving away from a source of pain or
using the perception of pain to avoid death in any other way should have
evolved the capacity to feel pain. Therefore the belief that plants feel
pain appears to be quite unjustified.

So much for the factual basis of this objection. Now let us consider its
logic. Assume that, improbable as it seems, researchers do turn up
evidence suggesting that plants feel pain. It would still not follow
that we may as well eat what we have always eaten. If we must inflict
pain or starve, we would then have to choose the lesser evil. Presumably
it would still be true that plants suffer less than animals, and
therefore it would still be better to eat plants than to eat animals.
Indeed this conclusion would follow even if plants were as sensitive as
animals, since the inefficiency of meat production means that those who
eat meat are responsible for the indirect destruction of at least ten
times as many plants as are vegetarians! At this point, I admit, the
argument becomes farcical, and I have pursued it this far only to show
that those who raise this objection but fail to follow out its
implications are really just looking for an excuse to go on eating meat.

Up to this point we have been examining, in this chapter, attitudes that
are shared by many people in Western societies, and the strategies and
arguments that are commonly used to defend these attitudes. We have seen
that from a logical point of view these strategies and arguments are
very weak. They are rationalizations and excuses rather than arguments.
It might be thought, however, that their weakness is due to some lack of
expert knowledge that ordinary people have in discussing ethical
questions. For that reason, in the first edition of this book I examined
what some of the leading philosophers of the 1960s and early 1970s had
said about the moral status of nonhuman animals. The results were not to
the credit of philosophy.

Philosophy ought to question the basic assumptions of the age. Thinking
through, critically and carefully, what most of us take for granted is,
I believe, the chief task of philosophy, and the task that makes
philosophy a worthwhile activity. Regrettably, philosophy does not
always live up to its historic role. Aristotle’s defense of slavery will
always stand as a reminder that philosophers are human beings and are
subject to all the preconceptions of the society to which they belong.
Sometimes they succeed in breaking free of the prevailing ideology; more
often they become its most sophisticated defenders.

So it was with the philosophers of the period just before the first
edition of this book appeared. They did not challenge anyone’s
preconceptions about our relations with other species. By their
writings, most philosophers who tackled problems that touched upon the
issue revealed that they made the same unquestioned assumptions as most
other human beings, and what they said tended to confirm readers in
their comfortable speciesist habits.

At that time, discussions of equality and rights in moral and political
philosophy were almost always formulated as problems of human equality
and human rights. The effect of this was that the issue of the equality
of animals never confronted philosophers or their students as an issue
in itself—already an indication of the failure of philosophy up to that
time to probe accepted beliefs. Yet philosophers found it difficult to
discuss the issue of human equality without raising questions about the
status of nonhumans. The reason for this—which may already be apparent
from the first chapter of this book—has to do with the way in which the
principle of equality must be interpreted and defended, if it is to be
defended at all.

For philosophers of the 1950s and 1960s, the problem was to interpret
the idea that all human beings are equal in a manner that does not make
it plainly false. In most ways, human beings are not equal; and if we
seek some characteristic that all of them possess, then this
characteristic must be a kind of lowest common denominator, pitched so
low that no human being lacks it. The catch is that any such
characteristic that is possessed by all human beings will not be
possessed only by human beings. For example, all human beings, but not
only human beings, are capable of feeling pain; and while only human
beings are capable of solving complex mathematical problems, not all
humans can do this. So it turns out that in the only sense in which we
can truly say, as an assertion of fact, that all humans are equal, at
least some members of other species are also “equal”—equal, that is, to
some humans.

If, on the other hand, we decide that, as I argued in Chapter 1, these
characteristics are really irrelevant to the problem of equality, and
equality must be based on the moral principle of equal consideration of
interests rather than on the possession of some characteristic, it is
even more difficult to find some basis for excluding animals from the
sphere of equality.

This result is not what the egalitarian philosophers of that period
originally intended to assert. Instead of accepting the outcome to which
their own reasonings naturally pointed, however, they tried to reconcile
their beliefs in human equality and animal inequality by arguments that
are either devious or myopic. For instance, one philosopher prominent in
philosophical discussions of equality at the time was Richard
Wasserstrom, then professor of philosophy and law at the University of
California, Los Angeles. In his article “Rights, Human Rights and Racial
Discrimination,” Wasserstrom defined “human rights” as those rights that
human beings have and nonhumans do not have. He then argued that there
are human rights to well-being and to freedom. In defending the idea of
a human right to well-being, Wasserstrom said that to deny someone
relief from acute physical pain makes it impossible for that person to
live a full or satisfying life. He then went on: “In a real sense, the
enjoyment of these goods differentiates human from nonhuman entities.”³²
The problem is that when we look back to find to what the expression
“these goods” refers, the only example given is relief from acute
physical pain—something that nonhumans may appreciate as well as humans.
So if human beings have a right to relief from acute physical pain, it
would not be a specifically human right, in the sense Wasserstrom had
defined. Animals would have it too.

Faced with a situation in which they saw a need for some basis for the
moral gulf that is still commonly thought to separate human beings and
animals, but unable to find any concrete difference between human beings
and animals that would do this without undermining the equality of human
beings, philosophers tended to waffle. They resorted to high-sounding
phrases like “the intrinsic dignity of the human individual.”³³ They
talked of “the intrinsic worth of all men” (sexism was as little
questioned as speciesism) as if all men (humans?) had some unspecified
worth that other beings do not have.³⁴ Or they would say that human
beings, and only human beings, are “ends in themselves” while
“everything other than a person can only have value for a person.”³⁵

As we saw in the preceding chapter, the idea of a distinctive human
dignity and worth has a long history. In the present century, until the
1970s, philosophers had cast off the original metaphysical and religious
shackles of this idea, and freely invoked it without feeling any need to
justify the idea at all. Why should we not attribute “intrinsic dignity”
or “intrinsic worth” to ourselves? Why should we not say that we are the
only things in the universe that have intrinsic value? Our fellow human
beings are unlikely to reject the accolades we so generously bestow upon
them, and those to whom we deny the honor are unable to object. Indeed,
when we think only of human beings it can be very liberal, very
progressive, to talk of the dignity of all of them. In so doing we
implicitly condemn slavery, racism, and other violations of human
rights. We admit that we ourselves are in some fundamental sense on a
par with the poorest, most ignorant members of our own species. It is
only when we think of human beings as no more than a small subgroup of
all the beings that inhabit our planet that we may realize that in
elevating our own species we are at the same time lowering the relative
status of all other species.

The truth is that the appeal to the intrinsic dignity of human beings
appears to solve the egalitarian philosopher’s problems only as long as
it goes unchallenged. Once we ask why it should be that all human
beings—including infants, the intellectually disabled, criminal
psychopaths, Hitler, Stalin, and the rest—have some kind of dignity or
worth that no elephant, pig, or chimpanzee can ever achieve, we see that
this question is as difficult to answer as our original request for some
relevant fact that justifies the inequality of humans and other animals.
In fact, these two questions are really one: talk of intrinsic dignity
or moral worth does not help, because any satisfactory defense of the
claim that all and only human beings have intrinsic dignity would need
to refer to some relevant capacities or characteristics that only human
beings have, in virtue of which they have this unique dignity or worth.
To introduce ideas of dignity and worth as a substitute for other
reasons for distinguishing humans and animals is not good enough. Fine
phrases are the last resource of those who have run out of arguments.

In case anyone still thinks it may be possible to find some relevant
characteristic that distinguishes all human beings from all members of
other species, let us consider again the fact that there are some human
beings who quite clearly are below the level of awareness,
self-consciousness, intelligence, and sentience of many nonhuman beings.
I am thinking of human beings with severe and irreparable brain damage,
and also of infant human beings; to avoid the complication of the
potential of infants, however, I shall concentrate on permanently and
profoundly retarded human beings.

Philosophers who set out to find a characteristic that would distinguish
human beings from other animals rarely took the course of abandoning
these groups of human beings by lumping them in with other animals. It
is easy to see why they did not do so; to take this line without
rethinking our attitudes to other animals would mean we have the right
to perform painful experiments on retarded humans for trivial reasons;
similarly it would follow that we have the right to rear and kill them
for food.

For philosophers discussing the problem of equality, the easiest way out
of the difficulty posed by the existence of human beings who are
profoundly and permanently disabled intellectually was to ignore it. The
Harvard philosopher John Rawls, in his long book _A Theory of Justice_,
came up against this problem when trying to explain why we owe justice
to human beings but not to other animals, but he brushed it aside with
the remark, “I cannot examine this problem here, but I assume that the
account of equality would not be materially affected.”³⁶ This is an
extraordinary way of handling the issue of equal treatment: it would
appear to imply either that we may treat people who are profoundly and
permanently disabled intellectually as we now treat animals, or that,
contrary to Rawls’s own statements, we do owe justice to animals.

What else could philosophers do? If they honestly confronted the problem
posed by the existence of human beings with no morally relevant
characteristics not also possessed by nonhuman beings, it would be
impossible to cling to the equality of human beings without suggesting a
radical revision in the status of nonhumans. In a desperate attempt to
save the usually accepted views, it was even argued that we should treat
beings according to what is “normal for the species” rather than
according to their actual characteristics.³⁷ To see how outrageous this
is, imagine that at some future date evidence were to be found that,
even in the absence of any cultural conditioning, it was normal for more
females than males in a society to stay at home looking after the
children instead of going out to work. This finding would, of course, be
perfectly compatible with the obvious fact that there are some women who
are less well suited to looking after children, and better suited to
going out to work, than some men. Would any philosopher then claim that
these exceptional women should be treated in accordance with what is
“normal for the sex”—and therefore, say, not be admitted to medical
school—rather than in accordance with their actual characteristics? I do
not think so. I find it hard to see anything in this argument except a
defense of preferring the interests of members of our own species
because they are members of our own species.

Like the other philosophical arguments common before the idea of
equality for animals was taken seriously by philosophers, this one
stands as a warning of the ease with which not only ordinary people, but
also those most skilled in moral reasoning, can fall victim to a
prevailing ideology. Now, however, I am truly delighted to report that
philosophy has thrown off its ideological blinkers. Many of today’s
university courses in ethics really do challenge their students to
rethink their attitudes on a range of ethical issues, and the moral
status of nonhuman animals is prominent among them. Fifteen years ago I
had to search hard to find a handful of references by academic
philosophers on the issue of the status of animals; today I could have
filled this entire book with an account of what has been written on this
topic during the past fifteen years. Articles on how we ought to treat
animals are included in virtually all the standard collections of
readings used in applied ethics courses. It is the complacent, unargued
assumptions of the moral insignificance of nonhuman animals which have
become scarce.

In fact over the last fifteen years, academic philosophy has played a
major role in fostering and supporting the Animal Liberation movement.
The amount of, activity can be seen by a glance at Charles Magel’s
recent bibliography of books and articles on animal rights and related
issues. From ancient times to the beginning of the 1970s, Magel finds
only 95 works worthy of mention, and of these only two or three are by
professional philosophers. During the next eighteen years, however,
Magel finds 240 works on animals rights, many by philosophers teaching
in universities.³⁸ Moreover, published works are only part of the story;
in philosophy departments all over the United States, Australia,
Britain, Canada, and in many other countries too, philosophers are
teaching their students about the moral status of animals. Many of them
are also working actively for change with animal rights groups, either
on campus or off.

Of course, philosophers are not unanimous in support of vegetarianism
and Animal Liberation—when were they ever unanimous about anything? But
even those philosophers who have been critical of claims made by their
colleagues on behalf of animals have accepted important elements of the
case for change. For example R. G. Frey of Bowling Green State
University, Ohio, who has written more in opposition to my views on
animals than any other philosopher, begins one of his articles by
stating flatly: “I am not an antivivisectionist …” But he then
acknowledges that:

I have and know of nothing which enables me to say, a priori, that a
human life of any quality, however low, is more valuable than an animal
life of any quality, however high.

As a result, Frey recognizes that “the case for antivivisectionism is
far stronger than most people allow.” He concludes that if one seeks to
justify experimenting on nonhuman animals by the benefits they produce
(which is, in his view, the only way in which the practice can be
justified), there is no intrinsic reason why such benefits would not
also justify experiments on “humans whose quality of life is exceeded by
or equal to that of animals.” Hence he accepts experiments on animals
where the benefits are sufficiently important, but only at the price of
accepting the possibility of similar experiments on humans.³⁹

More dramatic still, was the change of heart shown by the Canadian
philosopher Michael Allen Fox. In 1986 the publication of his book _The
Case for Animal Experimentation_ seemed sure to earn him a prominent
spot at scholarly conferences as the chief philosophical defender of the
animal research industry. The drug companies and lobbyists for animal
experiments who thought they had, at last, a tame philosopher they could
use to defend themselves against ethical criticism must have been
dismayed however, when Fox suddenly disavowed his own book. In a
response to a highly critical review in _The Scientist_, Fox wrote a
letter to the editor saying that he agreed with the reviewer: he had
come to see that the arguments of his book were mistaken, and it was not
possible to justify animal experimentation on ethical grounds. Later Fox
followed through on his courageous change of mind by becoming a
vegetarian.⁴⁰

The rise of the Animal Liberation movement may be unique among modern
social causes in the extent to which it has been linked with the
development of the issue as a topic of discussion in the circles of
academic philosophy. In considering the status of nonhuman animals,
philosophy itself has undergone a remarkable transformation: it has
abandoned the comfortable conformism of accepted dogma and returned to
its ancient Socratic role.

The core of this book is the claim that to discriminate against beings
solely on account of their species is a form of prejudice, immoral and
indefensible in the same way that discrimination on the basis of race is
immoral and indefensible. I have not been content to put forward this
claim as a bare assertion, or as a statement of my own personal view,
which others may or may not choose to accept. I have argued for it,
appealing to reason rather than to emotion or sentiment. I have chosen
this path, not because I am unaware of the importance of kind feelings
and sentiments of respect toward other creatures, but because reason is
more universal and more compelling in its appeal. Greatly as I admire
those who have eliminated speciesism from their lives purely because
their sympathetic concern for others reaches out to all sentient
creatures, I do not think that an appeal to sympathy and
good-heartedness alone will convince most people of the wrongness of
speciesism. Even where other human beings are concerned, people are
surprisingly adept at limiting their sympathies to those of their own
nation or race. Almost everyone, however, is at least nominally prepared
to listen to reason. Admittedly, there are some who flirt with an
excessive subjectivism in morality, saying that any morality is as good
as any other; but when these same people are pressed to say if they
think the morality of Hitler, or of the slave traders, is as good as the
morality of Albert Schweitzer or Martin Luther King, they find that,
after all, they believe some moralities are better than others.

So throughout this book I have relied on rational argument. Unless you
can refute the central argument of this book, you should now recognize
that speciesism is wrong, and this means that, if you take morality
seriously, you should try to eliminate speciesist practices from your
own life, and oppose them elsewhere. Otherwise no basis remains from
which you can, without hypocrisy, criticize racism or sexism.

I have generally avoided arguing that we ought to be kind to animals
because cruelty to animals leads to cruelty to human beings. Perhaps it
is true that kindness to human beings and to other animals often go
together; but whether or not this is true, to say, as Aquinas and Kant
did, that this is the real reason why we ought to be kind to animals is
a thoroughly speciesist position. We ought to consider the interests of
animals because they have interests and it is unjustifiable to exclude
them from the sphere of moral concern; to make this consideration depend
on beneficial consequences for human beings is to accept the implication
that the interests of animals do not warrant consideration for their own
sakes.

Similarly, I have avoided an extensive discussion of whether a
vegetarian diet is healthier than a diet that includes animal flesh. A
good deal of evidence suggests that it is, but I have contented myself
with showing that a vegetarian can expect to be at least as healthy as
one who eats meat. Once one goes beyond this it is difficult to avoid
giving the impression that if further studies should show that a diet
containing flesh is acceptable from the point of view of health, then
the case for becoming a vegetarian collapses. From the standpoint of
Animal Liberation, however, so long as we can live without inflicting
miserable lives on animals, that is what we ought to do.

I believe that the case for Animal Liberation is logically cogent, and
cannot be refuted; but the task of overthrowing speciesism in practice
is a formidable one. We have seen that speciesism has historical roots
that go deep into the consciousness of Western society. We have seen
that the elimination of speciesist practices would threaten the vested
interests of the giant agribusiness corporations, and the professional
associations of research workers and veterinarians. When necessary,
these corporations and organizations are prepared to spend millions of
dollars in defense of their interests, and the public will then be
bombarded with advertisements denying allegations of cruelty. Moreover
the public has—or thinks it has—an interest in the continuance of the
speciesist practice of raising and killing animals for food and this
makes people ready to accept reassurances that, in this respect at
least, there is little cruelty. As we have seen, people are also ready
to accept fallacious forms of reasoning, of the type we have examined in
this chapter, which they would never entertain for a moment were it not
for the fact that these fallacies appear to justify their preferred
diet.

Against these ancient prejudices, powerful vested interests, and
ingrained habits, does the Animal Liberation movement have any chance at
all? Other than reason and morality, does it have anything in its favor?
A decade ago there was no concrete basis for hope that its arguments
could prevail, other than confidence in the ultimate victory of reason
and morality. Since then the movement has seen dramatic growth in the
number of its supporters, its public visibility, and most important, the
list of gains made for animals. Ten years ago the Animal Liberation
movement was widely seen as crackpot, and the membership of groups with
a genuinely liberationist philosophy was tiny. Today People for the
Ethical Treatment of Animals has 250,000 members, and the Humane Farming
Association, which is campaigning strongly against veal crates, has
45,000.⁴¹ Trans-Species Unlimited has grown from a tiny group with one
office in central Pennsylvania to a national organization with branches
in New York City, New Jersey, Philadelphia, and Chicago. The Coalition
to Abolish the LD50 and Draize Tests brings together animal rights and
animal welfare groups with a combined membership in the millions. In
1988 Animal Liberation achieved what has become a badge of recognition:
a respectful cover story in _Newsweek_.⁴²

We have noted some of the gains for animals as they arose in our
discussion of particular topics, but they are worth bringing together.
They include the prohibition of veal crates in Britain and the phasing
out of battery cages in Switzerland and the Netherlands, as well as the
more far-reaching legislation in Sweden which will eliminate veal
crates, battery cages, sow stalls, and all other devices that prevent
animals from moving about freely. It will also make it illegal to keep
cattle without allowing them to graze in pastures during the warmer
months. The worldwide campaign against the fur trade has succeeded in
greatly reducing the quantity of fur sold, especially in Europe. In
Britain the House of Fraser, a leading chain of department stores, was
the target of protests against fur. In December 1989, it announced that
it was closing the fur salons in fifty-nine of its sixty stores, leaving
only one remaining in the famous London store, Harrods.

In the United States there have been no gains for farm animals yet, but
several particularly objectionable series of experiments have been
brought to a halt. The first success was achieved in 1977, when a
campaign led by Henry Spira persuaded the American Museum of Natural
History to stop a pointless series of experiments that involved
mutilating cats in order to investigate the effect this had on their sex
lives.⁴³ In 1981 came exposure by the Animal Liberation activist Alex
Pacheco of the appalling conditions of seventeen monkeys at Edward
Taub’s Institute for Behavioral Research, in Silver Springs, Maryland.
The National Institutes of Health cut off Taub’s funding, and Taub
became the first in the United States to be convicted of
cruelty—although the conviction was later reversed on the technical
ground that animal experimenters receiving federal tax funding do not
have to obey state anticruelty laws.⁴⁴ Meanwhile the case gave national
prominence to a fledgling group called People for the Ethical Treatment
of Animals, which in 1984 led efforts to stop Dr. Thomas Gennarelli’s
head injury experiments on monkeys at the University of Pennsylvania.
These efforts were triggered by extraordinary videotapes of animal
abuse, shot by the experimenters themselves and stolen from the
laboratory in a night raid carried out by the Animal Liberation Front.
Gennarelli’s grant was withdrawn.⁴⁵ In 1988, after months of picketing
by Trans-Species Unlimited, a researcher at Cornell University gave up a
$530,000 grant to study barbiturate addiction using cats.⁴⁶ Around the
same time Benetton, the Italian fashion chain, announced that it would
no longer perform safety tests for new cosmetics and toiletries on
animals. Benetton had been the target of an international campaign,
coordinated by People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals, that
involved Animal Liberationists in seven countries. Noxell Corporation,
an American cosmetics manufacturer, had not been the object of such a
campaign; but it made its own decision to rely on tissue culture instead
of performing Draize tests on rabbits to determine whether its products
can damage the human eye. Noxell’s decision was part of a steady
movement toward alternatives by major cosmetics, toiletries, and
pharmaceutical corporations, initiated and constantly spurred on by the
Coalition to Abolish the LD50 and Draize Tests.⁴⁷ Years of hard work
paid off in 1989 when Avon, Revlon, Fabergé, Mary Kay, Amway, Elizabeth
Arden, Max Factor, Christian Dior, and several small companies announced
that they were ending, or at least suspending, all animal
experimentation. In the same year the European Commission, which is
responsible for safety testing in ten nations of the European Community,
announced that it would accept alternatives to the LD50 and Draize
tests, and invited all OECD nations (a group which includes the U.S. and
Japan) to work toward developing common alternative safety tests. Both
the LD50 and the Draize test have now been banned by government
regulation in Victoria and New South Wales, Australia’s most populous
states and the states in which most animal experimentation has been
carried out.⁴⁸

In the United States, momentum is also building on the issue of
dissection in high schools. The stubborn resistance to dissection of one
Californian high school student, Jenifer Graham—and her insistence on
not losing marks for her conscientious objection—led to the passage, in
1988, of the California Students’ Rights Bill, which gives students in
Californian primary and secondary schools the right to refuse to dissect
without suffering a penalty. Similar bills are now being introduced in
New Jersey, Massachusetts, Maine, Hawaii, and several other states.

As the movement gains increased visibility and support, the groundswell
of people doing their part gathers momentum. Rock musicians have helped
to circulate the Animal Liberation message. Movie stars, models, and
dress designers have pledged to avoid furs. The international success of
the Body Shop chain has made cruelty-free cosmetics more attractive and
readily available. Vegetarian restaurants are proliferating and even
nonvegetarian restaurants are offering vegetarian dishes. All this makes
it easier for newcomers to join those already doing what they can to
limit cruelty to animals in their daily lives.

Nevertheless, Animal Liberation will require greater altruism on the
part of human beings than any other liberation movement. The animals
themselves are incapable of demanding their own liberation, or of
protesting against their condition with votes, demonstrations, or
boycotts. Human beings have the power to continue to oppress other
species forever, or until we make this planet unsuitable for living
beings. Will our tyranny continue, proving that morality counts for
nothing when it clashes with self-interest, as the most cynical of poets
and philosophers have always said? Or will we rise to the challenge and
prove our capacity for genuine altruism by ending our ruthless
exploitation of the species in our power, not because we are forced to
do so by rebels or terrorists, but because we recognize that our
position is morally indefensible?

The way in which we answer this question depends on the way in which
each one of us, individually, answers it.

Further Reading

_General_

Bekoff, Marc. _The Emotional Lives of Animals: A Leading Scientist
Explores Animal Joy, Sorrow, and Empathy_—_and Why They Matter_. New
York, New World Library, 2008. A scientist explores the emotional lives
of animals and why we should not treat them as we do.

——. _Encyclopedia of Animal Rights and Animal Welfare_. Westport, Conn.,
Greenwood Press, 1998. A valuable reference work. A revised edition will
be published in 2009.

Cavalieri, Paola. _The Animal Question: Why Nonhuman Animals Deserve
Human Rights_. New York, Oxford University Press, 2001. A short but
powerfully argued case for granting rights to animals.

Dawn, Karen. _Thanking the Monkey: Rethinking the Way We Treat Animals_.
New York, Harper, 2008. A fresh, lively, and entertaining take on
today’s animal movement and the issues it raises.

DeGrazia, David. _Animal Rights: A Very Short Introduction_. Oxford,
Oxford University Press, 2002. An overview of the major issues, in 120
pages.

Godlovitch, Stanley and Roslind, and John Harris, eds. _Animals, Men and
Morals_. New York, Grove, 1974. A path-breaking collection of articles.

Gompertz, Lewis. _Moral Inquiries on the Situation of Man and of
Brutes_. London, 1824. One of the first carefully argued proposals for a
radically different attitude to animals.

Gruen, Lori, Peter Singer, and David Hine. _Animal Liberation: A Graphic
Guide_. London, Camden Press, 1987. An illustrated brief popular account
of the Animal Liberation movement in theory and practice.

Midgley, Mary. _Animals and Why They Matter_. Athens, University of
Georgia Press, 1984. A penetrating discussion of the difference that
species makes.

Rachels, James. _Created from Animals: The Moral Implications of
Darwinism_. Oxford and New York, Oxford University Press, 1990. Expounds
the still largely unrecognized moral implications of the theory of
evolution in regard to our treatment of animals.

Regan, Tom. _Empty Cages_. Lanham. Md., Rowman and Littlefield, 2004. A
popular presentation of the case for animal rights.

Regan, Tom, and Peter Singer, eds. _Animal Rights and Human
Obligations_. Englewood Cliffs, N.J., Prentice-Hall, 2nd ed., 1989. An
anthology of writings, both old and new, from both sides.

Rollin, Bernard. _The Unheeded Cry_. Oxford, Oxford University Press,
1989. A highly readable account of attempts to deny feelings to animals
and why they fail.

Ryder, Richard D. _Animal Revolution: Changing Attitudes Towards
Speciesism_. Oxford, Blackwell, 1989. A historical survey of changing
attitudes toward animals, by a leading thinker and activist.

Salt, Henry. _Animal’s Rights Considered in Relation to Social
Progress_. Clarks Summit, Pa., Society for Animal Rights; Fontwell,
Sussex, Centaur Press/State Mutual Book, 1985 (first published 1892). An
early classic.

Sapontzis, Steve. _Morals, Reason and Animals_. Philadelphia, Temple
University Press, 1987. A detailed philosophical analysis of arguments
about animal liberation.

Singer, Peter. _Ethics into Action: Henry Spira and the Animal Rights
Movement_. Lanham, Md., Rowman and Littlefield, 1998. Lessons on
activism from the most effective activist of the United States—animal
movement of the 1970s and ’80s.

——. _In Defense of Animals: The Second Wave._ Oxford, Blackwell, 2006.
Specially written essays by leading activists and thinkers.

Thomas, Keith. _Man and the Natural World: Changing Attitudes in England
1500–1800_. London, Allen Lane, 1983. A scholarly but highly readable
study of attitudes to animals during this period.

Turner, E. S. _All Heaven in a Rage_. London, Michael Joseph, 1964. An
informative and entertaining history of the movement for animal
protection.

Wynne-Tyson, J., ed. _The Extended Circle: A Commonplace Book of Animal
Rights_. New York, Paragon House, 1988; London, Penguin, 1989. Hundreds
of short extracts from humane thinkers down the ages.

_Animals in Research_

Nuffield Council on Bioethics. _The Ethics of Research Involving
Animals_. London, Nuffield Council on Bioethics, 2005. Although the
report’s conclusions may be questioned, it contains a wealth of useful
information.

Orlans, F. Barbara. _In the Name of Science: Issues in Responsible
Animal Experimentation_. New York, Oxford University Press, 1993. An
account of the ethical and scientific issues.

Rowan, Andrew. _Of Mice, Models, and Men: A Critical Evaluation of
Animal Research_. Albany, State University of New York Press, 1984.

Ryder, Richard. _Victims of Science_. Fontwell, Sussex, Centaur
Press/State Mutual Book, 1983. Still a valuable critque of animal
experimentation.

Sharpe, Robert. _The Cruel Deception_. Wellingborough, Northants,
Thorsons, 1988. The scientific case against animal experimentation,
arguing that it is generally irrelevant to advances in health, and
sometimes positively misleading.

_Farm Animals and the Meat Industry_

Baur, Gene. _Farm Sanctuary: Changing Hearts and Minds About Animals and
Food_. New York, Touchstone, 2008. The story of Farm Sanctuary, both a
haven for rescued farm animals and a powerful advocate for farm animals.

Brambell, F. W. R., Chairman. _Report of the Technical Committee to
Enquire into the Welfare of Animals Kept Under Intensive Livestock
Husbandry Systems_. London, Her Majesty’s Stationery Office, 1965. The
report of the first detailed government inquiry into factory farming.

Davis, Karen. _Prisoned Chickens, Poisoned Eggs_. Summertown, Tenn.,
Book Publishing Company, 1996. An inside look at the poultry and egg
industries.

Dawkins, Marian. _Animal Suffering: The Science of Animal Welfare_. New
York, Routledge, Chapman and Hall, 1980. A scientific discussion of ways
of objectively measuring animal suffering.

Harrison, Ruth. _Animal Machines_. London, Vincent Stuart, 1964. The
book that started the campaign against factory farming.

Mason, Jim, and Peter Singer. _Animal Factories_. New York, Crown, 1980.
The health, ecological, and animal welfare implications of factory
farming, with an outstanding collection of photographs.

——. _The Ethics of What We Eat_. New York, Rodale, 2006. A discussion of
all the major ethical questions about our food choices.

Marcus, Erik. _Meat Market: Animals, Ethics and Money_. New York, Brio,
2005. Coolly assess where the arguments against meat are at their
strongest, and where they have been exaggerated.

_Vegetarianism_

Akers, Keith. _A Vegetarian Sourcebook: The Nutrition, Ecology, and
Ethics of a Natural Foods Diet_. Arlington, Va., Vegetarian Press, 1989.
A comprehensive collection of scientific information on the vegetarian
diet.

Gold, Mark. _Living Without Cruelty_. Basingstoke, Hants, Green Print,
1988. Covers all the detailed questions of living without abusing
animals.

Kapleau, Roshi P. _To Cherish All Life: A Buddhist View of Animal
Slaughter and Meat Eating_. Rochester, N.Y., The Zen Center, 1981. By an
eminent American Buddhist.

Lappé, Frances Moore. _Diet for a Small Planet_. New York, Ballantine,
10th Anniversary ed., 1985. This book argues on ecological grounds
against meat production.

Marcus, Erik. _Vegan Guide_. Santa Cruz, Calif., Vegan.com, 2009. All
you need to know about going vegan.

Robbins, John. _Diet for a New America: How Your Food Choices Affect
Your Health, Happiness and the Future of Life on Earth_. Walpole, N.H.,
Stillpoint, 1987. The author assembles a mass of evidence against eating
animal products.

Wynne-Tyson, Jon. _Food for a Future: How World Hunger Could Be Ended by
the Twenty-First Century_. Wellingborough, Northants, Thorsons, rev.
ed., 1988. An argument for vegetarianism on humane and ecological
grounds.

_Wildlife_

Amory, Cleveland. _Man Kind?_ New York, Dell, 1980. A scathing critique
of the war on wildlife.

Bostock, Stephen. _Zoos and Animal Rights_. London, Routledge, 1993. On
the ethics of keeping animals in zoos.

McKenna, Virginia, Will Travers, and Jonathan Wray, eds. _Beyond the
Bars_. Wellingborough, Northants, Thorsons, 1988. A collection of essays
on zoos and related issues, focusing especially on wildlife
conservation.

Peterson, Dale. _Eating Apes_. Berkeley, Calif., University of
California Press, 2003. On the threat to our closest relatives, with
moving photographs by Karl Ammann.

Regenstein, Lewis. _The Politics of Extinction_. New York, Macmillan,
1975. An account of how we have driven, and continue to drive, species
to extinction.

Notes

_Chapter 1_

1. For Bentham’s moral philosophy, see his _Introduction to the
Principles of Morals and Legislation_, and for Sidgwick’s see _The
Methods of Ethics_, 1907 (the passage is quoted from the seventh
edition; reprint, London: Macmillan, 1963), p. 382. As examples of
leading contemporary moral philosophers who incorporate a requirement of
equal consideration of interests, see R.M. Hare, _Freedom and Reason_
(New York: Oxford University Press, 1963), and John Rawls, _A Theory of
Justice_ (Cambridge: Harvard University Press, Belknap Press, 1972). For
a brief account of the essential agreement on this issue between these
and other positions, see R. M. Hare, “Rules of War and Moral Reasoning,”
_Philosophy and Public Affairs_ 1 (2) (1972).

2. Letter to Henry Gregoire, February 25, 1809.

3. Reminiscences by Francis D. Gage, from Susan B. Anthony, _The History
of Woman Suffrage_, vol. 1; the passage is to be found in the extract in
Leslie Tanner, ed., _Voices From Women’s Liberation_ (New York: Signet,
1970).

4. I owe the term “speciesism” to Richard Ryder. It has become accepted
in general use since the first edition of this book, and now appears in
_The Oxford English Dictionary_, second edition (Oxford: Clarendon
Press, 1989).

5. _Introduction to the Principles of Morals and Legislation_, chapter
17.

6. See M. Levin, “Animal Rights Evaluated,” _Humanist_ 37: 14–15
(July/August 1977); M. A. Fox, “Animal Liberation: A Critique,” _Ethics_
88: 134–138 (1978); C. Perry and G. E. Jones, “On Animal Rights,”
_International Journal of Applied Philosophy_ 1: 39–57 (1982).

7. Lord Brain, “Presidential Address,” in C. A. Keele and R. Smith,
eds., _The Assessment of Pain in Men and Animals_ (London: Universities
Federation for Animal Welfare, 1962).

8. Lord Brain, “Presidential Address,” p. 11.

9. Richard Serjeant, _The Spectrum of Pain_ (London: Hart Davis, 1969),
p. 72.

10. See the reports of the Committee on Cruelty to Wild Animals (Command
Paper 8266, 1951), paragraphs 36–42; the Departmental Committee on
Experiments on Animals (Command Paper 2641, 1965), paragraphs 179–182;
and the Technical Committee to Enquire into the Welfare of Animals Kept
under Intensive Livestock Husbandry Systems (Command Paper 2836, 1965),
paragraphs 26–28 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery Office).

11. See Stephen Walker, _Animal Thoughts_ (London: Routledge and Kegan
Paul, 1983); Donald Griffin, _Animal Thinking_ (Cambridge: Harvard
University Press, 1984); and Marian Stamp Dawkins, _Animal Suffering:
The Science of Animal Welfare_ (London: Chapman and Hall, 1980).

12. See Eugene Linden, _Apes, Men and Language_ (New York: Penguin,
1976); for popular accounts of some more recent work, see Erik Eckholm,
“Pygmy Chimp Readily Learns Language Skill,” _The New York Times_, June
24, 1985; and “The Wisdom of Animals,” _Newsweek_, May 23, 1988.

13. _In the Shadow of Man_ (Boston: Houghton Mifflin, 1971), p. 225.
Michael Peters makes a similar point in “Nature and Culture,” in Stanley
and Roslind Godlovitch and John Harris, eds., _Animals, Men and Morals_
(New York: Taplinger, 1972). For examples of some of the inconsistencies
in denials that creatures without language can feel pain, see Bernard
Rollin, _The Unheeded Cry: Animal Consciousness, Animal Pain, and
Science_ (Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1989).

14. I am here putting aside religious views, for example the doctrine
that all and only human beings have immortal souls, or are made in the
image of God. Historically these have been very important, and no doubt
are partly responsible for the idea that human life has a special
sanctity. (For further historical discussion see Chapter 5.) Logically,
however, these religious views are unsatisfactory, since they do not
offer a reasoned explanation of why it should be that all humans and no
nonhumans have immortal souls. This belief too, therefore, comes under
suspicion as a form of speciesism. In any case, defenders of the
“sanctity of life” view are generally reluctant to base their position
on purely religious doctrines, since these doctrines are no longer as
widely accepted as they once were.

15. For a general discussion of these questions, see my _Practical
Ethics_ (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1979), and for a more
detailed discussion of the treatment of handicapped infants, see Helga
Kuhse and Peter Singer, _Should the Baby Live_? (Oxford: Oxford
University Press, 1985).

16. For a development of this theme, see my essay, “Life’s Uncertain
Voyage,” in P. Pettit, R. Sylvan and J. Norman, eds., _Metaphysics and
Morality_ (Oxford: Blackwell, 1987), pp. 154–172.

17. The preceding discussion, which has been changed only slightly since
the first edition, has often been overlooked by critics of the Animal
Liberation movement. It is a common tactic to seek to ridicule the
Animal Liberation position by maintaining that, as an animal
experimenter put it recently, “Some of these people believe that every
insect, every mouse, has as much right to life as a human.” (Dr. Irving
Weissman, as quoted in Katherine Bishop, “From Shop to Lab to Farm,
Animal Rights Battle is Felt,” _The New York Times_, January 14, 1989.)
It would be interesting to see Dr. Weissman name some prominent Animal
Liberationists who hold this view. Certainly (assuming only that he was
referring to the right to life of a human being with mental capacities
very different from those of the insect and the mouse) the position
described is not mine. I doubt that it is held by many—if any—in the
Animal Liberation movement.

Chapter 2

1. U.S. Air Force, School of Aerospace Medicine, Report No.
USAFSAM-TR-82–24, August 1982.

2. U.S. Air Force, School of Aerospace Medicine, Report No.
USAFSAM-TR-87–19, October 1987.

3. U.S. Air Force, Report No. USAFSAM-TR-87–19, p. 6

4. Donald J. Barnes, “A Matter of Change,” in Peter Singer, ed., _In
Defense of Animals_ (Oxford: Blackwell, 1985).

5. _Air Force Times_, November 28, 1973; _The New York Times_, November
14, 1973.

6. B. Levine et al., “Determination of the Chronic Mammalian
Toxicological Effects of TNT: Twenty-six Week Subchronic Oral Toxicity
Study of Trinitrotoluene (TNT) in the Beagle Dog,” Phase II, Final
Report (U.S. Army Medical Research and Development Command, Fort
Detrick, Maryland, June 1983).

7. Carol G. Franz, “Effects of Mixed Neutron-gamma Total-body
Irradiation on Physical Activity Performance of Rhesus Monkeys,”
_Radiation Research_ 101: 434–441 (1985).

8. _Proceedings of the National Academy of Science_ 54: 90 (1965).

9. _Engineering and Science_ 33: 8 (1970).

10. _Maternal Care and Mental Health_, World Health Organization
Monograph Series, 2: 46 (1951).

11. _Engineering and Science_ 33: 8 (1970).

12. _Journal of Comparative and Physiological Psychology_ 80 (1): 11
(1972).

13. _Behavior Research Methods and Instrumentation_ 1: 247 (1969).

14. _Journal of Autism and Childhood Schizophrenia_ 3 (3): 299 (1973).

15. _Journal of Comparative Psychology_ 98: 35–44 (1984).

16. _Developmental Psychology_ 17: 313–318 (1981).

17. _Primates_ 25: 78–88 (1984).

18. Research figures compiled by Martin Stephens, Ph.D., as reported in
_Maternal Deprivation Experiments in Psychology: A Critique of Animal
Models_, a report prepared for the American, National and New England
Anti-Vivisection Societies (Boston, 1986).

19. _Statistics of Scientific Procedures on Living Animals, Great
Britain, 1988_, Command Paper 743 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery
Office, 1989).

20. U.S. Congress Office of Technology Assessment, _Alternatives to
Animal Use in Research, Testing and Education_ (Washington, D.C.:
Government Printing Office, 1986), p. 64.

21. Hearings before the Subcommittee on Livestock and Feed Grains of the
Committee on Agriculture, U.S. House of Representatives, 1966, p. 63.

22. See A. Rowan, _Of Mice, Models and Men_ (Albany: State Univeristy of
New York Press, 1984), p. 71; his later revision is in a personal
communication to the Office of Technology Assessment; see _Alternatives
to Animal Use in Research, Testing and Education_, p. 56.

23. OTA, _Alternatives to Animal Use in Research, Testing and
Education_, p. 56.

24. _Experimental Animals_ 37: 105 (1988).

25. _Nature_ 334: 445 (August 4, 1988).

26. _The Harvard Bioscience Whole Rat Catalog_ (South Natick, Mass.:
Harvard Bioscience, 1983).

27. Report of the Littlewood Committee, pp. 53, 166; quoted by Richard
Ryder, “Experiments on Animals,” in Stanley and Roslind Godlovitch and
John Harris, eds., _Animals, Men, and Morals_ (New York: Taplinger,
1972), p. 43.

28. Figures calculated by Lori Gruen from data reports provided by the
U.S. Public Health Service, _Computer Retrieval of Information on
Scientific Projects_ (CRISP) reports.

29. _Journal of Comparative and Physiological Psychology_ 67 (1): 110
(April 1969).

30. _Bulletin of the Psychonomic Society_ 24: 69–71 (1986).

31. _Behavioral and Neural Biology_ 101: 296–299 (1987).

32. _Pharmacology, Biochemistry, and Behavior_ 17: 645–649 (1982).

33. _Journal of Experimental Psychology: Animal Behavior Processes_ 10:
307–323 (1984).

34. _Journal of Abnormal and Social Psychology_ 48 (2): 291 (April
1953).

35. _Journal of Abnormal Psychology_ 73 (3): 256 (June 1968).

36. _Animal Learning and Behavior_ 12: 332–338 (1984).

37. _Journal of Experimental Psychology: Animal Behavior and Processes_
12: 277–290 (1986).

38. _Psychological Reports_ 57: 1027–1030 (1985).

39. _Progress in Neuro-Psychopharmacology and Biological Psychiatry_ 8:
434–446 (1984).

40. _Journal of the Experimental Analysis of Behavior_ 19 (1): 25
(1973).

41. _Journal of the Experimental Analysis of Behavior_ 41: 45–52 (1984).

42. _Aggressive Behavior_ 8: 371–383 (1982).

43. _Animal Learning and Behavior_ 14: 305–314 (1986).

44. _Behavioral Neuroscience_ 100 (2): 90–99 and 98 (3): 541–555 (1984).

45. OTA, _Alternatives to Animal Use in Research, Testing and
Education_, p. 132.

46. A. Heim, _Intelligence and Personality_ (Baltimore: Penguin, 1971)
p. 150; for a splendid discussion of the entire phenomenon, see Bernard
Rollin, _The Unheeded Cry: Animal Consciousness, Animal Pain, and
Science_ (New York: Oxford University Press, 1989).

47. Chris Evans, “Psychology Is About People,” _New Scientist_, August
31, 1972, p. 453.

48. _Statistics of Scientific Procedures on Living Animals, Great
Britain, 1988_ (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery Office, 1989), tables
7, 8, and 9.

49. J. P. Griffin and G. E. Diggle, _British Journal of Clinical
Pharmacology_ 12: 453–463 (1981).

50. OTA, _Alternatives to Animal Use in Research, Testing and
Education_, p. 168.

51. _Journal of the Society of Cosmetic Chemists_ 13: 9 (1962).

52. OTA, _Alternatives to Animal Use in Research, Testing and
Education_, p. 64.

53. _Toxicology_ 15 (1): 31–41 (1979).

54. David Bunner et al., “Clinical and Hematologic Effects of T-2 Toxin
on Rats,” Interim Report (U.S. Army Medical Research and Development
Command, Fort Detrick, Frederick, Maryland, August 2, 1985). The
quotations from the Department of State are from _Report to the Congress
for Secretary of State Alexander Haig, March_ 22, 1982_: Chemical
Warfare in S.E. Asia and Afghanistan_ (U.S. Department of State Special
Report No. 98, Washington, D.C., 1982).

55. M. N. Gleason et al., eds., _Clinical Toxicology of Commercial
Products_ (Baltimore: Williams and Wilkins, 1969).

56. _PCRM Update_ (Newsletter of the Physicians Committee for
Responsible Medicine, Washington, D.C.), July–August 1988, p. 4.

57. S. F. Paget, ed., _Methods in Toxicology_ (Blackwell Scientific
Publications, 1970), pp. 4, 134–139.

58. _New Scientist_, March 17, 1983.

59. On Practolol, see W. H. Inman and F. H. Goss, eds., _Drug
Monitoring_ (New York: Academic Press, 1977); on Zipeprol, see C. Moroni
et al., _The Lancet_, January 7, 1984, p. 45. I owe these references to
Robert Sharpe, _The Cruel Deception_ (Wellingborough, Northants:
Thorsons, 1988).

60. S. F. Paget, ed., _Methods in Toxicology_, p. 132.

61. G. F. Somers, _Quantitative Method in Human Pharmacology and
Therapeutics_ (Elmsford, N.Y.: Pergamon Press, 1959), quoted by Richard
Ryder, _Victims of Science_ (Fontwell, Sussex: Centaur Press/State
Mutual Book, 1983), p. 153.

62. Syndicated article appearing in _West County Times_ (California),
January 17, 1988.

63. As reported in _DVM: The Newsmagazine of Veterinary Medicine_ 9: 58
(June 1988).

64. _The New York Times_, April 15, 1980.

65. For further details see Henry Spira, “Fighting to Win,” in Peter
Singer, ed., _In Defense of Animals_.

66. _PETA News_ (People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals,
Washington, D.C.) 4 (2): 19 (March/April 1989).

67. “Noxell Significantly Reduces Animal Testing,” News Release, Noxell
Corporation, Hunt Valley, Maryland, December 28, 1988; Douglas McGill,
“Cosmetics Companies Quietly Ending Animal Tests,” _The New York Times_,
August 2, 1989, p. 1.

68. “Avon Validates Draize Substitute,” News Release, Avon Products, New
York, April 5, 1989.

69. _The Alternatives Report_ (Center for Animals and Public Policy,
Tufts School of Veterinary Medicine, Grafton, Massachusetts) 2: 2
(July/August 1989); “Facts about Amway and the Environment,” Amway
Corporation, Ada, Michigan, May 17, 1989.

70. “Avon Announces Permanent End to Animal Testing,” News Release, Avon
Products, New York, June 22, 1989.

71. Douglas McGill, “Cosmetics Companies Quietly Ending Animal Tests,”
_The New York Times_, August 2, 1989, p. 1.

72. “Industry Toxicologists Keen on Reducing Animal Use,” _Science_,
April 17, 1987.

73. Barnaby J. Feder, “Beyond White Rats and Rabbits,” _The New York
Times_, February 28, 1988, Business section, p. 1; see also Constance
Holden, “Much Work But Slow Going on Alternatives to Draize Test,”
_Science_, October 14, 1985, p. 185.

74. Judith Hampson, “Brussels Drops Need for Lethal Animal Tests,” _New
Scientist_, October 7, 1989.

75. Coalition to Abolish LD50, Coordinators Report 1983 (New York,
1983), p. 1.

76. H. C. Wood, _Fever: A Study of Morbid and Normal Physiology_,
Smithsonian Contributions to Knowledge, No. 357 (Lippincott, 1880).

77. _The Lancet_, September 17, 1881, p. 551.

78. _Journal of the American Medical Association_ 89 (3): 177 (1927).

79. _Journal of Pediatrics_ 45: 179 (1954).

80. _Indian Journal of Medical Research_ 56 (1): 12 (1968).

81. S. Cleary, ed., _Biological Effects and Health Implications of
Microwave Radiations_, U.S. Public Health Service Publication PB 193:
898 (1969).

82. _Thrombosis et Diathesis Haemorphagica_ 26 (3): 417 (1971).

83. _Archives of Internal Medicine_ 131: 688 (1973).

84. G. Hanneman and J. Sershon, “Tolerance Endpoint for Evaluating the
Effects of Heat Stress in Dogs,” FAA Report #FAA-AM-84–5, June, 1984.

85. _Journal of Applied Physiology_ 53: 1171–1174 (1982).

86. _Aviation, Space and Environmental Medicine_ 57: 659–663 (1986).

87. B. Zweifach, “Aspects of Comparative Physiology of Laboratory
Animals Relative to Problems of Experimental Shock,” Federal Procedings
20, Suppl. 9: 18–29 (1961); cited in _Aviation, Space and Environmental
Medicine_ 50 (8):8–19 (1979).

88. _Annual Review of Physiology_ 8: 335 (1946).

89. _Pharmacological Review_ 6 (4): 489 (1954).

90. K. Hobler and R. Napodano, _Journal of Trauma_ 14 (8): 716 (1974).

91. Martin Stephens, _A Critique of Animal Experiments on Cocaine
Abuse_, a report prepared for the American, National and New England
Anti-Vivisection Societies (Boston, 1985).

92. _Health Care_ 2 (26), August 28–September 10, 1980.

93. _Journal of Pharmacology and Experimental Therapeutics_ 226 (3):
783–789 (1983).

94. _Psychopharmacology_ 88: 500–504 (1986).

95. _Bulletin of the Psychonomic Society_ 22 (1): 53–56 (1984).

96. _European Journal of Pharmacology_ 40: 114–115 (1976).

97. _Newsweek_, December 26, 1988, p. 50; “TSU Shuts Down Cornell Cat
Lab,” _The Animals’ Agenda_ 9 (3): 22–25 (March 1989).

98. S. Milgram, _Obedience to Authority_ (New York: Harper and Row,
1974). Incidentally, these experiments were widely criticized on ethical
grounds because they involved human beings without their consent. It is
indeed questionable whether Milgram should have deceived participants in
his experiment as he did; but when we compare what was done to them with
what is commonly done to nonhuman animals, we can appreciate how far
more sensitive most people are when assessing the ethics of
experimentation with humans.

99. _Monitor_, a publication of the American Psychological Association,
March 1978.

100. Donald J. Barnes, “A Matter of Change,” in Peter Singer, ed., _In
Defense of Animals_, pp. 160, 166.

101. _The Death Sciences in Veterinary Research and Education_, (New
York: United Action for Animals), p. iii.

102. _Journal of the American Veterinary Medical Association_ 163 (9): 1
(November 1, 1973).

103. See Appendix 3 for the address.

104. _Journal of Comparative and Physiological Psychology_ 55: 896
(1962).

105. _Scope_ (Durban, South Africa), March 30, 1973.

106. Robert J. White, “Antivivisection: The Reluctant Hydra,” _The
American Scholar_ 40 (1971); reprinted in T. Regan and P. Singer, eds.,
_Animal Rights and Human Obligations_, first edition, (Englewood Cliffs,
N.J.: Prentice-Hall, 1976), p. 169.

107. _The Plain Dealer_, July 3, 1988.

108. _Birmingham News_, Birmingham, Alabama, February 12, 1988.

109. “The Price of Knowledge,” broadcast in New York, December 12, 1974,
WNET/13, transcript supplied courtesy of WNET/13 and Henry Spira.

110. Quoted in the OTA report, _Alternatives to Animal Use in Research,
Testing and Education_, p. 277.

111. National Health and Medical Research Council, _Code of Practice for
the Care and Use of Animals for Experimental Purposes_ (Australian
Government Publishing Service, Canberra, 1985). A revised code has
recently been accepted; see “Australian Code of Practice,” _Nature_ 339:
412 (June 8, 1989).

112. OTA, _Alternatives to Animal Use in Research, Testing and
Education_, p. 377.

113. Pat Monaghan, “The Use of Animals in Medical Research,” _New
Scientist_, November 19, 1988, p. 54.

114. For a summary of the 1985 amendments, and of the law and
regulations at this time, see OTA, _Alternatives to Animal Use in
Research, Testing and Education_, pp. 280–286.

115. OTA, _Alternatives to Animal Use in Research, Testing, and
Education_, pp. 286–287.

116. OTA, _Alternatives to Animal Use in Research, Testing, and
Education_, pp.287, 298.

117. National Research Council, _Use of Laboratory Animals in Biomedical
and Behavioral Research_ (Washington, D.C.: National Academy Press,
1988). See especially the “Individual Statement” by C. Stevens.

118. _The Washington Post_, July 19, 1985, p. A10. For a more detailed
account of the Gennarelli case, see Lori Gruen and Peter Singer, _Animal
Liberation: A Graphic Guide_ (London: Camden Press, 1987), pp. 10–23.

119. “Group Charges Gillette Abuses Lab Animals,” _Chemical and
Engineering News_, October 6, 1986, p. 5.

120. H. Beecher, “Ethics and Clinical Research,” _New England Journal of
Medicine_ 274: 1354–1360 (1966); D. Rothman, “Ethics and Human
Experimentation: Henry Beecher Revisited,” _New England Journal of
Medicine_ 317: 1195–1199 (1987).

121. From the transcript of the “Doctors Trial,” Case I, United States
vs. Brandt et al. Quoted by W. L. Shirer, _The Rise and Fall of the
Third Reich_ (New York: Simon and Schuster, 1960), p. 985. For
additional descriptions of these experiments, see R. J. Lifton, _The
Nazi Doctors_ (New York: Basic Books, 1986).

122. _British Journal of Experimental Pathology_ 61: 39 (1980); cited by
R. Ryder, “Speciesism in the Laboratory,” in Peter Singer, ed., _In
Defense of Animals_, p. 85.

123. I. B. Singer, _Enemies: A Love Story_ (New York: Farrar, Straus and
Giroux, 1972).

124. See James Jones, _Bad Blood: The Tuskegee Syphilis Experiment_ (New
York: Free Press, 1981).

125. Sandra Coney, _The Unfortunate Experiment_ (Auckland: Penguin
Books, 1988).

126. E. Wynder and D. Hoffman, in _Advances in Cancer Research_ 8
(1964); see also the Royal College of Physicians report, _Smoking and
Health_ (London, 1962) and studies by the U.S. Health Department. I owe
these references to Richard Ryder, “Experiments on Animals,” in Stanley
and Roslind Godlovitch and John Harris, eds., _Animals, Men and Morals_,
p. 78.

127. “U.S. Lung Cancer Epidemic Abating, Death Rates Show,” _The
Washington Post_, October 18, 1989, p. 1.

128. “The Cancer Watch,” _U.S. News & World Report_, February 15, 1988.

129. _Science_ 241: 79 (1988).

130. “Colombians Develop Effective Malaria Vaccine,” _The Washington
Post_, March 10, 1988.

131. “Vaccine Produces AIDS Antibodies,” _Washington Times_, April 19,
1988.

132. “AIDS Policy in the Making,” _Science_ 239: 1087 (1988).

133. T. McKeown, _The Role of Medicine: Dream, Mirage or Nemesis_?
(Oxford: Blackwell, 1979).

134. D. St. George, “Life Expectancy, Truth, and the ABPI,” _The
Lancet_, August 9, 1986, p. 346.

135. J. B. McKinlay, S. M. McKinlay and R. Beaglehole, “Trends in Death
and Disease and the Contribution of Medical Measures” in H. E. Freeman
and S. Levine, eds., _Handbook of Medical Sociology_ (Englewood Cliffs,
N.J.: Prentice Hall, 1988), p. 16.

136. See William Paton, _Man and Mouse_ (Oxford: Oxford University
Press, 1984); Andrew Rowan, _Of Mice, Models and Men: A Critical
Evaluation of Animal Research_ (Albany: State University of New York
Press, 1984), chapter 12; Michael DeBakey, “Medical Advances Resulting
From Animal Research,” in J. Archibald, J. Ditchfield, and H. Rowsell,
eds., _The Contribution of Laboratory Animal Science to the Welfare of
Man and Animals: Past, Present and Future_ (New York: Gustav Fischer
Verlag, 1985); OTA, _Alternatives to Animal Use in Research, Testing and
Education_, chapter 5; and National Research Council, _Use of Animals in
Biomedical and Behavioral Research_ (National Academy Press, Washington,
D.C., 1988), Chapter 3.

137. Probably the best of those works arguing against the claims made
for animal experimentation is Robert Sharpe, _The Cruel Deception_.

138. “The Costs of AIDS,” _New Scientist_, March 17, 1988, p. 22.

_Chapter 3_

1. _The Washington Post_, October 3, 1971; see also the testimony during
September and October 1971, before the Subcommittee on Monopoly of the
Select Committee on Small Business of the U.S. Senate, in the Hearings
on the Role of Giant Corporations, especially the testimony of Jim
Hightower of the Agribusiness Accountability Project. For the size of
egg producers, see _Poultry Tribune_, June 1987, p. 27.

2. Ruth Harrison, _Animal Machines_ (London: Vincent Stuart, 1964), p.
3.

3. _Broiler Industry_, December 1987, p. 22.

4. Konrad Lorenz, _King Solomon’s Ring_ (London: Methuen and Company,
1964), p. 147.

5. _Farming Express_, February 1, 1962; quoted by Ruth Harrison, _Animal
Machines_, p. 18.

6. F. D. Thornberry, W. O. Crawley, and W. F. Krueger, “Debeaking:
Laying Stock to Control Cannibalism,” _Poultry Digest_, May 1975, p.
205.

7. As reported in _The Animal Welfare Institute Quarterly_, Fall 1987,
p. 18.

8. _Report of the Technical Committee to Enquire into the Welfare of
Animals Kept Under intensive Livestock Husbandry Systems_, Command Paper
2836 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery Office, 1965), paragraph 97.

9. A. Andrade and J. Carson, “The Effect of Age and Methods of Debeaking
on Future Performance of White Leghorn Pullets,” _Poultry Science_ 54:
666–674 (1975); M. Gentle, B. Huges, and R. Hubrecht, “The Effect of
Beak Trimming on Food Intake, Feeding Behavior and Body Weight in Adult
Hens,” _Applied Animal Ethology_ 8: 147–159 (1982); M. Gentle, “Beak
Trimming in Poultry,” _World’s Poultry Science Journal_ 42: 268–275
(1986).

10. J. Breward and M. Gentle, “Neuroma Formation and Abnormal Afferent
Nerve Discharges After Partial Beak Amputation (Beak Trimming) in
Poultry,” _Experienta_ 41: 1132–1134 (1985).

11. Gentle, “Beak Trimming in Poultry,” _World’s Poultry Science
Journal_ 42: 268–275 (1986).

12. U.S. Department of Agriculture Yearbook for 1970, p. xxxiii.

13. _Poultry World_, December 5, 1985.

14. _American Agriculturist_, March 1967.

15. C. Riddell and R. Springer, “An Epizootiological Study of Acute
Death Syndrome and Leg Weakness in Broiler Chickens in Western Canada,”
_Avian Diseases_ 29: 90–102 (1986); P. Steele and J. Edgar, “Importance
of Acute Death Syndrome in Mortalities in Broiler Chicken Flocks,”
_Poultry Science_ 61: 63–66 (1982).

16. R. Newberry, J. Hunt, and E. Gardiner, “Light Intensity Effects on
Performance, Activity, Leg Disorders, and Sudden Death Syndrome of
Roaster Chickens,” _Poultry Science_ 66: 1446–1450 (1987).

17. Trevor Bray, as reported in _Poultry World_, June 14, 1984.

18. See the studies by Riddell and Springer, and by Steele and Edgar,
cited in note 15 above.

19. D. Wise and A. Jennings, “Dyschondroplasia in Domestic Poultry,”
_Veterinary Record_ 91: 285–286 (1972).

20. G. Carpenter et al., “Effect of Internal Air Filtration on the
Performance of Broilers and the Aerial Concentrations of Dust and
Bacteria,” _British Poultry Journal_ 27: 471–480 (1986).

21. “Air in Your Shed a Risk to Your Health,” _Poultry Digest_,
December/January 1988.

22. _The Washington Times_, October 22, 1987.

23. _Broiler Industry_, December 1987, and _Hippocrates_,
September/October 1988. Perdue has confirmed that his chickens are
debeaked in a letter to me. See also the Animal Rights International
advertisement, “Frank, are you telling the truth about your chickens?”
_The New York Times_, October 20, 1989, p. A17.

24. F. Proudfoot, H. Hulan, and D. Ramey, “The Effect of Four Stocking
Densities on Broiler Carcass Grade, the Incidence of Breast Blisters,
and Other Performance Traits,” _Poultry Science_ 58: 791–793 (1979).

25. _Turkey World_, November/December 1986.

26. _Poultry Tribune_, January 1974.

27. _Farmer and Stockbreeder_, January 30, 1982; quoted by Ruth
Harrison, _Animal Machines_, p. 50.

28. _Feedstuffs_, July 25, 1983.

29. _American Agriculturist_, July 1966.

30. USDA statistics indicate that in 1986 the population of commercial
layers was 246 million. Assuming that the male/female hatching ratio is
roughly 50 percent, and that each bird is replaced approximately every
eighteen months, the above estimate is a minimum one.

31. _American Agriculturist_, March 1967.

32. _Upstate_, August 5, 1973, report by Mary Rita Kiereck.

33. _National Geographic Magazine_, February 1970.

34. _Poultry Tribune_, February 1974.

35. _Federal Register_, December 24, 1971, p. 24926.

36. _Poultry Tribune_, November 1986.

37. First report from the Agriculture Committee, House of Commons,
1980–1981, _Animal Welfare in Poultry, Pig and Veal Production_ (London:
Her Majesty’s Stationery Office, 1981), paragraph 150.

38. B. M. Freeman, “Floor Space Allowance for the Caged Domestic Fowl,”
_The Veterinary Record_, June 11, 1983, pp. 562–563.

39. _Poultry Tribune_, March 1987, p. 30; “Swiss Federal Regulations on
Animal Protection,” May 29, 1981.

40. Information on the Netherlands provided by Compassion in World
Farming, and the Netherlands Embassy, London. (See also _Farmer’s
Guardian._, September 29, 1989.) On Sweden, see Steve Lohr, “Swedish
Farm Animals Get a New Bill of Rights,” _The New York Times_, October
25, 1988.

41. _Poultry Tribune_, March 1987.

42. European Parliament, Session 1986/7, Minutes of Proceedings of the
Sitting of 20 February 1987, Document A2-211/86.

43. _Poultry Tribune_, November 1986.

44. _Upstate_, August 5, 1973.

45. _Animal Liberation_ (_Victoria_) _Newsletter_, May 1988 and February
1989.

46. Roy Bedichek, _Adventures with a Naturalist_, quoted by Ruth
Harrison, _Animal Machines_, p. 154.

47. _Upstate_, August 5, 1973.

48. _Der Spiegel_, 1980, no. 47, p. 264; quoted in _Intensive Egg and
Chicken Production_, Chickens’ Lib (Huddersfield, U.K.)

49. I. Duncan and V. Kite, “Some Investigations into Motivation in the
Domestic Fowl,” _Applied Animal Behaviour Science_ 18: 387–388 (1987).

50. _New Scientist_, January 30, 1986, p. 33, reporting a study by H.
Huber, D. Fölsch, and U. Stahli, published in _British Poultry Science_
26: 367 (1985).

51. A. Black and B. Hughes, “Patterns of Comfort Behaviour and Activity
in Domestic Fowls: A Comparison Between Cages and Pens,” _British
Veterinary Journal_ 130: 23–33 (1974).

52. D. van Liere and S. Bokma, “Short-term Feather Maintenance as a
Function of Dust-bathing in Laying Hens,” _Applied Animal Behaviour
Science_ 18: 197–204 (1987).

53. H. Simonsen, K. Vestergaard, and P. Willeberg, “Effect of Floor Type
and Density on the Integument of Egg Layers,” _Poultry Science_ 59:
2202–2206 (1980).

54. K. Vestergaard, “Dustbathing in the Domestic Fowl—Diurnal Rhythm and
Dust Deprivation,” _Applied Animal Behaviour Science_ 17: 380 (1987).

55. H. Simonsen, K. Vestergaard, and P. Willeberg, “Effect of Floor Type
and Density on the Integument of Egg Layers.”

56. J. Bareham, “A Comparison of the Behaviour and Production of Laying
Hens in Experimental and Conventional Battery Cages,” _Applied Animal
Ethology_ 2: 291–303 (1976).

57. J. Craig, T. Craig, and A. Dayton, “Fearful Behavior by Caged Hens
of Two Genetic Stocks,” _Applied Animal Ethology_ 10: 263–273 (1983).

58. M. Dawkins, “Do Hens Suffer in Battery Cages? Environmental
Preferences and Welfare,” _Applied Animal Behaviour_ 25: 1034–1046
(1977). See also M. Dawkins, _Animal Suffering: The Science of Animal
Welfare_ (London: Chapman and Hall, 1980), chapter 7.

59. _Plain Truth_ (Pasadena, California), March 1973.

60. C. E. Ostrander and R. J. Young, “Effects of Density on Caged
Layers,” _New York Food and Life Sciences_ 3 (3) (1970).

61. U.K. Ministry of Agriculture, Fisheries and Food, Poultry Technical
Information Booklet No. 13; quoted from _Intensive Egg and Chicken
Production_, Chickens’ Lib (Huddersfield, U.K.).

62. _Poultry Tribune_, March 1974.

63. Ian Duncan, “Can the Psychologist Measure Stress?” _New Scientist_,
October 18, 1973.

64. R. Dunbar, “Farming Fit for Animals,” _New Scientist_, March 29,
1984, pp. 12–15; D. Wood-Gush, “The Attainment of Humane Housing for
Farm Livestock,” in M. Fox and L. Mickley, eds., _Advances in Animal
Welfare Science_ (Washington, D.C.: Humane Society of the United States,
1985).

65. _Farmer’s Weekly_, November 7, 1961, quoted by Ruth Harrison,
_Animal Machines_, p. 97.

66. R. Dantzer and P. Mormede, “Stress in Farm Animals: A Need for
Reevaluation,” _Journal of Animal Science_ 57: 6–18 (1983).

67. D. Wood-Gush and R. Beilharz, “The Enrichment of a Bare Environment
for Animals in Confined Conditions,” _Applied Animal Ethology_ 20:
209–217 (1983).

68. U.S. Department of Agriculture, Fact Sheet: Swine Management,
AFS-3–8-12, Department of Agriculture, Office of Governmental and Public
Affairs, Washington, D.C.

69. F. Butler, quoted in John Robbins, _Diet for a New America_
(Walpole, N.H.: Stillpoint, 1987). p. 90.

70. D. Fraser, “The Role of Behaviour in Swine Production: a Review of
Research,” _Applied Animal Ethology_ 11: 332 (1984).

71. D. Fraser, “Attraction to Blood as a Factor in Tail Biting by Pigs,”
_Applied Animal Behaviour Science_ 17: 61–68 (1987).

72. _Farm Journal_, May 1974.

73. The relevant studies are summarized by Michael W. Fox, _Farm
Animals: Husbandry, Behavior, Veterinary Practice_ (University Park
Press, 1984), p. 126.

74. _Farmer and Stockbreeder_ January 22, 1963; quoted by Ruth Harrison,
_Animal Machines_, p. 95.

75. “Swine Production Management,” Hubbard Milling Company, Mankato,
Minnesota, 1984.

76. William Robbins, “Down on the Superfarm: Bigger Share of Profits,”
_The New York Times_, August 4, 1987.

77. _Feedstuffs_, January 6, 1986, p. 6.

78. _Hog Farm Management_, December 1975, p. 16.

79. Bob Frase, quoted in Orville Schell, _Modern Meat_ (New York: Random
House, 1984), p. 62.

80. _Farmer and Stockbreeder_, July 11, 1961; quoted in Ruth Harrison,
_Animal Machines_, p. 148.

81. J. Messersmith, quoted in J. Robbins, _Diet for a New America_, p.
84.

82. _Agscene_ (Petersfield, Hampshire, England), June 1987, p. 9.

83. _Farm Journal_, March 1973.

84. “Mechanical Sow Keeps Hungry Piglets Happy,” _The Western Producer_,
April 11, 1985.

85. _National Hog Farmer_, March 1978, p. 27.

86. U.S. Department of Agriculture, Fact Sheet: Swine Management,
AFS-3-8-12, Department of Agriculture, Office of Governmental and Public
Affairs, Washington, D.C.

87. U.S. Department of Agriculture, Fact Sheet: Swine Housing,
AFS-3–8-9, Department of Agriculture, Office of Governmental and Public
Affairs, Washington, D.C.

88. G. Cronin, “The Development and Significance of Abnormal Stereotyped
Behaviour in Tethered Sows,” Ph.D. thesis, University of Wageningen,
Netherlands, p. 25.

89. Roger Ewbank, “The Trouble with Being a Farm Animal,” _New
Scientist_, October 18, 1973.

90. “Does Close Confinement Cause Distress in Sows?” Scottish Farm
Buildings Investigation Unit, Aberdeen, July 1986, p. 6.

91. Farm Animal Welfare Council, _Assessment of Pig Production Systems_
(Farm Animal Welfare Council, Surbiton, Surrey, England, 1988), p. 6.

92. A. Lawrence, M. Appleby, and H. MacLeod, “Measuring Hunger in the
Pig Using Operant Conditioning: The Effect of Food Restriction,” _Animal
Production_ 47 (1988).

93. _The Stall Street Journal_, July 1972.

94. J. Webster, C. Saville, and D. Welchman, “Improved Husbandry Systems
for Veal Calves,” Animal Health Trust and Farm Animal Care Trust, no
date, p. 5; see also Webster et al., “The Effect of Different Rearing
Systems on the Development of Calf Behavior,” and “Some Effects of
Different Rearing Systems on Health, Cleanliness and Injury in Calves,”
_British Veterinary Journal_ 1141: 249 and 472 (1985).

95. J. Webster, C. Saville, and D. Welchman, “Improved Husbandry Systems
for Veal Calves,” p. 6.

96. J. Webster, C. Saville, and D. Welchman, “Improved Husbandry Systems
for Veal Calves,” p. 2.

97. _The Stall Street Journal_, November 1973.

98. _The Stall Street Journal_, April 1973.

99. _The Stall Street Journal_, November 1973.

100. _Farmer and Stockbreeder_, September 13, 1960, quoted by Ruth
Harrison, _Animal Machines_, p. 70.

101. _The Stall Street Journal_, April 1973.

102. G. van Putten, “Some General Remarks Concerning Farm Animal Welfare
in Intensive Farming Systems,” unpublished paper from the Research
Institute for Animal Husbandry, “Schoonoord,” Driebergseweg, Zeist, The
Netherlands, p. 2.

103. G. van Putten, “Some General Remarks Concerning Farm Animal Welfare
in Intensive Farming Systems,” p. 3.

104. _The Vealer_, March/April 1982.

105. U.K. Ministry of Agriculture, Fisheries and Food, Welfare of Calves
Regulations, 1987 (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery Office, 1987).

106. J. Webster, “Health and Welfare of Animals in Modern Husbandry
Systems—Dairy Cattle,” _In Practice_, May 1986, p. 85.

107. Gordon Harvey, “Poor Cow,” _New Scientist_, September 29, 1983, pp.
940–943.

108. _The Washington Post_, March 28, 1988.

109. D. S. Kronfeld, “Biologic and Economic Risks Associated with Bovine
Growth Hormone,” Conference on Growth Hormones, European Parliament,
December 9, 1987, unpublished paper, p. 4.

110. D. S. Kronfeld, “Biologic and Economic Risks Associated with Bovine
Growth Hormone,” p. 5.

111. Bob Holmes, “Secrecy Over Cow Hormone Experiments,” _Western
Morning News_, January 14, 1988.

112. Keith Schneider, “Better Farm Animals Duplicated by Cloning,” _The
New York Times_, February 17, 1988; see also Ian Wilmut, John Clark, and
Paul Simons, “A Revolution in Animal Breeding,” _New Scientist_, July 7,
1988.

113. _The Peoria Journal Star_, June 5, 1988.

114. “Is Pain the Price of Farm Efficiency?” _New Scientist_, October
13, 1973, p.171.

115. _Feedstuffs_, April 6, 1987.

116. _Farm Journal_, August 1967, March 1968.

117. S. Lukefahr, D. Caveny, P. R. Cheeke, and N. M. Patton, “Rearing
Weanling Rabbits in Large Cages,” _The Rabbit Rancher_, cited in
Australian Federation of Animal Societies, _Submission to the Senate
Select Committee of Inquiry into Animal Welfare in Australia_, vol. 2,
Melbourne, 1984.

118. _The Age_ (Melbourne), May 25, 1985.

119. This cage size is recommended by the Finnish Fur Breeders
Association. For mink, the U.K. Fur Breeders Association recommends
cages thirty inches by nine inches. See Fur Trade Fact Sheet, Lynx
(1986), Great Dunmow, Essex.

120. _Report of the Technical Committee to Enquire into the Welfare of
Animals Kept Under Intensive Livestock Husbandry Systems_, appendix.

121. _Report of the Technical Committee to Enquire into the Welfare of
Animals Kept Under Intensive Livestock Husbandry Systems_, paragraph 37.

122. See page 120 above.

123. Joy Mensch and Ari van Tienhove, “Farm Animal Welfare,” _American
Scientist_, November/December 1986, p. 599, citing a paper by D. W.
Fölsch, “Egg Production—Not Necessarily a Reliable Indicator for the
State of Health of Injured Hens,” in _Fifth European Poultry
Conference_, Malta, 1976.

124. B. Gee, _The 1985 Muresk Lecture_, Muresk Agricultural College,
Western Australian Institute of Technology, p. 8.

125. European Parliament, Session 1986/7, Minutes of proceedings of the
sitting of February 20, 1987, Document A2-211/86.

126. D. W. Fölsch, et al, “Research on Alternatives to the Battery
System for Laying Eggs,” _Applied Animal Behaviour Science_ 20: 29–45
(1988).

127. _Dehorning, Castrating, Branding, Vaccinating Cattle_, Publication
No. 384 of the Mississippi State University Extension Service,
cooperating with the USDA; see also _Beef Cattle: Dehorning, Castrating,
Branding and Marking_, USDA, Farmers’ Bulletin No. 2141, September 1972.

128. _Progressive Farmer_, February 1969.

129. _Pig Farming_, September 1973.

130. _Hot-iron Branding_, University of Georgia College of Agriculture,
Circular 551.

131. _Beef Cattle: Dehorning, Castrating, Branding and Marking_.

132. R. F. Bristol, “Preconditioning of Feeder Cattle Prior to
Interstate Shipment,” Report of a Preconditioning Seminar held at
Oklahoma State University, September 1967, p. 65.

133. U.S. Department of Agriculture Statistical Summary, Federal Meat
and Poultry Inspection for Fiscal Year 1986.

134. _The Washington Post_, September 30, 1987.

135. Colman McCarthy, “Those Who Eat Meat Share in the Guilt,” _The
Washington Post_, April 16, 1988.

136. Farm Animal Welfare Council, _Report on the Welfare of Livestock_
(_Red Meat Animals_) _at the Time of Slaughter_ (London: Her Majesty’s
Stationery Office, 1984) paragraphs 88, 124.

137. Harold Hillman, “Death by Electricity,” _The Observer_ (London)
July 9, 1989.

138. “Animals into Meat: A Report on the Pre-Slaughter Handling of
Livestock,” Argus Archives (New York) 2: 16–17 (March 1970); the
description is by John MacFarlane, a vice president of Livestock
Conservation, Inc.

139. Farm Animal Welfare Council, _Report on the Welfare of Livestock
When Slaughtered by Religious Methods_ (London: Her Majesty’s Stationery
Office, 1985), paragraph 50.

140. Temple Grandin, letter dated November 7, 1988.

141. Farm Animal Welfare Council, _Report on the Welfare of Livestock
When Slaughtered by Religious Methods_, paragraph 27.

142. _Science_ 240: 718 (May 6, 1988).

143. Caroline Murphy, “The ‘New Genetics’ and the Welfare of Animals,”
_New Scientist_, December 10, 1988, p. 20.

144. “Genetic Juggling Raises Concerns,” _The Washington Times_, March
30, 1988.

_Chapter 4_

1. Oliver Goldsmith, _The Citizen of the World_, in _Collected Works_,
ed. A. Friedman (Oxford: Clarendon Press, 1966), vol. 2, p. 60.
Apparently Goldsmith himself fell into this category, however, since
according to Howard Williams in _The Ethics of Diet_ (abridged edition,
Manchester and London, 1907, p. 149), Goldsmith’s sensibility was
stronger than his self-control.

2. In attempting to rebut the argument for vegetarianism presented in
this chapter of the first edition, R. G. Frey described the reforms
proposed by the House of Commons Agriculture Committee in 1981, and
wrote: “The House of Commons as a whole has yet to decide on this
report, and it may well be in the end that it is diluted; but even so,
there is no doubt that it represents a significant advance in combating
the abuses of factory farming.” Frey then argued that the report showed
that these abuses could be overcome by tactics that stopped short of
advocating a boycott of animal products. (R. G. Frey, _Rights, Killing
and Suffering_, Oxford: Blackwell, 1983, p. 207.) This is one instance
in which I sincerely wish my critic had been right; but the House of
Commons did not bother to “dilute” the report of its Agriculture
Committee—it simply ignored it. Eight years later nothing has changed
for the vast majority of Britain’s intensively produced animals. The
exception is for veal calves, where a consumer boycott _did_ play a
significant role.

3. Frances Moore Lappé, _Diet for a Small Planet_ (New York: Friends of
the Earth/Ballantine, 1971), pp. 4–11. This book is the best brief
introduction to the topic, and figures not otherwise attributed in this
section have been taken from this book. (A revised edition was published
in 1982.) The main original sources are _The World Food Problem_, a
Report of the President’s Science Advisory Committee (1967); _Feed
Situation_, February 1970, U.S. Department of Agriculture; and _National
and State Livestock-Feed Relationships_, U.S. Department of Agriculture,
Economic Research Service, Statistical Bulletin No. 446, February 1970.

4. The higher ratio is from Folke Dovring, “Soybeans,” _Scientific
American_, Feburary 1974. Keith Akers presents a different set of
figures in _A Vegetarian Sourcebook_ (New York: Putnam, 1983), chapter
10. His tables compare per-acre nutritional returns from oats, broccoli,
pork, milk, poultry, and beef. Even though oats and broccoli are not
high-protein foods, none of the animal foods produced even half as much
protein as the plant foods. Akers’s original sources are: United States
Department of Agriculture, _Agricultural Statistics_, 1979; United
States Department of Agriculture, _Nutritive Value of American Foods_
(Washington, D.C., U.S. Government Printing Office, 1975); and C. W.
Cook, “Use of Rangelands for Future Meat Production,” _Journal of Animal
Science_ 45: 1476 (1977).

5. Keith Akers, _A Vegetarian Sourcebook_, pp. 90–91, using the sources
cited above.

6. Boyce Rensberger, “Curb on U.S. Waste Urged to Help World’s Hungry,”
_The New York Times_, October 25, 1974.

7. _Science News_, March 5, 1988, p. 153, citing _Worldwatch_,
January/February 1988.

8. Keith Akers, _A Vegetarian Sourcebook_, p. 100, based on D. Pimental
and M. Pimental, _Food, Energy and Society_ (New York: Wiley, 1979), pp.
56, 59, and U.S. Department of Agriculture, _Nutritive Value of American
Foods_ (Washington, D.C.: U.S. Government Printing Office, 1975).

9. G. Borgstrom, _Harvesting the Earth_ (New York: Abelard-Schuman,
1973) pp. 64–65; cited by Keith Akers, _A Vegetarian Sourcebook_.

10. “The Browning of America,” _Newsweek_, February 22, 1981, p. 26;
quoted by John Robbins, _Diet for a New America_ (Walpole, N.H.:
Stillpoint, 1987), p. 367.

11. “The Browning of America,” p. 26.

12. Fred Pearce, “A Green Unpleasant Land,” _New Scientist_, July 24,
1986, p. 26.

13. Sue Armstrong, “Marooned in a Mountain of Manure,” _New Scientist_,
November 26, 1988.

14. J. Mason and P. Singer, _Animal Factories_ (New York: Crown, 1980),
p. 84, citing R. C. Loehr, _Pollution Implications of Animal Wastes_—_A
Forward Oriented Review_, Water Pollution Control Research Series (U.S.
Environmental Protection Agency, Washington, D.C., 1968), pp. 26–27; H.
A. Jasiorowski, “Intensive Systems of Animal Production,” in R. L. Reid,
ed., _Proceedings of the II World Conference on Animal Production_
(Sydney: Sydney University Press, 1975), p. 384; and J. W. Robbins,
_Environmental Impact Resulting from Unconfined Animal Production_
(Cincinnati: Environmental Research Information Center, U.S.
Environmental Protection Agency, 1978) p. 9.

15. “Handling Waste Disposal Problems,” _Hog Farm Management_, April
1978, p. 17, quoted in J. Mason and P. Singer, _Animal Factories_, p.
88.

16. Information from the Rainforest Action Network, _The New York
Times_, January 22, 1986, p. 7.

17. E. O. Williams, _Biophilia_ (Cambridge: Harvard University Press,
1984), p. 137.

18. Keith Akers, _A Vegetarian Sourcebook_, pp. 99–100; based on H. W.
Anderson, et al., _Forests and Water: Effects of Forest Management on
Floods, Sedimentation and Water Supply_, U.S. Department of Agriculture
Forest Service General Technical Report PSW–18/1976; and J. Kittridge,
“The Influence of the Forest on the Weather and other Environmental
Factors,” in United Nations Food and Agriculture Organization, _Forest
Influences_ (Rome, 1962).

19. Fred Pearce, “Planting Trees for a Cooler World,” _New Scientist_,
October 15, 1988, p. 21.

20. David Dickson, “Poor Countries Need Help to Adapt to Rising Sea
Level,” _New Scientist_, October 7, 1989, p. 4; Sue Wells and Alasdair
Edwards, Gone with the Waves,” _New Scientist_, November 11, 1989, pp.
29–32.

21. L. and M. Milne, _The Senses of Men and Animals_ (Middlesex and
Baltimore: Penguin Books, 1965), chapter 5.

22. _Report of the Panel of Enquiry into Shooting and Angling_,
published by the panel in 1980 and available through the Royal Society
for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals (U.K.), paragraphs 15–57.

23. Geoff Maslen, “Bluefin, the Making of the Mariners,” _The Age_
(Melbourne), January 26, 1985.

24. D. Pimental and M. Pimental, _Food, Energy and Society_ (New York:
Wiley, 1979), chapter 9; I owe this reference to Keith Akers, _A
Vegetarian Sourcebook_, p. 117.

25. See J. R. Baker: _The Humane Killing of Lobsters and Crabs_, The
Humane Education Centre, London, no date; J. R. Baker and M. B. Dolan,
“Experiments on the Humane Killing of Lobsters and Crabs,” _Scientific
Papers of the Humane Education Centre 2_: 1–24 (1977).

26. My change of mind about mollusks stems from conversations with R. I.
Sikora.

27. See pages 230–231 below.

28. “Struggle” is not altogether a joke. According to a comparative
study published in _The Lancet_ (December 30, 1972), the “mean transit
time” of food through the digestive system of a sample group of
nonvegetarians on a Western type of diet was between seventy-six and
eighty-three hours; for vegetarians, forty-two hours. The authors
suggest a connection between the length of time the stool remains in the
colon and the incidence of cancer of the colon and related diseases
which have increased rapidly in nations whose consumption of meat has
increased but are almost unknown among rural Africans who, like
vegetarians, have a diet low in meat and high in roughage.

29. David Davies, “A Shangri-La in Ecuador,” _New Scientist_, February
1, 1973. On the basis of other studies, Ralph Nelson of the Mayo Medical
School has suggested that a high protein intake causes us to “idle our
metabolic engine at a faster rate” (_Medical World News_, November 8,
1974, p. 106). This could explain the correlation between longevity and
little or no meat consumption.

30. _The Surgeon General’s Report on Nutrition and Health_ (Washington,
D.C.: U.S. Government Printing Office, 1988).

31. According to a wire-service report cited in _Vegetarian Times_,
November 1988.

32. _The New York Times_, October 25, 1974.

33. N. Pritikin and P. McGrady, _The Pritikin Program for Diet and
Exercise_ (New York: Bantam, 1980); J. J. McDougall, _The McDougall
Plan_ (Piscataway, N.J.: New Century, 1983).

34. Francis Moore Lappé, _Diet for a Small Planet_, pp. 28–29; see also
_The New York Times_, October 25, 1974; _Medical World News_, November
8, 1974, p. 106.

35. Quoted in F. Wokes, “Proteins,” _Plant Foods for Human Nutrition_,
1: 38 (1968).

36. In the first edition of _Diet for a Small Planet_ (1971), Frances
Moore Lappé emphasized protein complementarity to show that a vegetarian
diet can provide enough protein. In the revised edition (New York:
Ballantine, 1982) this emphasis has disappeared, replaced by a
demonstration that a healthy vegetarian diet is bound to contain enough
protein even without complementarity. For another account of the
adequacy of plant foods as far as protein is concerned, see Keith Akers,
_A Vegetarian Sourcebook_, chapter 2.

37. F. R. Ellis and W. M. E. Montegriffo, “The Health of Vegans,” _Plant
Foods for Human Nutrition_, vol. 2, pp. 93-101 (1971). Some vegans claim
that B12 supplements are not necessary, on the grounds that the human
intestine can synthesize this vitamin from other B-group vitamins. The
question is, however, whether this synthesis takes place sufficiently
early in the digestive process for the B12 to be absorbed rather than
excreted. At present the nutritional adequacy of an all-plant diet
without supplementation is an open scientific question; accordingly it
seems safer to take supplementary B12. See also F. Wokes, “Proteins,”
_Plant Foods for Human Nutrition_, p. 37.

_Chapter 5_

1. Genesis 1:24–28.

2. Genesis 9:1–3.

3. _Politics_, Everyman’s Library, (London: J. M. Dent & Sons, 1959), p.
10.

4. _Politics_, p. 16.

5. W. E. H. Lecky, _History of European Morals from Augustus to
Charlemagne_ (London: Longmans, 1869), 1: 280–282.

6. Mark 5:1–13.

7. Corinthians 9:9–10.

8. Saint Augustine, _The Catholic and Manichaean Ways of Life_, trans.
D. A. Gallagher and I. J. Gallagher (Boston: The Catholic University
Press, 1966), p. 102. I owe this reference to John Passmore, _Man’s
Responsibility for Nature_ (New York: Scribner’s, 1974), p. 11.

9. _History of European Morals_, vol. 1, p. 244; for Plutarch see
especially the essay “On the Eating of Flesh” in his _Moral Essays_.

10. For Basil, see John Passmore, “The Treatment of Animals,” _The
Journal of the History of Ideas_ 36: 198 (1975); for Chrysostom, Andrew
Linzey, _Animal Rights: A Christian Assessment of Man’s Treatment of
Animals_ (London: SCM Press, 1976), p. 103; and for Saint Isaac the
Syrian, A. M. Allchin, _The World is a Wedding: Explorations in
Christian Spirituality_ (London: Darton, Longman and Todd, 1978), p. 85.
I owe these references to R. Attfield, “Western Traditions and
Environmental Ethics,” in R. Elliot and A. Gare, eds., _Environmental
Philosophy_ (St. Lucia: University of Queensland Press, 1983), pp.
201–230. For further discussion see Attfield’s book, _The Ethics of
Environmental Concern_ (Oxford: Blackwell, 1982); K. Thomas, _Man and
the Natural World: Changing Attitudes in England 1500–1800_ (London:
Allen Lane, 1983), pp. 152–153; and R. Ryder, _Animal Revolution:
Changing Attitudes Towards Speciecism_ (Oxford: Blackwell, 1989), pp
34–35.

11. _Summa Theologica_ II, II, Q64, art. 1.

12. _Summa Theologica_ II, II, Q159, art. 2.

13. _Summa Theologica_ I, II, Q72, art. 4.

14. _Summa Theologica_ II, II, Q25, art. 3.

15. _Summa Theologica_ II, I, Q102, art. 6; see also _Summa contra
Gentiles_ III, II, 112 for a similar view.

16. E. S. Turner, _All Heaven in Rage_ (London: Michael Joseph, 1964),
p. 163.

17. V. J. Bourke, _Ethics_ (New York: Macmillan, 1951), p. 352.

18. John Paul II, _Solicitudo Rei Socialis_ (Homebush, NSW: St. Paul
Publications, 1988), sec. 34, pp. 73–74.

19. _St. Francis of Assisi, His Life and Writings as Recorded by His
Contemporaries_, trans. L. Sherley-Price (London: Mowbray, 1959), see
especially p. 145.

20. Picola della Mirandola, _Oration on the Dignity of Man_.

21. Marsilio Ficino, _Theologica Platonica_ III, 2 and XVI, 3; see also
Giannozzo Manetti, _The Dignity and Excellence of Man_.

22. E. McCurdy, _The Mind of Leonardo da Vinci_ (London: Cape, 1932), p.
78.

23. “Apology for Raimond de Sebonde,” in his _Essays_.

24. _Discourse on Method_, vol. 5; see also his letter to Henry More,
February 5, 1649. I have given the standard reading of Descartes, the
way in which his position was understood at the time, and has been
understood by most of his readers up to and including the present; but
it has been claimed recently that this standard reading is a mistake, in
that Descartes did not intend to deny that animals could suffer. For
further details, see John Cottingham, “‘A Brute to the Brutes?’
Descartes’ Treatment of Animals,” _Philosophy_ 53: 551–559 (1978).

25. John Passmore describes the question “why do animals suffer?” as
“for centuries, the problem of problems. It engendered fantastically
elaborate solutions. Malebranche [a contemporary of Descartes] is quite
explicit that for purely theological reasons it is necessary to deny
that animals can suffer, since all suffering is the result of Adam’s sin
and the animals do not descend from Adam.” See John Passmore, _Man’s
Responsibility for Nature_, p. 114n.

26. Letter to Henry More, February 5, 1649.

27. Nicholas Fontaine, _Memories pour servir a l’histoire de Port-Royal_
(Cologne, 1738), 2: 52–53; quoted in L. Rosenfield, _From Beast-Machine
to Man-Machine: The Theme of Animal Soul in French Letters from
Descartes to La Mettrie_ (New York: Oxford University Press, 1940).

28. _Dictionnaire Philosophique_, s.v. “Bêtes.”

29. _Enquiry Concerning the Principles of Morals_, chapter 3.

30. _The Guardian_, May 21, 1713.

31. _Elements of the Philosophy of Newton_, vol. 5; see also _Essay on
the Morals and Spirit of Nations_.

32. _Emile_, Everyman’s Library (London: J. M. Dent & Sons), 1957,
2:118–120.

33. _Lecture on Ethics_, trans. L. Infield (New York: Harper Torchbooks,
1963), pp. 239–240.

34. _Hansard’s Parliamentary History_, April 18, 1800.

35. E. S. Turner, _All Heaven in a Rage_, p. 127. Other details in this
section come from chapters 9 and 10 of this book.

36. It has been claimed that the first legislation protecting animals
from cruelty was enacted by the Massachusetts Bay Colony in 1641.
Section 92 of “The Body of Liberties,” printed in that year, reads: “No
man shall exercise any Tirranny or Crueltie towards any bruite Creature
which are usuallie kept for man’s use”; and the following section
requires a rest period for animals being driven. This is a remarkably
advanced document; one could quibble over whether it was technically a
“law,” but certainly Nathaniel Ward, compiler of the “Body of
Liberties,” deserves to be remembered along with Richard Martin as a
legislative pioneer. For a fuller account, see Emily Leavitt, _Animals
and Their Legal Rights_ (Washington, D. C.: Animal Welfare Institute,
1970).

37. Quoted in E. S. Turner, _All Heaven in a Rage_, p. 162. For an
exploration of the implications of this remark that is a valuable
supplement to the discussion here, see James Rachels, _Created From
Animals: The Moral Implications of Darwinism_ (Oxford: Oxford University
Press, 1990).

38. Charles Darwin, _The Descent of Man_ (London, 1871), p. 1.

39. Charles Darwin, _The Descent of Man_, p. 193.

40. See Lewis Gompertz, _Moral Inquiries on the Situation of Man and of
Brutes_ (London, 1824); H. S. Salt, _Animals’ Rights_ (London, 1892; new
edition, Clark’s Summit Pennsylvania, Society for Animal Rights, 1980)
and other works. I am indebted to _Animals’ Rights_ for some of the
quotations in the following pages.

41. Book 2, chapter 11; for the same idea, see Francis Wayland,
_Elements of Moral Science_ (1835), reprint, J. L. Blau, ed. (Cambridge:
Harvard University Press, 1963), p. 364, perhaps the most widely used
work on moral philosophy in nineteenth-century America.

42. Quoted by S. Godlovitch, “Utilities,” in Stanley and Roslind
Godlovitch and John Harris, eds., _Animals, Men and Morals_ (New York:
Taplinger, 1972).

43. Quoted in H. S. Salt, _Animals’ Rights_, p. 15.

44. Benjamin Franklin, _Autobiography_ (New York: Modern Library, 1950),
p. 41.

45. Quoted in H. S. Salt, _Animals’ Rights_, p. 15.

46. _La Bible de l’humanité_, quoted in H. Williams, _The Ethics of
Diet_ (abridged ed., Manchester and London, 1907), p. 214.

47. _On the Basis of Morality_, trans. E. F. J. Payne (Library of
Liberal Arts, 1965), p. 182; see also _Pargera und Paralipomena_,
chapter 15.

48. See E. S. Turner, _All Heaven in a Rage_, p. 143.

49. E. S. Turner, _All Heaven in a Rage_, p. 205.

50. T. H. Huxley, _Man’s Place in Nature_ (Ann Arbor: University of
Michigan Press, 1959), chapter 2.

_Chapter 6_

1. Dean Walley and Frieda Staake, _Farm Animals_ (Kansas City: Hallmark
Children’s Editions, no date).

2. M. E. Gagg and C. F. Tunnicliffe, _The Farm_ (Loughborough, England:
Ladybird Books, 1958).

3. An example: Lawrence Kohlherg, a Harvard psychologist noted for his
work on moral development, relates how his son, at the age of four, made
his first moral commitment, and refused to eat meat because, as he said,
“it’s bad to kill animals.” It took Kohlherg six months to talk his son
out of this position, which Kohlherg says was based on a failure to make
a proper distinction between justified and unjustified killing, and
indicates that his son was only at the most primitive stage of moral
development. (L. Kohlherg, “From Is to Ought,” in T. Mischel, ed.,
_Cognitive Development and Epistemology_, New York: Academic Press,
1971, pp. 191–192.) Moral: If you reject a pervasive human prejudice,
you just can’t be morally developed.

4. W. L. Gay, _Methods of Animal Experimentation_ (New York: Academic
Press, 1965), p. 191; quoted in Richard Ryder, _Victims of Science_
(London: Davis-Poynter, 1974).

5. Bernhard Grzimek, “Gequälte Tiere: Unglück für die Landwirtschaft,”
in _Das Tier_ (Bern, Switzerland), special supplement.

6. Examples are the 1876 British Cruelty to Animals Act and the
1966–1970 Animal Welfare Act in the United States, both of which were
enacted in response to concern about animals being used in experiments
but have done little to benefit those animals.

7. For a list of some of the more radical organizations, see Appendix 3.

8. E. S. Turner, _All Heaven in a Rage_ (London: Michael Joseph, 1964),
p. 129.

9. E. S. Turner, _All Heaven in a Rage_, p. 83.

10. Gerald Carson, _Cornflake Crusade_ (New York: Rinehart, 1957), pp.
19, 53–62.

11. E. S. Turner, _All Heaven in a Rage_, pp. 234–235; Gerald Carson,
_Men, Beasts and Gods_ (New York: Scribner’s 1972), p. 103.

12. See Farley Mowat, _Never Cry Wolf_ (Boston: Atlantic Monthly Press,
1963), and Konrad Lorenz, _King Solomon’s Ring_ (London: Methuen, 1964),
pp. 186–189. I owe the first reference to Mary Midgley, “The Concept of
Beastliness: Philosophy, Ethics and Animal Behavior,” _Philosophy_ 48:
114 (1973).

13. See, in addition to the references above, works by Niko Tinbergen,
Jane van Lawick-Goodall, George Schaller, and Irenaus Eibl-Eibesfeldt.

14. See pages 207–208 above.

15. See page 208.

16. See Judy Mann, “Whales, Hype, Hypocrisy,” _The Washington Post_,
October 28, 1988.

17. I am often asked: What should we do about our cats and dogs? Some
vegetarians are understandably reluctant to buy meat for their companion
animals, for to do so is still to support the exploitation of animals.
In fact it is not difficult to raise a dog as a vegetarian—Irish
peasants who could not afford meat did it on milk and potatoes for
centuries. Cats present more of a problem, since they need taurine, an
amino acid not readily available from plants. It is now possible,
however, to obtain a vegetarian taurine supplement from the American
group, Harbinger of a New Age. It has been claimed that this makes it
possible for cats to be healthy on a vegetarian diet, but the health of
cats on such a diet should be watched closely. Information can also be
obtained from the British Vegetarian Society. See Appendixes 2 and 3 for
addresses.

18. “On the Legality of Enslaving the Africans,” by a Harvard student;
quoted in Louis Ruchames, _Racial Thought in America_ (Amherst:
University of Massachusetts Press, 1969), pp. 154–156.

19. See Leslie Stephen, _Social Rights and Duties_ (London, 1896) quoted
by Henry Salt, “The Logic of the Larder,” which appeared in Salt’s _The
Humanities of Diet_ (Manchester: The Vegetarian Society, 1914), pp.
34–38, and has been reprinted in T. Regan and P. Singer, eds., _Animal
Rights and Human Obligations_ (Englewood Cliffs, N. J.: Prentice-Hall,
1976).

20. S. F. Sapontzis has argued that the possible happy life of a normal
child and the possible miserable life of a deformed child are both
reasons for having or not having the child only when the child is in
existence, and there is thus no asymmetry. (S. F. Sapontzis, _Morals,
Reason and Animals_, Philadelphia: Temple University Press, 1987,
pp.193–194.) But this would mean that it is not wrong to decide to
conceive a miserable child, although it is wrong to decide to keep the
child alive once it exists. What if one knows, at the time the child is
conceived, that one will have no opportunity for having an abortion or
for carrying out euthanasia after the child is born? Then there will be
a miserable child, so it would seem that a wrong has been done. But in
Sapontzis’s view, there appears to be no time at which that wrong can be
done. I cannot see that this suggestion solves the problem.

21. See my _Practical Ethics_ (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press,
1979) chapters 4 and 6. For further discussion, see Michael Lockwood,
“Singer on Killing and the Preference for Life,” _Inquiry_ 22 (1–2):
157–170; Edward Johnson, “Life, Death and Animals,” and Dale Jamieson,
“Killing Persons and Other Beings,” both in Harlan Miller and William
Williams, eds., _Ethics and Animals_ (Clifton, N. J.: Humana Press,
1983); Johnson’s essay has been reprinted in T. Regan and P. Singer,
eds., _Animal Rights and Human Obligations_ (Englewood Cliffs, N. J.:
Prentice Hall, 2nd edition, 1989). See also S. F. Sapontzis, _Morals,
Reason and Animals_, chapter 10. To understand the arguments lurking
behind the entire debate, however, the indispensable (but not easy!)
source is Derek Parfit, _Reasons and Persons_ (Oxford: Clarendon Press,
1984), part IV.

22. The leading defender of rights for animals is Tom Regan; see his
_The Case for Animal Rights_ (Berkeley and Los Angeles: University of
California Press, 1983). I have indicated why I differ in
“Utilitarianism and Vegetarianism,” _Philosophy and Public Affairs_ 9:
325–337 (1980); “Ten Years of Animal Liberation,” _The New York Review
of Books_, April 25, 1985; and “Animal Liberation or Animal Rights,”
_The Monist_ 70: 3–14 (1987). For a detailed argument that a being
without a capacity to see itself as existing over time cannot have a
right to life, see Michael Tooley, _Abortion and Infanticide_ (Oxford:
Clarendon Press, 1983).

23. A defense of such a position is presented in R.M. Hare’s forthcoming
article, “Why I Am Only a Demi-vegetarian.”

24. Brigid Brophy, “In Pursuit of a Fantasy,” in Stanley and Roslind
Godlovitch and John Harris, eds., _Animals, Men and Morals_ (New York:
Taplinger, 1972), p. 132.

25. See Cleveland Amory, _Man Kind_? (New York: Harper and Row, 1974),
p. 237.

26. Lewis Gompertz, _Moral Inquiries on the Situation of Man and of
Brutes_ (London, 1824).

27. For a powerful account of the cruelty inherent in the Australian
wool industry, see Christine Townend, _Pulling the Wool_ (Sydney: Hale
and Iremonger, 1985).

28. See Appendix 2.

29. For examples of how brutal and painful the killing of “pests” can
be, see Jo Olsen, _Slaughter the Animals, Poison the Earth_, (New York:
Simon and Schuster, 1971) pp. 153–164.

30. A few scattered researchers have now begun work on contraception for
wild animals; for a review, see J. F. Kirkpatrick and J. W. Turner,
“Chemical Fertility Control and Wildlife Management,” _Bioscience_ 35:
485–491 (1985). But the resources being put into this area remain
minuscule in comparison with those spent on poisoning, shooting, and
trapping.

31. _Natural History_ 83 (3): 18 (March 1974).

32. In A. I. Melden, ed., _Human Rights_ (Belmont, Calif.: Wadsworth,
1970), p. 106.

33. W. Frankena, “The Concept of Social Justice,” in R. Brandt, ed.,
_Social Justice_ (Prentice-Hall, Englewood Cliffs, N.J., 1962.)

34. H. A. Bedau, “Egalitarianism and the Idea of Equality,” in J. R.
Pennock and J. W. Chapman, eds., _Nomos IX: Equality_ (New York, 1967).

35. G. Vlastos, “Justice and Equality,” in _Social Justice_, p. 48.

36. J. Rawls, _A Theory of Justice_ (Cambridge: Harvard University
Press, Belknap Press, 1972), p. 510. For another example, see Bernard
Williams, “The Idea of Equality,” in P. Laslett and W. Runciman, eds.,
_Philosophy, Politics and Society_, second series, (Oxford: Blackwell,
1962), p. 118.

37. For an example, see Stanley Benn’s “Egalitarianism and Equal
Consideration of Interests,” _Nomos IX: Equality_, pp. 62ff.

38. See Charles Magel, _Keyguide to Information Sources in Animal
Rights_ (Jefferson, N.C.: McFarland, 1989). The works of just a few of
these philosophers are listed in Appendix 1.

39. R. G. Frey, “Vivisection, Morals and Medicine,” _Journal of Medical
Ethics_ 9: 95–104 (1983). Frey’s major critique of my work is _Rights,
Killing and Suffering_ (Oxford: Blackwell, 1983), but see also his
_Interests and Rights: The Case Against Animals_ (Oxford: Clarendon
Press, 1980). I respond (too briefly) to these books in “Ten Years of
Animal Liberation,” _The New York Review of Books_, April 25, 1985.

40. See M. A. Fox, _The Case for Animal Experimentation_ (Berkeley:
University of California Press, 1986) and Fox’s letter in _The
Scientist_, December 15, 1986; see also Fox’s “Animal Experimentation: A
Philosopher’s Changing Views,” _Between the Species_ 3: 55–60 (1987),
and the interview with Fox in _Animals’ Agenda_, March 1988.

41. Katherine Bishop, “From Shop to Lab to Farm, Animal Rights Battle is
Felt,” _The New York Times_, January 14, 1989.

42. “The Battle Over Animal Rights,” _Newsweek_, December 26, 1988.

43. See Henry Spira, “Fighting to Win” in Peter Singer, ed., _In Defense
of Animals_ (Oxford: Blackwell, 1985), pp. 194–208.

44. See Alex Pacheco with Anna Francione, “The Silver Spring Monkeys,”
in Peter Singer, ed., _In Defense of Animals_, pp. 135–147.

45. See Chapter 2, note 118.

46. _Newsweek_, December 26, 1988, pp. 50–51.

47. Barnaby J. Feder, “Research Looks Away From Laboratory Animals,”
_The New York Times_, January 29, 1989, p. 24; for an earlier picture of
the work of the Coalition to Abolish the LD50 and Draize Tests, see
Henry Spira, “Fighting to Win” in Peter Singer, ed., _In Defense of
Animals_.

48. Government of Victoria, _Prevention of Cruelty to Animals
Regulations_, 1986, no. 24. The regulation covers the testing of any
chemical, cosmetic, toilet, household, or industrial preparation. It
prohibits the use of the conjunctival sac of rabbits for that purpose,
and also prohibits any test in which animals are subjected to a range of
increasing doses and the number of fatalities is used for the purpose of
producing a statistically valid result. On New South Wales, see _Animal
Liberation: The Magazine_ (Melbourne) 27: 23 (January-March 1989).

Acknowledgments

It is normal practice to thank those who have assisted in the writing of
a book; but in the present instance my debts are of a special kind,
which can only be indicated by a brief narrative.

In the fall of 1970 I was a graduate student at the University of
Oxford. Although I had specialized in moral and social philosophy, it
had not occurred to me—any more than it occurs to most people—that our
relations with animals raised a serious moral issue. I knew, of course,
that some animals were cruelly treated, but I assumed that these were
incidental abuses and not an indication of anything fundamentally wrong.

My complacency was disturbed when I met Richard Keshen, a fellow student
at Oxford and a vegetarian. Over lunch I asked him why he did not eat
meat, and he began to tell me about the conditions in which the animal
whose body I was eating had lived. Through Richard and his wife Mary, my
wife and I became friendly with Roslind and Stanley Godlovitch, also
vegetarians studying philosophy at Oxford. In long conversations with
these four—and particularly with Roslind Godlovitch, who had worked out
her ethical position in considerable detail—I became convinced that by
eating animals I was participating in a systematic form of oppression of
other species by my own species. The central ideas of this book derive
from these conversations.

Reaching a theoretical conclusion is one thing; putting it into practice
is another. Without the support and encouragement of Renata, my wife,
who had become equally convinced that our friends were right, I might
still be eating meat, though with a guilty conscience.

The idea of writing a book arose from the enthusiastic response to my
review of _Animals, Men and Morals_, edited by Stanley and Roslind
Godlovitch and John Harris, which appeared in the _New York Review of
Books_ (April 5, 1973). I am grateful to the editors of the _New York
Review_ for publishing this unsolicited discussion of a book on an
unfashionable topic. The review would, however, never have turned into a
book without the encouragement and assistance of the following:

Eleanor Seiling, of United Action for Animals, New York, made her
organization’s unique collection of documents on experimental uses of
animals available to me; and Alois Acowitz’s summaries of the
experimenters’ reports enabled me to find what I wanted in a fraction of
the time that would otherwise have been needed.

Richard Ryder generously lent me material he had gathered for his own
book, _Victims of Science_.

Joanne Bower, of the Farm and Food Society, London, provided me with
information on the conditions of farm animals in Britain.

Kathleen Jannaway, of the Vegan Society of the United Kingdom, helped me
to locate reports on the nutritional adequacy of plant foods.

John Norton, of the Animal Rescue League of Boston, and Martha Coe, of
Argus Archives, New York, provided materials on the transport and
slaughter of animals in the United States.

The Scottish Society for the Prevention of Vivisection was of assistance
in obtaining photographs of experiments on animals.

Dudley Giehl, of Animal Liberation, Inc., New York, allowed me to use
material he had collected on intensive farming and vegetarianism.

Alice Herrington and Joyce Lambert, of Friends of Animals, New York,
assisted in many ways, and Jim Mason, of the same organization, arranged
visits to intensive farms.

An invitation to take up a visiting position in the Department of
Philosophy at New York University for the academic year 1973–1974
provided me with a congenial atmosphere and an ideal location for
research and writing, and my colleagues and students gave me valuable
comments and criticism. I also had the opportunity to subject my views
on animals to the critical scrutiny of students and faculty of the
philosophy departments at the following universities: Brown University,
Fordham University, Long Island University, North Carolina State
University at Raleigh, Rutgers University, State University of New York
at Brockport, State University of New York at Stony Brook, Tufts
University, University of California at Berkeley, University of Miami,
and Williams College; and at the Yale Law School and a meeting of the
Society for Philosophy and Public Affairs, New York. Chapters 1 and 6 of
this book benefited considerably from the discussions following my
talks.

Finally I must thank the editors and publisher of the _New York Review
of Books_ for their support for the book, and especially Robert Silvers,
whose thoughtful editorial advice has considerably improved the original
manuscript. It is left only to add that responsibility for any remaining
imperfections is mine alone.

So many people, from all over the world, have helped in preparing this
revised edition that I am bound to leave some out, for which I can only
apologize. Sometimes the assistance consisted of reading drafts,
sometimes it was sending me material so that I could keep abreast of
developments in many different countries. Here is a list, in no
particular order: Don Barnes and Melinda Moreland of the (U.S.) National
Anti-Vivisection Society, Alex Hershaft of Farm Animal Reform Movement,
MacDonald White and Ann St. Laurent of United Action for Animals, Joyce
D’Silva and Carol Long of Compassion in World Farming, Clare Druce and
Violet Spalding of Chickens’ Lib, Henry Spira of Animal Rights
International, Brad Miller of the Humane Farming Association, Kim
Stallwood and Carla Bennett of People for the Ethical Treatment of
Animals, Peter Hamilton of Lifeforce, Maria Comninou of the Ann Arbor
Association for Responsible Animal Treatment, George Cave of
Trans-Species Unlimited, Paola Cavalieri of _Etica & Animali_ in Milan,
Birgitta Carlsson of the Swedish Society Against Painful Experiments on
Animals, Detlef Fölsch of the Institute of Animal Sciences, Swiss
Federal Institute of Technology, Charles Magel, John Robbins, Richard
Ryder, Clive Hollands, and Jim Mason.

Special thanks are due to Lori Gruen, who worked as a kind of United
States coordinator, gathering new material for, and helping me to
update, the chapters on experimentation and factory farming. She also
made many valuable suggestions on a draft of the entire book. Lori in
turn wishes to thank, in addition to those listed above, the following
who supplied information to her: Diane Halverson of the Animal Welfare
Institute; Avi Magidoff, Jeff Diner, and Martin Stephens, whose work on
aspects of animal experimentation in the United States proved an
invaluable resource; and Ken Knowles and Dave Macauley.

My revisions to the chapter on factory farming were further aided by
work done for a submission on factory farming, prepared with enormous
industry and impeccable scholarship by Suzanne Pope and Geoff Russell
for the Australian and New Zealand Federation of Animal Societies. My
comments on fish and fishing benefited from another fine submission,
prepared for Animal Liberation (Victoria) by Patty Mark.

Finally, I again owe a great deal to the _New York Review of Books_: to
Robert Silvers for his support for the idea of a new edition and for the
application of his fine critical skills in the process of editing it; to
Rea Hederman, who directed the many facets of publication; and to Neil
Gordon, who oversaw the typesetting with wonderful care and attention to
detail.

Index

abortion, 2, 17

academic research, 72–73, 94

acute death syndrome, 103–104

AFRRI (US Armed Forces [USAF] Radiobiology Research Institute), 30, 77

agribusiness corporations, 96–98, 100, 129, 144, 156, 254–255

AIDS, 90

alternatives: to experiments on animals, 36, 58, 59, 61, 86, 88, 94

to products, 232

American Council on Science and Health, 57

American Heart Association, 180

American Medical Association, 58

_American Scientist_, 142

American Veterinary Medical Association, 72

Amory, Cleveland, _Man Kind_?, 256

Animal Experimentation Ethics Committee, 77

Animal Liberation Front, 80

Animal Liberation Inc., NY, 300

Animal Rescue League, Boston, 300

Animal Welfare Act (US), 36, 76, 77, 79

Animal Welfare Institute (US), 302

Animals (Scientific Procedures) Act, 77

apes, in experiments, 35 see also baboons, chimpanzees

Aquinas, Saint Thomas, 186, 193–195, 244

Argus Archives, NY, 300

Aristotle, 188, 189, 193, 236

Arnold, Dr. Thomas, 209

Aspin, Les, 29

asses, 197, 204

Association of the British Pharmaceutical Industry, 90, 93

Augustine, Saint, 192

Avon, 58, 246

baboons, in experiments, 81

Baltimore, Dr. David, 75

Barnes, Dr. Donald, 28, 71, 301

beagles, in experiments, 29, 30, 63, 67

public protest, 29

Bedichek, Roy, 114

beef: cattle, 97, 139–140

artificial insemination, 138

branding, 145

castration, 145–146

dehorning, 145, 152–155

slaughter, 150

transportation, 147–150

Bentham, Jeremy, 5, 7–8, 204, 207, 211, 225

Bergh, Henry, 222

Bible, 187–189, 194–208

birds: legislation re, 110–113, 115

Saint Francis, 197, 198

social behavior, 99–101, 102, 103, 113–117

see also chickens, hens

Black Liberation, 221

see also racism

Bloomer, Amelia, 221

books: animals in, 214, 215, 216

general, 251–253

animals in research, 253

farm animals and meat industry, 254–255

vegetarianism, 255–256

wildlife 256

see also footnotes

bovine growth hormone (BST), 138–139

Bower, Joanne, 300

boycott, 162, 175, 177, 218, 220, 227, 233, 247

Brambell, Prof. F. W. Rogers, committee report, 101, 141, 142, 144, 161,
254

re poultry, 101–102

breeding lab animals, 37, 38, 93

Bristol-Myers, 58

British Agricultural and Food Research Council Poultry Research Centre,
102

British Farm Animal Welfare Council, 128

British Medical Association, 181

Brooks Air Force Base, 25–26, 28, 77

see _Project X_

Brophy, Brigid, 231

Brown, Lester, 166

Bruno, Giordano, 199

bullfighting, 162, 204, 230

Bureau of Animal Health, Australia, 143

Butler, Samuel, 107

Buxton, Fowell, 221

cages, 48, 93

chickens, 107–117, 142, 143, 144

laying hens, 109–119

monkeys, 32

pigs, 125–128

wild animals, 22, 141

California Primate Research Center, 35

California Students’ Rights bill, 247

calves: veal, 129–136, 162, and

protein supply, 165, 166

transport of, 148–150

cancer, 58, 84, 89, 180, 181

candles, 232

Canning, George, 204

carnivorous species, 225, 228

castration, 145, 146, 148

cats, 214

and animal welfare societies, 219

experiments on, 62, 246

laws re, 205

cattle: see beef cattle, calves, cows

Charles River Breeding Labs, 37, 38

Chavez, Cesar, 163

cheese, 176, 177

Chesterfield, Lord, 208, 225

Chickens’ Lib, 301

chickens, 116, 117

broilers, 99–106

caging, 108–118

crowding, 99, 102–106, 110–114

debeaking, 101–102

social order, 99, 100, 116

see also hens, poultry

children

attitude toward animals, 213–216

books and stories on animals for, 214–216

on vegetarian diet, 213–214, 216

see also infants

chimpanzees, 35, 36

experiments on, 25–28, 89

language, 14

Chinese: cooking, food, 176, 178

Christianity, 186, 189, 190, 191, 192, 193, 194, 197, 199, 200, 201, 203

Roman Catholicism, 193, 196, 197

circuses, 17, 22

Coalition against the Draize Test, 58

Coe, Martha, 300

Columbus Instruments, 38

Compassion in World Farming, 301

cosmetics, 53–54, 58, 59, 94, 230, 246–247

cows, dairy, 136–138, 176, 215

Cronin, Dr. G, 127

crustaceans, 171, 173, 174

da Vinci, Leonardo, 179, 199

dairy: industry, 137, 138, 166, 176

vegetarian substitutes, 176, 177, 180

Darwin, Charles, 252

Dawkins, Marian, _Animal Suffering: The Science of Animal Welfare_, 254

deer, 231, 234, 235

Deneau, Dr. Gerald, 66

Descartes, René, 10, 13, 200, 201, 202

disease control, world, 92

dissection, 203

dogs, 202, 214

and animal welfare societies, 219

experiments on, 223

dolphins, 22, 173, 226

Downstate Medical Center, 66

Draize, J.H., 54

Draize Test, 54–56, 58, 82, 248

drugs, tested on animals, 42, 44, 53–54, 57–58, 61, 64, 66–69, 74, 76,
94

addictive, 57, 66, 67, 68, 69, 74

ecology, 173

Edinburgh University, 120

Egg City, S. California, 109

egg industry, 98, 107, 108, 113, 117–119, 168, 175, 254

and welfare societies, 219

see also hens

eggs: “free range,” 171, 165, 176, 177

nutrition, 175, 180, 182

as protein source, 166–67, 181

Enlightenment, the, 186

environment, 234

equality, 8, 9, 17, 106, 237–239, 241

Eton College, 208

euthanasia, 17, 18, 20

evolution, theory of, 11, 206–207, 252

Farber, Theodore M., 60

Farm & Food Society, London, 300

Farm Animal Reform Movement, 301

Farm Animal Welfare Control, 128

_Farm Animals_ (children’s book), 215

_Farmer & Stockbreeder_, 122, 124

_Farmer’s Weekly_, 120

farms: agribusiness, 96–100, 129, 144, 156, 162, 165–66, 216, 227

and animal welfare societies, 112, 121, 128, 144, 151, 156, 218, 219,
220, 227

in children’s books, 214–216

egg “factory,” 98, 107, 108, 113, 117–119, 168, 175, 254

see also Brambell, Prof. F.W., report

Federal Humane Slaughter Act (US), 152

fishing industry, 22, 172

fish, 171, 172, 173

capacity for suffering, 172

as food, 168, 171, 174, 209

Flamm, Gary, 60

foodstuffs, tested on animals, 40, 53

Fox, Michael Allen, 242

Francis of Assisi, Saint, 197–198

Franklin, Benjamin, 209

Friends of Animals, NY, 300

frogs, 36

Fund for Animals, Inc., NY, 226

funds for research, 42, 58, 68, 72, 74, 81, 88

furs: farming, 22

trapping, xvii, 17, 22, 230, 231

Gallo, Robert, 89

Gandhi, xix, 179

gay: community, 89–90

Gee, Dr. B.H., 143

Genesis, book of, 187, 194–208

genetic engineering, 139, 157

Gennarelli, Thomas, 80, 246

Germany, Nazi, 83–84, 217

Giehl, Dudley, 300

Godlovitch, Roslind & Stanley _Animals, Men & Morals_, 251, 299

Goldsmith, Oliver 159

Gompertz, Lewis, _Moral Inquiries_, 207, 231, 252

Goodall, Jane, _In the Shadow of Man_, 14, 35

government: British, 13, 36, 41, 74, 101, 112, 128, 136, 151, 161

see also Ministries US, 36, 74, 76, 88, 152

Congress, 29, 76

lobbies, 93, 129, 180

Australia, 77–78

see also legislation

Graham, Jenifer, 247

grain: protein from, 179–180

wastage in rearing animal food, 166, 167

Greece, ancient, 186, 188, 189, 198

Greeley, Horace, 221

Greyhound Corporation, 96

Gruen, Lori, _Animal Liberation: A Graphic Guide_ (with Singer and
Hine), 252, 301

Grzimek, Dr. Bernhard, 217

_Guardian, The_, 90

guinea pigs, 37, 38, 57, 80, 89

Gwaltney of Smithfield, 150

Hainsworth, Alan, 108, 113, 114

Haley, Fred C., 107

hamsters, 37, 57, 80

Harlow, Harry E., 31–35, 50, 73

Harrison, Ruth, _Animal Machines_, 98, 141, 161, 254

Harvard Bioscience, 39

Harvard University, 45, 70

health care, 92

Heim, Alice, 51–52

Heller Institute of Medical Research, Israel, 63

hemorrhage, 63–66

hens, laying, 107–119

in egg production plants, 173–176

caging, 99, 108–119, 144, 245

debeaking, 101

“force-molting,” 118–119

see also chickens

Herrington, Alice, 300

Hillman, Dr. Harold, 62

Hinduism, 62, 179, 203, 210

Hitler, Adolf, 239, 243

HIV antibody, 89

Holland, farming in: battery cages, 113–114, 245

pig, 125

veal, 129

water pollution, 168

horses, 15, 204, 232

Houghton Poultry Research Station, Britain, 111

human: dignity, 239

equality, 1–6, 8, 9, 239

morality, 20, 219, 224, 225, 237–244, 247

rights, 221, 222, 237, 238

see also infants and retarded

Humane Farming Association, 301

Humane Society of the US, 218, 219

humanism, 198, 199

Hume, David, 202

Hungary, centenarians of, 179

hunters, 230, 231, 234

Huntingdon Research Center, 55

Hurnick, Dr. J. Frank, 125

Huxley, T.H., 211

India: cooking, 179

experiments on animals, 62

infants: human, 81–82, 240

brain-damaged, 18,

compared with animals, 15–16, 240

instinct, 223

Institute of Laboratory Animal Resources-National Research Council, 77

intelligence, 4, 6, 9, 18

Isaiah, prophet, 188

Jannaway, Kathleen, 300

Jefferson, Thomas, 5–6

Jesus, 191, 192

Jews: Old Testament, 191

ritual slaughter, 153–156

John Hancock Mutual Life Insurance, 96

Johns Hopkins Center for Alternatives to Animal Testing, 58

_Journal of Comparative & Physiological Psychology_, 72

_Journal of the American Veterinary Medical Association_, 73

kangaroos, 22

Kant, Immanuel, 203, 244

Kapleau, Roshi P., _To Cherish All Life: A Buddhist View of Animal
Slaughter and Meat Eating_, 255

Keshen, Mary and Richard, 299

KG Medical College, India, 62

killing: by animals, 21, 194, 222, 224

euthanasia, 17, 18, 20

wrongness of, 17–20, 175, 228–230

see also slaughter

Kramer, Larry, 89

Laboratories: public knowledge of, 216, 217, 219

see also experiments on animals

Laboratory Animal Breeders Association, 37

Lambert, Joyce, 300

lambs, meat, 140, 167, 170

_Lancet, The_, 61, 90

language, 14

scientific jargon, 49, 51

vegetarianism, 162–163, 175

of rights, 8

Lappé, Frances Moore, _Diet for a Small Planet_, 165, 255

LD50 (lethal dose 50 percent) 53–56, 58, 60, 82, 247

leather, 230, 231, 232

Lecky, W.E.H., 190, 193

Legislation re animals 19th century, 204, 205

British, 245

US, 72, 79

re cages, 115

re slaughter, 152, 153, 155

see also names of acts

liberation movements, 1

life, sanctity of, 17–18, 191, 199, 228–230

Lorenz, Konrad, 99, 114, 115

Magel, Charles, 241, 301

Maier, Steven, 46, 47

Manichees, 194

Mark, Patty, 302

Martin, Richard, 204–205

Mason, Jim, 300, 301

maternal deprivation, see mothers, separation from

Mauldin, Joseph, 101

McKenna, Virginia, eds. _Beyond the Bars_ (with Travers and Wray), 256

McKeown, Thomas, _The Role of Medicine_, 90

McKinley, J.B. and S.M., 90–91

meat

children and, 213–216

defense of eating, 228, 230, 236

terminology, 95, 96, 149

see also slaughter

mental suffering, 15–16

mice: in experiments, 36–38, 42, 43, 57, 67, 79, 80

as pests, 214, 233, 234

Michelet, 209

Midgley, Mary, _Animals and Why They Matter_, 252

Milgram, Stanley, 69

milk: nutrition, 166, 167, 181

substitutes, 177

and vegetarianism, 166, 175, 177

Ministry of Agriculture, Codes of Practice (British), 104, 112, 118

minks, 22, 141

mollusks, 174

_Monitor, The_, 70

monkeys: experiments on, 25–28, 30–36, 50, 55, 57, 66, 67, 69–71, 75, 80

psychological, 32–36

transplants, 75, 91

see also baboon, chimps

Montaigne, Michel de, 199

Moslem, ritual slaughter, 153–156

mothers, separation from, 82, 32–36, 146, 223

calves, 129, 132, 136, 162

monkeys, 32–36

pigs, 125, 126

National Anti-Vivisection Society, 301

National Association for Biomedical Research, 93

_National Geographic Magazine_, 109

National Institute of Mental Health (NIMH), 42, 74

National Institute of Poultry Husbandry (Britain), 107

National Institute on Drug Abuse, 68

National Institute of Environmental Health Sciences, 89

National Pork Producers’ Council, 124

National Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Children (British),
222

Nature, 38

Nazi, medical experiments, xxii, 83–84

Negroes, 6

Jefferson, 5

see also Black Liberation, racism, slavery

_New Scientist_, 52, 57, 79

_New York Review of Books_, 300, 301, 302

New York University, 300

New York, legislation, 222

Norton, John, 300

Noxell Corporation, 59

Nozick, Robert, 75

Nurmi, Paavo, 180

nutrition, 92

and vegetarianism, 175, 176, 180–182, 216, 255–256

see also protein

Oregon State University Rabbit Research Center, 141

organizations, animal welfare, 218, 219, 220, 232, 245–247

misdirection of effort, 218, 219

Orwell, George, _Animal Farm_, 119

OTA (US Congress Office of Technology Assessment), 36, 50, 54, 78, 79,
80

Oxford University, 299

oysters, 171, 174

Paarlberg, Don, 166

Pacheco, Alex, 246

pain: capacity to feel theory, 9–13, 15, 171, 172, 174, 175, 195, 200,
201, 220, 235, 238

language, 14

plants, 235, 236

see also suffering

Paley, William, 207, 208, 209, 224

Parliament: British, 19th century, 204, 205

British, 20th century, 111

European, 113, 144

Paul, Saint, 191

peanut butter, 181

People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals, 59, 81, 301

_Peoria Journal Star_, 139

Perdue, Frank, 105–106

Perdue Inc., 105–106

perfumes, 232 pests, 233–234

pesticides tested, 56, 57, 59

_Pig Farming_, 146

pigeons, in experiments, 61

pigs, 120–121, 216, 220, 228

experiments on, 66, 84, 142, 156

reared for food, 123–125

in cages, 121, 122, 124, 125

castration, 144

“iron maiden,” 126

“porcine stress syndrome,” 122

slaughter, 150–151

sows, 122

tail-docking, 121–122

Pius IX, Pope, 196

plants: milk from, 176

pain, 235, 236

protein, 165, 166, 181, 182

see also grain and vegetables

political lobbies, 93, 161, 180

Pope, Alexander, 203

Port-Royal seminary, 201

_Poultry Science_, 106

_Poultry Tribune_, 106, 111, 112, 119

_Poultry World_, 103

poultry: experiments on, 57

see chickens, hens, turkeys

Primate Equilibrium Platform (PEP), 25–30, 72, 77

_Progressive Farmer, The,_ 146

_Project X_, 25–28

Protection of Birds Act, 146

protein: “complementary,” 160, 164–166, 179–182

Provimi, Inc., 130–136

psychology: animal experiments, 32–36, 40, 42, 49–52, 70, 74

public: attitude of, 217, 219–223, 244

knowledge, 217, 219, 224

and factory farming, 145, 244

protest, 20, 40, 58–59, 86–87, 93, 156, 219

punishments, in experiments, 42, 65, 69

Pure Food and Drug Act (US), 154

Pythagoras, 188, 189, 201

rabbits: in experiments, 39, 54, 58, 62, 246

intensive rearing, 141

as pests, 233–234

Rachels, James, _Created from Animals: The Moral Implications of
Darwinism_, 252

racism, 3–6, 83, 220, 221, 238, 244

radiation experiments, 25, 27, 28–31, 65, 82

rats: experiments on, 30, 36, 37, 39, 40, 43–44, 47–49, 52, 55–57, 64,
67, 70, 74

as pests, 233–234

Rawls, John, _A Theory of Justice_, 240

rearing animals for food, 22

see also farms, beef, cattle, calves, chickens, pigs, fish

Regan, Tom, and Singer, Peter, eds., _Animal Rights and Human
Obligations_, 252

Regenstein, Lewis, _The Politics of Extinction_, 256

Reite, Martin, 35, 36

religion: 197, 203

Christianity, 186, 189–197, 200–203

Hinduism, 210, 203

Judaism, 186, 191

ritual slaughter, 152–156

sanctity of life, 191, 199

Renaissance, the, 198, 199

reptiles, 36, 172

research institutions, 99, 102, 104, 111, 127, 128, 156, 216–217

retarded humans, 18, 20, 28, 240

Revlon, 58–59, 246

rights, 1, 2, 6–8

human, 221, 222, 237–238

Robbins, John, _Diet for a New America: How Your Food Choices Affect
Your Health, Happiness and the Future of Life on Earth_, 255, 301

rodeos, 17, 22

Rollin, Bernard, _The Unheeded Cry_, 252

Roman Catholic Church, the, 193, 196, 197

Rome, ancient arenas of, 190, 192

Rose, Murray, 180

Rosenthal, S.M., 63, 66

Rousseau, Jean-Jacques, 203, 204

Rowan, Andrew, _Of Mice, Models_, _and Men: A Critical Evaluation_, 37,
254

Royal Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals, 205, 218

Rutgers University, 312

Ryder, Richard, _Victims of Science_, 253, 300, 301

Sackett, Gene, 35

Salt, Henry S., _Animals’ Rights_, 207, 208, 252

Sapontzis, Steve, _Morals, Reason and Animals_, 253

Schopenhauer, Arthur, 209–211

_Science_, 59

Scientists, attitudes of, 12, 56, 58, 75, 89

Scottish Society for the Prevention of Vivisection, 300

Scruggs, C.G., 146

seals, 62

Seiling, Eleanor, 300

Seligman, Martin, 46–47, 51

sentiment, 224, 243

sexism, 3, 4, 6, 220, 221, 238, 244

Shames, Ben, 109

Sharpe, Robert, _The Cruel Deception_, 253

Shaw, George Bernard, 163, 179

sheep: experiments on, 220

rearing, 141, 232

shock, 25–49, 65–69

Sidgwick, Henry, 5

Silvers, Robert, 301, 302

Singer, Renata, 299

Singer, Isaac Bashevis, 84

skin testing, 38, 55, 59

slaughter, xxi, 150, 156

19th century, 211

soaps, 232

societies, animal welfare, 217–219, 222

souls, 200

speciesism, 6, 9, 18–23, 42, 69, 72, 83, 94, 144, 193, 196, 198, 206,
207, 220, 221, 230, 244, 245

Spira, Henry, 58, 59, 301

spouses, animal, 223

St. George, Dr. David, 90

Stanton, Elizabeth Cady, 221

starvation, world, 164, 166, 220, 221

Stone, Lucy, 221

stress: egg farms, 108, 114, 116, 117

induced by experiments, 49, 63–64

of pigs, 122–124

in transportation, 147–150

students, 69, 71

suffering, see pain

Suomi, Stephen, 32–34, 50

Sweden, ritual slaughter in, 154

animal welfare in, 112, 114, 144, 154, 245

Switzerland, 112, 114, 144, 154, 245

Taub, Dr. Edward, 246

taxes, 9, 22, 31, 40

Taylor, Thomas, _A Vindication of the Rights of Brutes_, 1–2

Texas, cattle in, 148

thalidomide, 57

Thorpe, W.H., 141, 142

_Times, The_, 204

TNT, 30

tobacco, 88

tofu, (Chinese bean curd), 177, 179

Tolstoy, Leo, 179

torture, 70, 85

Trans-Species Unlimited, 68, 301

transplants, 75, 91

transportation of cattle, 147–150

“shipping fever,” 149

trapping: for furs, 17, 235

lab animals, 93, 223

Truth, Sojourner, 6

_Turkey World_, 106

turkeys, 106, 195

Turner, E.S., _All Heaven in a Rage_, 253

Ulrich, Roger, 70, 71

United Action for Animals, New York, 44, 64, 267, 300, 301

United Egg Producers, 113

universities, research rationale, 72–73

see academic research, names of universities

University of California, 35, 43, 67, 238, 301

University of Melbourne, 104

University of Pennsylvania, 46, 80, 246

University of Rochester, 62, 66

University of Washington Primate Center, 35

US Air Force, 25–29, 71, 77

US Air Force School of Aerospace Medicine, 27, 28, 72

US Armed Forces [USAF] Radiobiology Research Institute (AFRRI), 30, 77

US Army, 30, 55, 64, 74

US Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases, 55

US Army Research Institute of Environmental Medicine, 64

US Congress Office of Technology Assessment (OTA), 36, 50, 54, 78, 79,
80

US Defense Dept., 29, 74

US Dept. of Agriculture, 37, 55, 79

and agribusiness, 121–122, 126, 156

US Federal Humane Slaughter Act, 152

US Fish & Wildlife Service, 234

US Food & Drug Administration, 53, 54, 60

US government, 36, 74, 88

lobbies, 93, 152, 180

US House of Representatives, 29

US National Academy of Sciences, 181

US National Aeronautics & Space Administration, 74

US National Institutes of Health, 74, 77, 89

US National Science Foundation, 74

US Naval Medical School, 62

US Overseas Development Council, 166

US Public Health Service, 63, 74

veal production, see calves

_Vealer, The_, 135

Vegan Society, UK, 300

vegans cookbook, 175, 176, 180, 182

vegetables: cooking, 178, 179

vegetarianism, 255–256

eating out, 247

and health, 244

nutrition, 255–256

protein, 160, 164–166, 179–182

social effects, 236

and children, 213–214, 216

Veterans Administration Hospital, Pittsburgh, 42

veterinarians, 62, 70–72, 135–136, 244

Vilcabamba Valley, Equador, 179

Walter Reed Army Institute of Research, 89

Wasserstrom, Richard, 238

weight: loss in transportation, 148–149

Wells, Dick, 107

whales, 22, 226

Whelan, Elizabeth, 57

White, Robert, 75

_Whole Rat Catalog, The_, 39

Wilberforce, William, 221

wild animals, 223, 226, 234, 256

capturing, 17, 231

experiments on, 37

on television, 216

wild, conditions in the, 216, 222, 226–227

wildlife refuges, 227, 234, 256

Wisconsin Primate Research Center, 31

Wittgenstein, Ludwig, 14

Wollstonecraft, Mary, _Vindication of the Rights of Woman_, 1, 221

wolves, 214, 222–223

women’s rights, 1–3, 6, 221, 240–241

leaders of movement, 221

see also sexism

Wood, H. C., 61

wool, 232

world: disease control, 92

food shortage, 92, 255

rainforests, 168–169

Wynne-Tyson, J., ed., _Food for a Future: How World Hunger Could Be
Ended by the 21st Century_, and _The Extended Circle_, 253

Yale University, 62, 301

Zagury, David, 89

zoos, 17, 216, 217, 223, 256

A Biography of Peter Singer

Peter Singer (b. 1946) is arguably the world’s most influential living
philosopher. In 2005 _Time_ magazine named him one of the one hundred
most influential people in the world, and he ranked third on the
Gottlieb Duttweiler Institute’s list of Global Thought Leaders for 2013.

Singer was born on July 6 in Melbourne, Australia, to Jewish parents who
had fled Vienna in 1938 after the Austrian annexation by Hitler’s
Germany. His grandparents, however, did not leave, and three of them
died in the Holocaust. Singer’s maternal grandfather was the renowned
classical scholar David Oppenheim, who was an early collaborator—and
then a critic—of Sigmund Freud’s. Singer explores the lives of his
grandparents, the time in which they lived, and the lasting impact they
had on his and countless others’ lives in _Pushing Time Away_, first
published in 2003.

As an undergraduate at the University of Melbourne, Singer studied law,
history, and philosophy, receiving a bachelor of arts degree with honors
in 1967. He married Renata Diamond, an author and novelist in her own
right, the following year, and in 1969 he received a master’s degree,
also from the University of Melbourne, with the thesis “Why should I be
moral?”

Singer was awarded a scholarship to study at the University of Oxford
and in 1971 obtained a bachelor of philosophy degree with a thesis on
civil disobedience, published in 1973 as _Democracy and Disobedience_.
He was supervised by R. M. Hare, a philosopher Singer cites as one of
his greatest mentors.

Thus began Singer’s teaching career, which included periods at Oxford,
New York University, and Monash University, and would span the period
from 1971 to 1999. During this time, he achieved international acclaim;
_Animal Liberation_, his work on the ethics of animal treatment that
popularized the term _speciesism_, was published in 1975 and thrust
Singer into the global spotlight. In 2011 _Time_ included _Animal
Liberation_ in its All-Time 100 Nonfiction Books list.

Singer went on to publish more than forty books delving into the
fundamentals of morality, ethics, abortion, infanticide, euthanasia, and
world poverty, including _Practical Ethics_ (1979), _The Expanding
Circle_ (1981), _How Are We to Live?_ (1993), and _Rethinking Life and
Death_ (1994), which were translated into more than twenty-five
languages. Many of Singer’s best works were anthologized in _Writings on
an Ethical Life_, published in 2000.

By the end of the nineties, Singer had moved to the United States after
accepting the position of Ira W. DeCamp Professor of Bioethics in the
University Center for Human Values at Princeton University. In 2004 he
turned his eye to the Bush administration, releasing _The President of
Good and Evil_ in the lead-up to that year’s presidential election. The
book further expanded his readership, putting him at the center of
contemporary debate. During the same year, Singer was recognized as the
Australian Humanist of the Year.

In 2005 he was offered the position of laureate professor at the
University of Melbourne’s School of Historical and Philosophical
Studies, a position he continues to hold alongside his appointment at
Princeton.

A lifelong champion of making philosophy relevant to a broad audience,
Singer founded the Centre for Human Bioethics at Monash University in
Australia, where he served as chair of the Philosophy Department. In
2012 he was made a Companion of the Order of Australia, the nation’s
highest civic honor, for his services to philosophy and bioethics.

Singer currently serves on the advisory boards of Incentives for Global
Health and Academics Stand Against Poverty, and on the board of Animal
Charity Evaluators. He has three daughters and four grandchildren. His
recreations include hiking and surfing.

[image]

Peter and Renata Singer at their graduation from the University of
Melbourne in 1967.

[image]

Peter and Renata at their wedding on December 16, 1968.

[image]

[image]

Wedding celebrations continue for the young couple!

[image]

Peter and Renata near Oxford, circa 1971.

[image]

The author at Princeton University in 1999. Photo courtesy of Denise
Applewhite, Princeton University.

[image]

A rare find for a keen hunter: the edible cauliflower fungus (_sparassis
crispa_). Princeton, circa 2005.

[image]

The author hiking in Glacier National Park, Montana, 2008. Photo
courtesy of Renata Singer.

[image]

The author ready for the surf in Anglesea, Victoria, Australia, 2009.

[image]

Singer at Princeton University in 2010. Photo courtesy of Andrew
Wilkinson.

[image]

The author on vacation with his family in Queensland, Australia, Easter
2011.

[image]

Singer arguing for the legalization of physician-assisted dying at the
International Conference on End of Life, Brisbane, Australia, August
2014. Photo courtesy of Tony Phillips, ICEL.

All rights reserved, including without limitation the right to reproduce
this ebook or any portion thereof in any form or by any means, whether
electronic or mechanical, now known or hereinafter invented, without the
express written permission of the publisher.

Copyright © 1975, 1990, 2002, 2009 by Peter Singer

Cover design by Kat Lee

ISBN: 978-1-4976-4559-2

This edition published in 2015 by Open Road Integrated Media, Inc.

345 Hudson Street

New York, NY 10014

www.openroadmedia.com

[image]

[image]

EARLY BIRD BOOKS

FRESH EBOOK DEALS, DELIVERED DAILY

BE THE FIRST TO KNOW ABOUT
FREE AND DISCOUNTED EBOOKS

NEW DEALS HATCH EVERY DAY!

[image]

EBOOKS BY PETER SINGER

FROM OPEN ROAD MEDIA

[image] [image]

[image] [image]

Available wherever ebooks are sold

[image]

[img]

OPEN ROAD INTEGRATED MEDIA is a digital publisher and multimedia content
company. Open Road creates connections between authors and their
audiences by marketing its ebooks through a new proprietary online
platform, which uses premium video content and social media.

VIDEOS, ARCHIVAL DOCUMENTS, AND NEW RELEASES

Sign up for the Open Road Media newsletter and get news delivered
straight to your inbox.

Sign up now at

www.openroadmedia.com/newsletters

FIND OUT MORE AT

WWW.OPENROADMEDIA.COM

FOLLOW US:

@OPENROADMEDIA AND

FACEBOOK.COM/OPENROADMEDIA
